_	Uniflow has developed the S5000 to the point that it is being demonstrated as a pre-commercial prototype known as the 'Cobber'.
_	For example, sometimes bone can become extremely hard to the point that it is nearly impossible to carve.
_	After the September 11 attacks, the music scene in New York City was affected to the point that the label decided to invest in smaller acts that performed reggaetón.
_	The growth of Queretaro's population eventually escalated to the point that a venue with a much larger capacity was needed, resulting in this venue.
_	To emphasize the point that Israel regards the actions of the PLO problematic, but not the Arab people, Israel might want to consider making a special effort to reward friends and advance human rights among Arabs.
_	Milton criticises every aspect of "Eikon Basilike" to the point that when Charles I claims that he was with gentlemen, Milton responds "Gentlemen indeed; the ragged Infantrie of Stewes and Brothels".
_	Robert Nozick made the point that what happens in society can not always be reduced to competitions for a coveted position and in 1974 wrote that "life is not a race in which we all compete for a prize which someone has established", that there is "no unified race" and there is not some one person "judging swiftness".
_	Southwood makes the point that Nehemiah's objection to intermarriage with foreign women, especially those aforementioned, relates to language being "the" symbol of ethnicity; therefore, it is not the language itself that is the problem, but rather the preservation of language is a "symptom of deeper concern about protecting ethnic identity."
_	The devout Burnet refused, angering the Mexican authorities to the point that they cancelled his grant for operating the saw mill.
_	He skillfully deflected and evaded the karate students’ strikes and kicks to the point that they gave up and ran back to tell their teacher about what happened.
_	Kafka was editing "A Hunger Artist" on his deathbed, a story whose composition he had begun before his throat closed to the point that he could not take any nourishment.
_	When they do so, Mone's condescending, humiliating attitude toward Schraeder angers him to the point that, after agreeing to make the film "the biggest film since "Howard the Duck"", he confronts Mone in the parking lot with a gun and tries to make him perform fellatio on the security guard (Wessler had gotten on the lot by doing the same thing) and kill him if he does not make the film.
_	Following the war and the subsequent marginalization of such efforts under the Francoists regime, the use of the name of Cantabria decreased, to the point that for official purposes it was relegated to sports associations, the only arena in which Cantabria was noted as a region.
_	Georgescu stressed the point that even with the proliferation of solar collectors throughout the surface of the globe, or the advent of fusion power, or both, any industrial economy will still depend on a steady flow of material resources extracted from the crust of the earth, notably metals.
_	While not part of the cabinet, DPP cooperated closely with the governing coalition on most issues and received support for key political stances in return, to the point that the government was commonly referred to as the "VKO-government" (O being DPP's election symbol).
_	"Chevron" is the Court's clearest articulation of the doctrine of "administrative deference", to the point that the Court itself has used the phrase ""Chevron" deference" in more recent cases.
_	Following 3 years of debate it was eventually decided that the building will be torn down as the buildings condition had deteriorated to the point that it was a safety concern.
_	His health worsened to the point that he barely made it back to the state of Georgia.
_	By August, construction had progressed to the point that heavier units could be based at Kusan and the USAF assigned the 3rd Bombardment Wing to Kunsan.
_	Spence made the point that in order to create these uninhabited spaces, the United States first had to disposess the Indians who were living in them.
_	Despite this history, the Haitian elite was traditionally very Francophile to the point that the Haitian writer Jean Price-Mars published a book in 1928 "Ainsi Parla l'Oncle" (So Spoke the Uncle) accusing the elite of "bovarysme", of intentionally neglecting and ignoring traditional Haitian folk culture as it had too many West African elements and was not French enough for the elite.
_	After leaving S.H.I.E.L.D., Fury has shown that he knows how to elude all such monitoring devices to the point that he was able to enter the S.H.I.E.L.D helicarrier and attack the current Director Danvers.
_	The "toga picta" was later worn by the Roman emperors, to the point that 'purple' is sometimes used a metonym for the office (e.g. the phrase 'donned the purple' means 'became emperor').
_	The first tape recorders started arriving at ORTF in 1949; however, their functioning was much less reliable than the shellac players, to the point that the "Symphonie pour un homme seul", which was composed in 1950–51, was mainly composed with records, even if the tape recorder was available .
_	"The rise in inequality in the United States over the last three decades has reached the point that inequality in incomes is causing an unhealthy division in opportunities, and is a threat to our economic growth.
_	Otto Fenichel added the point that while some criminals actively sought punishment to relive their unconscious guilt, others sought to "avoid" punishment in order to prove their guilt feelings were unjustified.
_	In an efficient way, on having been tied in a sense to his astral deities, and to be the point of connection between the worlds of below (Uku Pacha) and of the surface who were living (Kay Pacha), they fulfill the function to reveal the knowledge of the Pasha as time and space; representing in joint form, at the moment of realizing the ceremonies, a species of " Theatricality of the Power ", where the Inka or the representative of the Inka occupies the central position on the point that connects all the sacred directions, not only of three-dimensional form but concibiendo simultaneously, inside this abstraction, the temporary dimension.
_	But in 1323 he had done much but to the point that his presence was problematic for some in the Muslim population.
_	When the child does wet the pants, these designs smudge to the point that they fade completely to white.
_	Bill Gates recalls that, when he and Paul Allen read about the Altair in the January 1975 issue of "Popular Electronics", they understood that the price of computers would soon drop to the point that selling software for them would be a profitable business.
_	The beats are focused to the point that a few sound too similar, but overall it is a memorable listen from a musical standpoint.
_	In recent decades, incidence of adenocarcinoma of the esophagus (which is associated with Barrett's esophagus) steadily rose in the United States to the point that it has now surpassed squamous-cell carcinoma.
_	Only a month after Kigeli's November 1959 ascension, Hutu versus Tutsi militancy increased to the point that hundreds died.
_	As houses began being built close to the refinery, the population there grew to the point that in 1921, this unincorporated area became the incorporated Village of Roxana.
_	After their formation, the drainage basin, which fed rainwater to these troughs, shrank to the point that the runoff became insufficient to contribute to the cutting of these troughs.
_	The couple has been married for "five or six" years, but their marriage is suffering to the point that they cannot remember the last time they had sex.
_	His use of marijuana grew to the point that he would meet with a group of friends—athletes, skaters, surfers and musicians—every day before school to share a bong before classes in what they nicknamed "Zero Period."
_	Joyce continued to revise all previously published sections until "Finnegans Wake"'s final published form, resulting in the text existing in a number of different forms, to the point that critics can speak of "Finnegans Wake" being a different entity to "Work in Progress".
_	By 1977 the library had grown to the point that it moved out of the building.
_	However, the tape had deteriorated to the point that, as it passed by the tape head, the ferrite detached from the plastic backing and fell off.
_	Under the leadership of Station Manager Steve Joos, listenership (and advertising revenues) grew to the point that WIZE was the most profitable station in the Great Trails Broadcasting chain.
_	This permitted lending beyond the point that was actually sustainable.
_	At one stage, student enrolments reached 41, but by 1912, enrolments had fallen to the point that the school closed down on 31 August.
_	His most-successful musical hit was" Sanyasi" in 1975 for which he scored all songs and the entire background score based upon SJ's favorite Raag Bhairavi to prove the point that SJ's Bhairavi was as much Shankar's as that of Jaikishan.
_	More than 8,000 cars were sold during the company's first (and best) year of sales, but sales fell off to the point that production was suspended in 1932.
_	After the United States secured a resolution from the United Nations to engage in military defense on behalf of South Korea, whom had been invaded by North Korea in an attempt to unify all of Korea under the communist North Korean regime, President Truman engaged U.S. land, air, and sea forces; United States involvement in the war quickly reversed the direction of military advancement into South Korea to military advancement into North Korea; to the point that North Korean forces were being forced against the border with China, which led to the involvement of hundreds of thousands of communist Chinese troops heavily assaulting U.S. and South Korean forces.
_	In this selection from the majority opinion and throughout the rest of the opinion, Roberts continually makes the point that not all defendants in all cases will need the assistance of counsel in order to receive a fair trial with due process.
_	He feared that German Catholics were being relegated to second-class status in Hitler's Germany and believed Hitler was missing the point that the Catholic Church and the state could be aligned against their common enemy as he saw it, Judeo-Bolshevism.
_	Spector's modifications angered McCartney to the point that when the latter made his case in the British High Court for the Beatles' dissolution, he cited the treatment of "The Long and Winding Road" as one of six reasons for doing so.
_	This series of events makes the President very unpopular with his own administration, to the point that some members conspire to assassinate him.
_	By the early 1960s, techniques for protein sequencing had advanced to the point that direct comparison of homologous amino acid sequences was feasible.
_	In the same year, 1582, Edmund Peckham sued Giles Allen over ownership of the ground on which the Theatre stood, and their dispute escalated to the point that, as Cuthbert Burbage later deposed in 1600, his father was forced to hire men to guard the Theatre both day and night.
_	Since 2011, with the 30% federal tax credit, prices have decreased to the point that they provide an attractive return on investment.
_	"I think for me what happened was that rather than initially saying 'Oh, I want to do an album', it got to the point that after years of just doing one off singles and remixes, I started producing a couple of my own tracks and I just felt I had a bit of a story to tell with my life."
_	While continuing to conduct professional development and publishing Agora the activities of the association expanded to the point that in the early 1990s, under the supervision of Bob Lewis, the publication of teaching resources and education kits constituted nearly half of the association’s income in any one year.
_	In contrast, he referred to the chapter of Joffrey's fatal wedding as "easy and fun to write" but that he nevertheless tried to instill empathy for the painful demise of this very unpopular character and "bring home the point that this, too, was a human being who was scared and terrified and then dead".
_	It was the Illinois Central's first streamlined passenger train and proved popular with the traveling public to the point that demand outstripped the streamliner's fixed capacity.
_	The object of the game is to distribute the cards to the foundations to the point that the top cards of the foundations show the correct numbers on the clock face.
_	The 1997–2007 games saw the Florida Classic revived to the point that it overshadowed the drawing power of the Bayou Classic in New Orleans, between Grambling and Southern University in terms of attendance.
_	The film noir colouring of the picture minimised any commentary on Othello's blackness, to the point that the critic F. R. Leavis wrote that the film made no reference to Othello's colour.
_	This expenditure of fuel reduced its capability to remain in a geostationary orbit; by late 1997 the orbit had changed to the point that the satellite was able to see the South Pole, and an uplink/downlink station was installed at Amundsen–Scott South Pole Station in January 1998; TDRS-1 was an important communication uplink for Antarctic research until 2009.
_	Some artists use raunch to critique the ways in which women's bodies are profoundly commodified and debased in the hip hop genre to the point that there is little mobility for women artists to express their experiences, gain respect, or even describe themselves as sexual beings without being labeled a "video ho".
_	The program has grown in popularity over the years to the point that it presently draws over 20,000 guests each year.
_	Bennett L. Leventhal said he understands concern about comparing autistic children to hostages but thinks the campaigns make the point that these are real diseases that will consume children if untreated.
_	When their strength had grown to the point that they could construct their own lodge building, they contracted with the architectural firm of Stribling and Lum to design the present building, which was completed in 1915.
_	Human Rights Watch and Freedom House have accused Kagame of using strict laws criminalizing "divisionism" (ethnic hatred) and genocide ideology to silence his critics, to the point that Rwanda is a "de facto" one-party state.
_	Melissa Auf der Maur has said that she attempted to "knock-off" "Blues for the Red Sun" for her single "Followed the Waves", to the point that she recruited the band's rhythm section to play on the track and Chris Goss to produce.
_	Blasphemy prosecutions have been rare since the start of the twentieth century, to the point that writers in the early part of the century suggested that the crime had been abrogated through disuse.
_	The popularity of the bike has increased to the point that Trusty has had to turn away people interested in performing.
_	However, while most conventional PCI slots are the 85 mm long 32-bit version, most PCI-X devices use the 130 mm long 64-bit slot, to the point that 64-bit PCI connectors and PCI-X support are seen as synonymous.
_	However, changes in technology, specifically, the development of rifled cannon, had improved weaponry to the point that the fort's brick walls were vulnerable to attacks and thus obsolete.
_	Although the Black Mountain Railway had managed to limp through the Great Depression and World War II, traffic had declined to the point that, by 1951 the railroad's parent, the Clinchfield, had wished itself to cease paying the interest on the original $40,000.00 in notes.
_	As with some modern machines, computer printers made during the S/36 era were very slow, to the point that it was possible for the S/36 or other computers to write data to the printer faster than it can print.
_	"The Daily Telegraph" writer Douglas Murray said the entry only gave "200" more legitimacy, writing, "[It] of course just confirms the point that the South Park boys were making.
_	In the first stunt, Manuel held on the tow rope the longest at 1:01, to the point that the horse tired out first before the line slipped off his hands, thus saving him from certain elimination.
_	Through a series of candid interviews, generous observational footage and a lush, poetic narration, the film makes the point that Indian society, right or wrong, simply does not have a place for these women."
_	Hibbs suggested that certain repair machines might one day be reduced in size to the point that it would, in theory, be possible to (as Feynman put it) "swallow the doctor".
_	Heavy development has narrowed certain stretches of the river to the point that it resembles a large storm drain in some places.
_	The track is a synthesizer-backed anthem, from a feminist point of view, conveying the point that all women really want is to have the same experiences that men can.
_	By injecting a gas (such as nitrogen) into the wellbore at a specific point, the density of the fluid column can be reduced to the point that the reservoir pressure is once again able to lift fluids to the surface.
_	Adopting a literary career, he was inspired by anti-Austrian feeling and devotion to the royal house of Savoy, and in early life his combination of a sympathy for national independence with monarchical sentiments brought him into trouble in both quarters, to the point that Guerrazzi expelled him from Tuscany in 1849 for his praise of Carlo Alberto.
_	As every sortie that Wardog Squadron is a part of somehow turns out to be a victory, the reputation of the squadron increases to the point that their very presence increases the morale of allies while simultaneously terrorizing enemy forces; this, and also in part due to a successful mission executed by Wardog in the northern sea, earns them the nickname "Demons of Razgriz."
_	The mission of the 39th in Louisiana grew to the point that at one time the brigade was responsible for working with local officials in fourteen parishes.
_	Despite the acclaim he received for his performance, Morrison said in 2010 that he felt typecast by the role, to the point that it was "a millstone round my neck".
_	Already José Camón Aznar in his "Spanish Architecture of the 10th Century" ("Arquitectura española del siglo X") considered himself against such an interpretation, after him Isidro Bango Torviso and many others, to the point that the present tendency shows a trend towards the abandoning of "Mozarabic Art" denomination altogether and its substitution by "Repoblación art and architecture to refer to the period, especially in the north of Spain.
_	Throughout the 50s Bibulus continued to attack Pompey in the Senate, blaming him for the fighting between Publius Clodius and Titus Annius Milo in 56 BC, to the point that Pompey was convinced that Bibulus was in league with plotters who were intent on assassinating him.
_	She accepts Miroku's roundabout proposal of marriage in the sixth season, and spends much of the seventh season trying to keep him out of danger, as his Wind Tunnel has grown to the point that it might consume him if he uses it again.
_	Carazo's successor Luis Alberto Monge (1982-1986) switched these policies entirely becoming a trusted allied of Washington in the war against the FSLN to the point that Monge was accused of hawkish behavior by the opposition and even members of his own party like Oscar Arias.
_	In addition to Aschauer’s work, Munnell’s paper supports the point that infrastructure investment improves productivity.
_	Extraordinary number of enrollments in Uganda and Kenya had reached the point that the institution of the Hands of the Cause were noting there were not enough Baha'is to keep up with the work of checking the enrollments.
_	The MPB outbreaks end when the food supply decreases to the point that there is not enough to sustain the population or when climatic conditions become unfavorable for the beetle.
_	The men were asked to stop the tape at the point that they felt the man’s behavior was inappropriate.
_	The work is classified, to the point that Lyons cannot even reveal the full name of D.O.D.O, the secret government agency that he works for.
_	Eyes rolled to the point that the white of the eye is visible often indicates fear or anger.
_	Over the course of the fourth to eighth centuries, local changes in phonology, morphology, syntax and lexicon accumulated to the point that the speech of any locale was noticeably different from another.
_	Between 24 and 28 February 1942 the ship was attacked by Japanese planes and damaged to the point that she had to be scuttled on 2 March of that year.
_	From the point that Lindner moved to Minnesota until he retired from full-time competitive fishing, in the Bassmaster Professional Tournament Tour in 1979, he spent as many as two hundred and fifty days on the water in a single year.
_	By 1835 Forts Richmond (now Battery Weed) and Tompkins had deteriorated to the point that they were declared unfit for use, and the next year the federal government began a decade-long process of purchasing them.
_	Asked about his progress with the series in January 2010, Handler stated that he was "at the point that it's a twinkle in someone else's eye."
_	The use of an ax or hatchet is seen frequently in oral tradition, to the point that the weapon is even named "Arturo" and described as an "inseparable friend".
_	During the interview, she asked pressing questions about the works of Berlusconi's administration, often interrupting the Prime Minister's statements, which annoyed him to the point that he stood up and left the room halfway through the program, thus cutting short the interview.
_	He makes the point that institutions are not valid to blame or say they can cause things.
_	It’s nowhere near as pleasing to the eye as other parts of the game so much so to the point that it looks like you are playing a much older game."
_	By 1749, Haydn had matured physically to the point that he was no longer able to sing high choral parts.
_	When Patrick childishly asserts that he could reveal the men and Omri would be powerless to stop him, Omri drives home the point that the time travelers are not living toys that exist for their amusement, but people just like them.
_	Many, however make the point that the binary example is the exception, and the norm is far more dynamic.
_	They beat him to the point that they almost kill him.
_	The clashes with the previous Patriarch Neophytus II caused many problems in the Church, to the point that Cyril Lucaris, in a letter to the Bishop of Heraclea Dionysius, wrote that ""...
_	Cunningly, the Great King promised a hundred talents of gold for the one that would provide a new Apis, impressing the natives to the point that they passed en masse to his side.
_	Second- Order conditioning helps explain why some people desire money to the point that they hoard it and value it even more than the objects it purchases.
_	The album follows "Blue Lines" structurally, to the point that the font used on the cover of the album is the same, Helvetica Heavy Italic.
_	“We believe both countries should encourage greater interaction at all levels and lift restrictions in this regard, in the interests of relations between Israel and South Africa and the broader interests of peace and stability”, while also making the point that the process of shutting out individuals from the other country had been done by South Africa to Israelis in the past.
_	ACB also brought up the point that a person called D Naik had travelled several times between Mumbai and Goa by air.
_	In the first season, Latka's knowledge of the English language is extremely limited, and almost all of his lines are in his own language, to the point that he speaks his own language to the other characters when they answer him in English.
_	Crew shortages forced the navy to reduce both ships' crews, to the point that they were only capable of providing local defense of the harbor.
_	The 16-year-old Camilla, now a great beauty and known to all as La bella Ardizzina, became the object of his attention: attentions which she resisted, however, to the point that he was first obliged to promise marriage in writing and then actually to marry her.
_	The two butt heads constantly, even to the point that when two of their other group members are killed under mysterious circumstances, Harold accuses Monk of being the killer.
_	As Huizi notes were easily forged the currency became deprecated to the point that a banknote of 200 "wén" couldn't buy a single straw sandal anymore near the end of the dynasty.
_	Over the next four years they developed the concept to the point that the Aquada, the world's first road-legal, high-speed amphibian, was shown to the public in September 2003.
_	Because the king is ignorant of the point that Hieronimo is so obviously trying to get across, he is in turn putting the "demands of foreign policy above those of its citizens".
_	The Observer review headline made the point that, "Pippa Nixon is a compelling presence."
_	The San Miguel earthquake damaged the city considerably, to the point that some rooms and walls of the Royal Palace were destroyed.
_	This injured her to the point that she would not be able to attend the match at Slammiversary.
_	With the English language highly embedded in Philippine society, it was only a matter of time before the language was indigenized to the point that it became differentiated from English varieties found in the United States, United Kingdom, or elsewhere.
_	In 1823, the population of Detroit had increased to the point that the US Congress transferred governance of what was then the Territory of Michigan to the governor and legislative council.
_	In contrast, during the economic crisis between the end of World War I and the implementation of the Nuremberg Laws, Jews were disproportionately likely to be laid off from the labor market, to the point that 1 out of every 4 Jews had been laid off by 1935.
_	Due to the sculpture's potential for controversy, the point that each country's piece was designed by an artist from that country was strongly stressed by the Czech government.
_	In fact, the release of tightening started with the end of the Stalinist era and continued slowly to the point that many previously forbidden literary texts were translated, the same was relevant for Hollywood movies, etc., stores appeared with Western products that had elements of advertisement (advertisement of products was generally unknown and not used in the Eastern Bloc since everything was accessible and the same to all), these new features of the late communist years acknowledged the gradual breaking of the Iron Curtain for the Comcon people.
_	"It leaves intact the current World War I-era Espionage Act provision, 18 U.S.C. 793(e), a law [with] many problems ... and then takes a currently well-drawn law and expands its scope to the point that it covers a lot more than the most reckless of media excesses.
_	The government was close to default and its foreign exchange reserves had dried up to the point that India could barely finance three weeks’ worth of imports.
_	During Wetz's lifetime, his works remained little known outside the circle of his devotees and music-lovers in his home region, to the point that he became nearly unknown after his death.
_	It is accurate to the point that, for instance, the painting in the wardroom of the model exactly replicates the original not only in subject but also in the painting technique (oil on canvas).
_	The Spaniards enslaved many of the native people, overworking and harming them to the point that many had perished within fifty years of European arrival.
_	Conditions deteriorated to the point that Captain Rábago abandoned the post without authorization in June 1768, evacuating the garrison, women, and children to the relative safety of Mission San Lorenzo de la Santa Cruz.
_	They raised questions later adopted by critics of Mann's work, including the point that bristlecone pines from the Western U.S. could have been affected by pollution such as rising levels as well as temperature.
_	Jardine later wrote about the number of times Hobbs and Sutcliffe were hit "all over the body" during their stand and made the point that, if a batsman is to make runs on an Australian sticky wicket, then being hit by the ball is inevitable.
_	By 1963, planning had proceeded to the point that detailed technical proposals, specific arsenals, and cost estimates were made.
_	This is tilted away from the viewer, almost to the point that it is indistinguishable.
_	The result allowed the actors to keep their comedic timing, and kept the studio audience engaged to the point that the show did not have to employ a laugh track.
_	Shortly before the 2010 election, Osborne had pledged to be "tougher than Thatcher" on Britain's budget deficit, and he duly set himself the target of reducing the UK's deficit to the point that, in the financial year 2015–16, total public debt would be falling as a proportion of GDP.
_	Carteret had previously boasted a Jewish community with two synagogues in the 1950s but its Jewish presence had dwindled since then, to the point that it was no longer able to support the remaining synagogue, a Jewish community center, which closed in 2002.
_	Hibbs suggested that certain repair machines might one day be reduced in size to the point that it would, in theory, be possible to (as Feynman put it) "swallow the doctor".
_	The party was rumored to be led by the then outlaw Calderonistas who lost the war, but although most of its members were relatives of Calderonistas they never held offices during Calderon's party government and were allowed to participate, to the point that even the Electoral Court gave them an extension to end the conformation of the party thanks to then president Otilio Ulate intervention.
_	The five Golden State consists were remarkable in the point that they featured at least six unique cars that never were built in more than one example.
_	Kerr, in her book "Colonial Dynasty – the Chambers family of South Australia", makes the point that the two men were physically quite different, both in build and temperament, and John wore a green satin patch over his blind right eye, so would never be confused by contemporaries.
_	Sparta began to decline as a commercial center, to the point that when then Hudson River Railroad was built two decades later, no station was built to serve it.
_	Vonk's neurodegenerative illness had debilitated him to the point that he conducted several NRSO concerts from a wheelchair.
_	"We told our lives by letter and we fell in love, to the point that we decided to get married."
_	Stephen H. Smith has made the point that the structure of Mark is similar to the structure of a Greek tragedy
_	The kick is taken at any point on the field of play in line with the point that the ball was grounded for the try, and parallel to the touch-lines.
_	He stated that this focus on illustrating the difference in values is central to his creation of villains to the point that, "I don't really think about them in combat".
_	By the 1970s, however, the hotel had deteriorated to the point that it was closed in 1982.
_	When the Napoleonic wars broke out, the mandolin went into a rapid decline, to the point that it was rarely seen in Europe outside of Italy.
_	Ireland beat Turkey 3–1 in Istanbul despite the intimidating atmosphere of the İnönü Stadium, but were denied a place in the tournament as England scored a late equalizing goal in Poland to secure the point that would take them above Ireland in the group.
_	Her body was mutilated to the point that only pieces of her hair and uniform could be used for identification, and what remained of her was buried in the Volma mass grave in until the remains were transferred in 1963 to Kalita.
_	PCAS G4 technology has advanced to the point that highly accurate range, relative altitude, and 45 degree direction can be accurately detected in a portable cockpit device.
_	These statements infuriated the Spurs coach to the point that he wrote an open letter to the league stating his desire to coach the team, and led many to speculate that the motivation for Colangelo's decision was that "the Spurs-Suns rivalry precluded Colangelo from truly considering Popovich for the job."
_	In a European study, the fungus was found growing on logs in a state of decay where the wood was mostly hard, with most of the bark left, to wood that had decayed to the point that it was mostly soft throughout.
_	This is one of the most bonding factors in Assyrian tribes and it's interesting that the tribes adjacent to the Nochiyaye; Urmijnaye to the east, Gawarnaye to the north, Jilwaye to the west and Barwarnayeh to the southwest, all have completely different accents, to the point that some are almost unintelligible to the Nochiyaye.
_	The collapse of the services which were supposed to collect and treat the rubbish led to accumulation or garbage in the streets of the major urban centres to the point that schools and other public places had to be closed for some days and tourism declined substantially in 2008.
_	Although he locates the detonation module, a sudden landslide damages his submersible to the point that it is running on emergency power.
_	Industrial nitrogen fixation by the Haber process is mostly used as fertiliser, although excess nitrogen–bearing waste, when leached, leads to eutrophication of freshwater and the creation of marine dead zones, as nitrogen-driven bacterial growth depletes water oxygen to the point that all higher organisms die.
_	Strawson used the term "Statement" to make the point that two declarative sentences can make the same statement if they say the same thing in different ways.
_	In the 90s, the technology progressed to the point that it became possible to include virtual stunt doubles.
_	That there was no memorial to the vast numbers of Jews who had once played an important social, cultural, and economic role in Hungarian society, who had been dragged from their homes and sent to Nazi death camps, shocked her to the point that she felt she could no longer paint abstractions.
_	However, the condition of her vocal cords had deteriorated to the point that medicine was ineffective, and surgery was necessary in order for her to continue her career.
_	At one point, the situation had declined to the point that Saddam ordered several of his officers to be executed.
_	By 1912 the ongoing political conflict in Nicaragua between the liberal and conservative factions had deteriorated to the point that U.S. investments under President Taft's Dollar Diplomacy including substantial loans to the fragile coalition government of conservative President Juan José Estrada were in jeopardy.
_	Although gold mining gradually wound down in Germiston, to the point that by the end of the 20th century it was no longer a mining centre, the Rand Refinery remains as busy as ever.
_	In that capacity however, it has been often criticized, to the point that Ynet uses a photo of the bus stations in Qastina as a stock photo for public transportation critiques.
_	In August, 2001, Puafua was enlisted to headline for "Hemp Car Appreciation Night" which featured a stop by "A Mercedes-Benz diesel converted to run on hemp oil," en route to "Establish[ing] a world distance record for a hemp powered vehicle, and [proving] the point that automobiles need not depend entirely on fossil fuels."
_	By the end of the 1920s, diplomatic relations with western countries were deteriorating to the point that there was growing fear of another allied attack on the Soviet Union.
_	Over the years, the "Koala" portion of Poly High's koala mascot faded to the point that, today, the mascot is referred to as "The Poly Bears".
_	Acting under the direction of William Davenant, Mary did very well, even to the point that she was frequently called Ianthe for the rest of her life.
_	Reports from eye witnesses speak of the town of Hargeisa as mere rubble, devastated to the point that it is barely recognizable even to its inhabitants.
_	Will she has started dating a dentist named Carl Howell, and in the second season her relationship with Carl (John Stamos) blossoms to the point that they get married in Las Vegas in the episode "Special Education".
_	As Shah, Mohammad Reza constantly disparaged his father in private, calling him a thuggish Cossack who achieved nothing as Shah, and most notably the son almost airbrushed his father out of history during his reign, to the point that the impression was given the House of Pahlavi began its rule in 1941 rather than 1925.
_	Once he felt he had written lyrics for enough songs, Eminem would dedicate an entire day to record his songs to the point that he would lose his voice for the following days.
_	Following the Triceratons' arrival he joins the Turtles in a failed assault on the Triceratons' black hole generator, only to have his body damaged to the point that he is forced to abandon it.
_	The widespread misuse of antibiotics has selected for microbial resistance to antibiotics in clinical use, to the point that the methicillin-resistant "Staphylococcus aureus" (MRSA) has been described as a "superbug" because of the threat it poses to health and its relative invulnerability to existing drugs.
_	Rawling's tenure as captain, Julien became more outspoken and disapproved of her seizure policy to the point that he was going to transfer out of the department, but when the policy was shut down and Rawling was dismissed, Julien decided to remain.
_	These signs rapidly multiplied, leaving him weakened and constantly in severe pain, and within a couple of weeks he had deteriorated to the point that he was being pulled on the sledge by Lashly and Crean.
_	Some compounds such as 2C-B and 5-Meo-DiPT did eventually increase in popularity to the point that they were sold in pill form to reach a wider market, and acquired popular street names ("Nexus" and "Foxy," respectively).
_	NJPW was reportedly "furious" over Low Ki wrestling a title match in a suit without clearing it with them first to the point that even years later, the company was said to be open to bringing anyone back "with the exception of Low Ki".
_	From July to September 1968, student movements started to arise and become stronger, to the point that the government began aggressively intervening.
_	The king responded sympathetically, and using all his charm impressed the women to the point that one of them fainted at his feet.
_	As the day progressed, emotions soared to the point that Zita and Vevherly hugged each other (as Zita thought she would be the next to be voted out); the others shared their sympathy as Emerson expressed his amazement at the "Survivor" concept.
_	When Finn tries to use them, his strength is enhanced to the point that even moving his hands generates more momentum than he can resist, causing him to flail about randomly in an attempt to stop himself.
_	Superkarts but numbers have dwindled in recent times to the point that 80cc class has been folded into 125cc class at national level and today only survives in limited numbers at state level.
_	This runaway reaction quickly climbs to about 100 billion times the star's normal energy production (for a few seconds) until the temperature increases to the point that thermal pressure again becomes dominant, eliminating the degeneracy.
_	Gypsy's powers have evolved to the point that she can now cloak not only herself, but a moving vehicle and its passengers.
_	Most of these areas were eventually considered part of the larger Timucua Province, in some cases because native populations had declined to the point that they could no longer support multiple missions.
_	Kadono was unhappy with the changes that made between the book and film, to the point that the project was in danger of being shelved at the screenplay stage.
_	Some wrestling promotions have officially-designated Openweight Championships (IWGP U-30 Openweight Championship, Global Honored Crown Unlimited Championship, NEVER Openweight Championship), while other promotions ignore weight classes to the point that most, if not all of their championships are effectively openweight.
_	It was commonly found in the trenches, to the point that a circular from the Minister of War of 6 August 1917 (countersigned by Philippe Pétain) prohibited its exhibition.
_	The "Bangkok Post" has made the point that, although the city suffers from the "worst traffic congestion in the world after Mexico City", 37 disparate agencies are responsible for traffic management, planning, and infrastructure.
_	Such insubordination – they threw earth on their heads to honor Kassi while throwing earth on their hands to insult Bendjou – soon angered Suleyman and his new wife, to the point that Kassi was forced to seek sanctuary in the mosque.
_	In the early twentieth century, the remains of Manga de Clavo gave birth to the town of Vargas which grew irregularly around the hacienda, appropriating stone and obliterating signs of its true trace, thus the mansion and adjacent outbuildings were gradually destroyed to the point that only ruins could be found at ground level, virtually ceasing to exist.
_	Jacau de Fiedmont's journal, The Siege of Beauséjour in 1755: A Journal of the Attack on Beauséjour, puts emphasis on the point that if the fortifications would have been completed by the beginning of the siege, the Fort would have had higher resistance against bombardment which would have increased the morale of the French and Acadian defenders.
_	Portraying the NRI youngster Santhosh, Siddharth revealed he worked hard to depict his character as "hyperactive, and unpredictable, to the point that the audience does not know what to expect from him" in order to differentiate the role from other NRI depictions in Indian films.
_	Albright suggested another site, Tell 'Areini (now close to the city of Kiryat Gat) which, despite some opposition, was accepted to the point that the Israel Government Names Committee renamed it as Tel Gat in 1953.
_	When he accepted this post, he infuriated the emperor to the point that he immediately outlawed him again.
_	By the end of the war, the number of wealthy visitors to the Riviera had dropped off to the point that the hotel was in severe financial difficulty.
_	The connection between Akihabara and otaku has survived and grown to the point that the region is now known worldwide as a center for otaku culture, and some otaku even consider Akihabara to be a sacred place.
_	In 1879, eastern Colorado had grown to the point that Lusk, along with his partners began exploring options outside of the area.
_	Snyder described his emotional injuries, including becoming tearful, angry, and physically nauseated to the point that he would vomit.
_	Berger argues that Chabad messianism goes beyond traditional halakhic boundaries of Orthodox Judaism to the point that Orthodox Jews should not participate in prayer quorums with Chabad Jews.
_	A 5 rating would normally be assigned to credit unions that are unprofitable to the point that capital will be depleted within twelve months.
_	In looking solely at the Jamaican economy, the most developed in the British West Indies by 1930, Mandle shows that plantation economics still dominated to the point that per capita output was only slightly higher than when slavery was still the dominant means of labour in the early 19th century.
_	The church attendance eventually grew to the point that six worship services plus a youth service were not enough to accommodate the people or meet their needs.
_	Although the ISO 4217 was altered the relevant legislation made the point that the official name of the currency is still the złoty.
_	"Coda alla vaccinara" was originally the specialty of the "vaccinari" 'butchers' of the Rione Regola in Rome, to the point that the inhabitants of that rione were nicknamed "mangiacode" 'tail-eaters'.
_	Russian has a wide variety of diminutive forms for names, to the point that for non-Russian speakers it can be difficult to connect a nickname to the original.
_	Unfortunately, arguments of environmental change since the 8th and 9th century decline of Lowland Maya societies have been convincing and have been used to undermine the experimental approach to archaeology to the point that it is now rarely practiced.
_	Increasing tourist numbers have been depleting wood supplies to the point that native fauna could be affected.
_	He did, indeed, adopt Kant's view of the aesthetic Judgment as singular ("individual"); though he secures a certain degree of logical universality for it by emphasizing the point that the predicate (beauty) is permanently true of the same aesthetic object.
_	Throughout the series, Spengler would have his soul switched with that of a demon, have his molecular structure destabilized to the point that it stranded him in the Netherworld (requiring him to be rescued by the others), experience a curse-induced age regression that nearly destroyed him, turn into a were-chicken, and have his intellect switched with Slimer's.
_	Uhmm, the people, uhmm, in this school, some of them were sympathetic to what I was doing but not sympathetic to the point that they would join me.
_	As a result of Timo Glock's penalty from the for illegally passing Webber under yellow flags in the final lap(s) of the race, Webber was awarded 8th place and the point that came with it.
_	Thanks to his passionate play and high professionalism, he has become a fan favourite – to the point that when Olympiakos had a streak of bad games, Mellberg was always the only player who was spared from criticism – and one of the most highly respected players in Greece.
_	When the acid is concentrated enough, and because concentrated nitric acid is an oxidizing agent, the potential of the metal is raised to the point that a layer of metastable FeO forms on the surface and protects it from further corrosion, even though the pH is so low that stable FeO cannot exist.
_	Hap Emms bought the Black Hawks in 1972 and for the next four years attendance declined to the point that Emms refused to suffer any more losses and moved the club to Niagara Falls in 1976, rejuvenating the name of the previous Niagara Falls Flyers team which Emms had also owned.
_	However, as an airline expands operations at its primary hub to the point that it experiences capacity limitations, it may elect to open secondary hubs.
_	ContentGuard ceased work on XrML at the point that it became adopted as an official standard; ISO/IEC 21000-5 is its current manifestation.
_	"Dorsetensia" is similar in general form to the genus "Witchellia", to the point that it had been regarded as a subgenus of the latter or as subgenera of "Soninnia" along with "Witchellia".
_	However, the great disparity in social rank caused a rift between Archduke John and his family, to the point that the couple was refused entry to court.
_	Faye Valentine, one of the main characters in Cowboy Bebop is actually around 77 years old, though only appears to be no more than 23 years old due to having been put into cryogenic freeze after a space shuttle accident, wherein she spent fifty-four years in cryogenic suspension and who upon awakening from her cryogenic suspension has to contend with her massive amount of debt that she had no means to pay, but she was also diagnosed with total amnesia, a stranger in a mysterious world that she was not a part of and did not understand, surrounded by people who claimed to be helping her but were only there to take advantage of her naiveté, to the point that even her surname "Valentine" was merely a name given to her by the doctor leaving the circumstances of her accident, her previous life, and even her real name all remain a mystery, and are only gradually revealed as the series progresses.
_	The festival maintained the viewing figures of the previous year with 200 million viewers and México was, again, thanks to its national final was the country where the number of viewers was higher, to the point that Acapulco, the host city and the whole country paralysed due to the enormous interest the public showed.
_	In the presence of per-asset investment fees, there is also the possibility of overdiversifying to the point that the portfolio's performance will suffer because the fees outweigh the gains from diversification.
_	These "" of pig would become especially sought, to the point that the ancients considered this meat the most nourishing of all and the easiest to digest.
_	His reputation at his death had matured to the point that it was said after his passing, "Mr. McLean was a truly noble specimen of a Boston Merchant."
_	Some species are common while others are rare to the point that only one or two members have been seen on the show, most of these rare creatures aren't listed here.
_	However, over the years, the song came to be used and/or referenced innumerable times by the entertainment industry, to the point that it became something of a musical, pop culture cliché.
_	It became usual that one of these cognomen was inherited, but as the praenomen and nomen became more rigidly used and less useful for identifying individuals, additional personal cognomen were more often used, to the point that the first the praenomen and then the nomen fell out of use entirely.
_	After being persuaded by the other Korean student for help, Yoon used his Chuan Fa to skillfully deflect and evade the karate students’ strikes and kicks to the point that they gave up and ran back to tell their teacher what had happened.
_	Sketoe was tall, and his weight bent the limb to the point that his feet touched the ground.
_	Shuanpang's wish is to increase his power to the point that he can change his shape at will and finally be able to have a woman's body to match his spirit.
_	But by using a model that contains hundreds and thousands of branches, a user can create close to infinite structured variations almost to the point that such systems can rival the unstructured drafting of a specialist.
_	With the end of the dictatorship in 1977 and the passing of a new constitution in 1978, Galicianism was further strengthened up to the point that today the vast majority of political forces in Galicia call themselves Galicianist, whether they are nationalist or not, left wing or right wing.
_	Their return resulted in mass death that escalated to the point that the district found itself in revenge killings that has divided this it today.
_	Tax reforms were passed, to the point that for instance in the canton of Lucerne the overall taxation of the population decreased in the second half of the 17th century.
_	This event, like other similar happenings demonstrated the point that "as humans we tend to dissociate animals from the whole process of killing".
_	A crossbred horse is sometimes called a "grade" horse, but this usage is not entirely correct: crossbreds with known ancestry and a pedigree on both sides are often quite valuable for their mix of breed characteristics—some to the point that a new breed registry is created for them, and the "crossbred" eventually becomes a separate, new breed with true-breeding characteristics.
_	Technology had advanced to the point that pottery was becoming common, and the small-scale felling of trees became feasible.
_	Some observers predict that the English variant of Yeshivish may develop further to the point that it could become one of the historical Judeo-hybrid languages like Yiddish, Ladino or Judeo-Arabic.
_	Fundraising for the church was only completed by the Rev. Perkin's successor, Rev. Peter Thomas Ouvry; and its completion in 1849 marks the point that the New Town had become Linslade.
_	Somerville makes the point that not all those who discussed sovereignty in England at this period necessarily took their views from Bodin: the ideas were in the air at the time, and some such as Hadrian à Saravia and Christopher Lever had their own reasoning to similar conclusions.
_	Starosta cites his main hobby as playing golf and also enjoys singing to the point that his Miedź teammates suggested he enter the Polish version of "Must Be The Music".
_	Gladwell also noted that SUV popularity is also a sign that people began to shift automobile safety focus from active to passive, to the point that in the US potential SUV buyers will give up an extra of braking distance because they believe they are helpless to avoid a tractor-trailer hit on any vehicle.
_	Intellectual interest turned to events abroad and interest in "PR" faltered to the point that effective with its
_	Deforestation has ravaged the country to the point that very little primary forest remains.
_	Many local ordinances prohibiting disturbance of the peace exhibit a problematic degree of vagueness, occasionally to the point that courts deem them unconstitutional (in United States law) or violative of due process (in both United States and Commonwealth jurisdictions).
_	Also, during this same period, a number of slaves in the colony was growing exponentially to the point that blacks outnumbered whites.
_	He makes the point that they are still invading people's homelands and killing them today just as they did to the Native Americans in the past.
_	The popularity of this track was widespread, to the point that has been viewed by over a million users in YouTube.
_	In addition it also made the point that the Beatles were a live band as, at that time, they opened their set with this song.
_	Co-creator Steve Englehart recounted, "I’ve always treated the entire run of a book, up to the point that I took it over, as worthy of respect.
_	Although Tom does not finish his sentence, the prosecutor (William Windom) hammers home the point that he was a black man feeling sorry for a white woman.
_	The tradition that the number is 613 began in the 3rd century CE, when Rabbi Simlai claimed it in a sermon, apparently to make the point that a person should observe the Torah every day with his whole body.
_	They only agreed on the point that "Vestiges" was unscientific, and the publication of their letters was considered bad manners as well as tactically unwise.
_	Some people hold that, while it cannot be proven that anything independent of one's mind exists, the point that solipsism makes is irrelevant.
_	At times, this meant leaving valuable bloodstock in Egypt under the care of inept managers who neglected the horses to the point that some died of exposure and thirst.
_	The original core of the town of Gibraltar occupies the lower north-west side of the Rock, adjoining the Bay of Gibraltar, though it has grown considerably to the point that the built-up area now stretches all the way to Europa Point on the southern tip of the peninsula.
_	The Negrito population shrank to the point that, up to 100 years ago, only one small group lived near the Saisiyat tribe.
_	The popularity of Islamist parties has declined to the point that "the Islamist candidate, Abdallah Jaballah, came a distant third with 5% of the vote" in the 2004 presidential election.
_	At the plants, geothermal drilling reduced the available heat and lowered the local water table to the point that geyser activity could no longer be sustained.
_	A wrestler can also win by knockout if he does not resort to submission holds, but stills pummels his opponent to the point that he is completely out cold.
_	Despite being a pet project personally overseen by 20th Century Fox Studios' president Darryl F. Zanuck (who greatly admired Woodrow Wilson), its failure at the box office upset him to the point that for years he forbade his employees from mentioning the film in his presence.
_	It is demonstrated that increasing the size of the conducting surface forms bigger induced vortices to the point that geometry does not limits this grows.
_	The Dokeeta Golems are stronger versions of ordinary Golems, their regeneration abilities are advanced to the point that they each can split into two new Dokeeta Golems from the scattered remains.
_	Rostow does make the point that it is possible with the large baby boom it could either cause economic issues or dictate an even larger diffusion of consumer goods.
_	It is the point that must penetrate fish flesh and secure the fish.
_	This formulation highlights the point that estimation can be carried out if, and only if, there is no perfect multicollinearity between the explanatory variables (which would cause the normal matrix to have no inverse).
_	Brian's death left Dexter in great pain, to the point that he began making mistakes in his killing rituals.
_	Stillwell keeps calm in front of the insane superhuman, to the point that the Homelander declares he may have finally met a real superhuman.
_	Though later stories confirm that at least some aspects of the storyarc are true such as the Vatican suffering a great attack, Ignatus existence directly contradicts many earlier stories which feature or mention many real world Popes to the point that those stories are rendered untenable.
_	the point that there was no sense of having a body and the breath disappeared more and
_	"The pain of life overrides joy to the point that joy no longer exists."
_	In many districts Taiwanese aborigines tend to vote for the Kuomintang, to the point that the legislative seats allocated to the aborigines are popularly described as "iron votes" for the pan-blue coalition.
_	Elsewhere Biblical texts reinforce the point that Jesus was to be dead for three days and three nights, including in Mark 8:31, where it is written that the Son of Man "must be killed and after three days rise again."
_	Tensions between the band and the Hudson's chain escalated to the point that the department stores refused to carry any album from the Elektra label after MC5 took out a full-page ad that, according to Danny Fields, "was just a picture of Rob Tyner, and all it said was 'Fuck Hudson's.'
_	The novels of Karim have that capacity to give his readers a sort of cathartic feeling – and everyone will agree with the point that before his novels we did not meet such modern individuals in Bengali fiction.
_	On more than one occasion, male guardsmen would make the point that the USCG had struggled along without women for over 150 years.
_	The fragile nature of waffles also made the point that it was a dine-in, not a carry-out, restaurant, but it confused patrons as to meal availability other than breakfast.
_	The engine used a gear-driven counterbalancer to reduce vibration to the point that the engine could be solidly mounted to the frame, for the purpose of increasing chassis rigidity.
_	Decomposed granite is classification of rock that is derived from granite via its weathering to the point that the parent material readily fractures into smaller pieces of weaker rock.
_	This can mean the omission of details, or the simplification of shapes and color shades, even to the point that the image is nothing more than a pictogram.
_	This was even taken to the point that everything he experienced was considered a reflection of what was happening to his personal god.
_	According to coach Steve Mariucci, Phillips had actually begun losing interest early in the season, to the point that he was finding "reasons and ways why he shouldn't practice."
_	He likes to have a small crew, to the point that, when I walked on the set, my thought was, 'My God, this is it?'"
_	By the High Middle Ages, the title "count" had become increasingly common, to the point that both great magnates who ruled regions that were the size of duchies, and local castle-lords, might style themselves "count".
_	Although this could be seen as a mere tool of self-promotion, it also makes the point that the Indian culture Anand comes from is just as important as British culture.
_	As the series progressed, however, his voice became worse and worse, eventually to the point that a temporary maid the Flintstones hired quit rather than having to hear Fred sing.
_	Brannan's company then buried August with lawsuits to the point that he gladly received a mere $3,500 after which August still found himself in debt just over $300.
_	Anthracite mining was especially prevalent in the watershed in the 19th and 20th centuries, to the point that numerous streams were altered or destroyed and the Laurel Run mine fire started.
_	Tarak stressed the point that Turkey entered the war not only to defend her own country and to maintain her liberty, but also to put new life into 300 million Muslims, and to establish the Afghan state on a firmer basis, one that would act as a link with 350 million Indians, both Hindus and Muslims, as its supporters and helpers.
_	He'll go to the point that not many blokes will, he will never give up."
_	By 8,000 years ago, it had drained and evaporated to the point that only small remnants were left, such as Athabasca, Great Bear and Great Slave Lakes.
_	Cheap word play is particularly frequent, to the point that the second game's ending refers to itself as the hero's "latest set of adventures and miserable puns."
_	By the 1890s, the membership of St. Henry's Church had grown to the point that a new church building was necessary.
_	To make the point that monarchy is not a viable form of government, they chose to write about a working-class hero, and incorporated the theme of "power corrupts".
_	Under Denis Sassou Nguesso, the M-22 was partially rehabilitated and regained influence beginning in 1980, to the point that some M-22 figures were considered part of "the backbone" of the PCT regime.
_	Although it is no replacement for Seven in his affections, Zero means a lot to Katana to the point that its being damaged depresses him.
_	Donkin and Ray believe that the Muslims gained influence over the Paravars to the point that the latter became at best hired labour and at worst enslaved, and Neill has claimed that there was a belief among Paravars that the Muslims sought completely to exterminate them following various squabbles.
_	His relatively short career was described by AllMusic as "enormously influential" for country and rock, "blending the two genres to the point that they became indistinguishable from each other."
_	In their examination of beloved but unrecognized characters, "Games Radar" observed, "The mask basically becomes his face, to the point that almost all the game's promotional material features it.
_	The second Romana enjoys a more intimate relationship with the Doctor than her previous incarnation, to the point that some fans have assumed a romantic relationship with the Doctor.
_	Smith, who recorded his parts in England, took a significant amount of time recording the song, to the point that the band was unsure of whether or not his contribution would make the record.
_	It was in 1944 that she entered Opus Dei after having met and corresponded with Saint Josemaría Escrivá and she became an active member to the point that she began to help Escrivá in the prelature's governance after having worked in Mexico for the prelature.
_	Eventually Soviet assistance progressed to the point that a joint Sino-Soviet Pacific Ocean fleet was under discussion.
_	PES may decrease in utility as 1) wealth becomes concentrated to the point that natural resource scarcity results in higher short-term value for unsustainable resource extraction, and 2) the long-term cost to engineer limited-range replacement services is externalized onto citizens.
_	While Australian images of Australia were overwhelmingly negative during this period, Walker makes the point that some Australians including Prime Minister Alfred Deakin saw much to admire in Asian cultures.
_	He was impressed by what he saw to the point that he offered to pay Richardson's university tuition.
_	But as a result of being forced to keep his host alive, Jado is weakening to the point that he would eventually die.
_	Its 400 members have actively opposed some recent projects that they believed would adversely affect the district, to the point that some critics have referred to the group as Friends of Hysteric Kingston or Enemies of Development.
_	By the late 1970s, the number of opera companies in the country had vastly increased, to the point that the Metropolitan Opera Guild tried to conduct a sort of census.
_	She then says that Zuru still talks about Killy, to the point that he sounds like the last hope for humanity.
_	She represents in more exaggerated form the unnamed white middle-class heterosexual qualities (read privilege) of the other characters (to the point that it becomes visible)."
_	The park got to the point that it faced one of two options: reinvent itself or close.
_	She begins sharing mostly the same moveset with Nina, but has developed her own moveset overtime to the point that as of "Tekken 5", she only shares several moves with Nina and even then they have different properties.
_	Agrias appears, on some level, to find Ronnie's appearance repulsive, and as such, the comics do not explore any real romantic possibility between the pair (to the point that Agrias assumed Ronnie was gay), although she is ultimately concerned for Ronnie's health and well-being.
_	Recovering to the point that he can move at night, Nighthawk continues to aid the Defenders, until resigning from the team.
_	In later decades, the cost of digital electronics declined to the point that an individual codec per voice channel became commonplace, but by then the other advantages of digital transmission had become entrenched.
_	By 1978 it had declined to the point that it was condemned by the State Fire Marshall.
_	This is the essence of expertise, Dreyfus argued: when our intuitions have been trained to the point that we forget the rules and simply "size up the situation" and react.
_	However, this criticism is rejected by supporters of the social constructivist perspective because it misses the point that the very objects of mathematics are social constructs.
_	The mouse begs forgiveness and makes the point that such unworthy prey would bring the lion no honour.
_	Some of the show's earlier episodes were rough to the point that Kricfalusi felt the need to patch up the animation with sound effects and "music bandaids", helping the segments "play better, even though much of the animation and timing weren't working on their own."
_	The departure of Tallulah and arrival of Tabatha also caused a role reversal in regards to T-shirt, as he became more competent and level-headed against her silliness and tendency to rush into situations (to the point that, in "Pearls of Wisdom" he was able to successfully deliver one of the titular pearls to T-Bag on two separate occasions only for her to immediately lose it both times - not that it stopped her inevitably blaming him for her failure).
_	Though what degree of force constitutes abusive use of the spur may vary between horsemen, spurs should not be used to the point that they draw blood.
_	He was also known for his spookiness, however, to the point that crowds hushed themselves when he was performing.
_	These traders had been visiting the area for several hundred years but their activities increased to the point that a third Nair kingdom, based on the port of Calicut, became established.
_	She makes the point that "these alternative modes of knowing, which are oriented to the social benefits and sustenance needs are not recognized by the capitalist reductionist paradigm, because it fails to perceive the interconnectedness of nature, or the connection of women's lives, work and knowledge with the creation of wealth (23)".
_	McGrady's intention was to write a book that was both deliberately terrible and contained a lot of descriptions of sex, to illustrate the point that popular American literary culture had become mindlessly vulgar.
_	Han had a great influence on the spread of Baji in southern China, to the point that there was a saying ‘bei li nan han’ meaning ‘Li [Shuwen] in the north and Han [Huachen] in the south’.
_	Another "Fleshbot" author approved of the "fabulously perverse" film because it "gets the gays to try something new" and described the film's plot of gay men having sex with woman as "perverse hotness", making the point that gay men "chuckle every time we see the pendulum swinging the other way" if straight men try homosexual sex, so there is nothing wrong with gay men trying heterosexual sex.
_	The Itawes river overflowed to the point that the water reached the cliff where the Ermita was built and the surrounding area, flooding the area and reaching several feet in height.
_	After a while the chancellor was tired to the point that he could no longer crawl or move.
_	Norma is known throughout her hometown of Fort de Kock (now Bukittinggi) for her beauty, to the point that she is known as the "Jasmine of Agam".
_	She argues that the episode makes the point that a "perfectly normal" black man looks a certain way, pointing out that the episode states that a black man is defined by a "certain skin pigment".
_	In 1947 he cofounded with his twin brother Carlos a small printing business, called Ponce de León Bros., that would become in time one of the most important companies in its trade, to the point that in 1997 was distinguished by the Chamber of Commerce of Bogotá with a special award for its quality and entrepreneurial efficiency.
_	I had admitted that the prospect of the papacy had daunted him to the point that other cardinals had to encourage him to accept it.
_	Johnson's defense focused on the point that his removal of Stanton fell within the bounds of the Tenure of Office Act.
_	Relations between Paris and N'Djamena diminished, to the point that the French decided to remain neutral in the conflict that started in April 1989 between the President and his former general Idriss Déby.
_	The anime rapidly outpaced the manga, to the point that the chapters comprising volume 4 (which included content corresponding to TV episode 8) were not released until over a year after the TV series had finished airing.
_	In 1960, the art historian Kenneth Clark made the point that the success of the composition is a result first and foremost of the accurate handling of light and shade:
_	He is reportedly better known in Niue than his internationally more famous namesake, to the point that, when news of singer Michael Jackson's death reached Niue in July 2009, "most residents of the remote coral atoll (sic) thought that it was him (sic) who had died".
_	Tom Russo said in his review for Entertainment Weekly that "the authors, former military men, convincingly relay troop maneuvering—to the point that it frequently smothers the action."
_	At the time of his sudden death after 34 years at the helm of "Analog," Campbell's quirky personality and eccentric editorial demands had alienated a number of his most illustrious writers to the point that they no longer submitted works to him.
_	Gio that one of them was for Henry's care package, but then she starts acting more weirder around Gio to the point that she passionately hugs him, which seems to please Gio.
_	By the end of the month the 140th was depleted to the point that it went into Belorussian Front reserves for rebuilding.
_	By 1936, in the midst of the Great Depression, Manoogian had expanded Masco to the point that it was listed on the New York Stock Exchange (NYSE).
_	When the Second Battle of Fondor commences, Caedus's forces easily overwhelm the rebels to the point that the latter group surrenders.
_	I was hammering the point that I could embarrass the fuck out of them if they didn’t listen to me and that this was not a democracy, this was a police state."
_	An unfortunate side effect of the experimentation is that this power can grow exponentially to the point that Red Star unwillingly releases it in a destructive chain reaction, the force of which destroyed his hometown.
_	The only exceptions to this rule are Bradshaw/JBL because the character changed quite drastically storyline-wise (to the point that he doesn't even acknowledge his former gimmick).
_	A deacon in the Presbyterian Church of Wales at Capel-y-Garn in Pen-y-garn, he was making the point that God did not need the protection of the law.
_	Starfire, distraught by Silkie's loss, annoys Raven to the point that they teleport to his cocoon to see Silkie with his original owner; they soon find that Killer Moth plots to mutate Silkie into a monstrous creature, but the process fails when Silkie emerges from the chemical stew "even cuter" in a gigantic size.
_	Sales of the beverage continued in Trinidad and Tobago to the point that "Trinidadians and Tobagonians now see the drink as a defining part of the culture of their twin-island republic."
_	This enabled him to be well-educated to the point that he even knew English.
_	She found shooting the picture an "intense" experience, which traumatised her to the point that she was often in tears after scenes were cut.
_	According to Foner, Twain used the conduct of Ament to "drive home the point that the missionary movement served as a front for imperialism.
_	A minor hit for Joan Baez (whom Ochs jokingly credits with its authoring), this song encourages people to count themselves as fortunate, as fate takes its toll on those with broken lives who might have turned out differently under other circumstances, and makes the point that negative things can happen to anyone.
_	In French, however (as in Friulian and in some Gallo-Italian languages of northern Italy), verbal agreement marking has degraded to the point that subject pronouns have become mandatory, and have turned into clitics.
_	Polk and his supporters intimidated McCulloh's land officers and surveyors to the point that McCulloh allowed the rights to a portion of his lands to revert to the Crown by 1767.
_	The interchange is the point that the M4 enters Greater London.
_	Listeners heavily and openly criticized the band and band members in online message boards and via email, causing the members personal insult to the point that they disbanded.
_	The title functions as a trick: to tempt and enable a reader to simultaneously hear the point that is made by "Goodbye" in each of the two songs (two incompatible points), while watching Neil ambivalently and uncomfortably tip back and forth between the two of them, and to simultaneously feel those attitudes and Roth's attitudes toward them, in order to see, among other things, the incompleteness and distortedness of each of the three goodbye-sayers' view of what he is saying goodbye to.
_	Star Athletica had conceded this because it was an abstract painting, not a design for a dress, but the United States made the point that the painting would cover the entire dress surface—no different than the Varsity designs.
_	Her husband had reduced them to much poorness to the point that he had stolen a considerable sum from his father who found out and suffered an apoplectic stroke - he was cured due to Mora turning to God for His divine intercession.
_	Use of the building for religious purposes had declined by the early 20th century to the point that it was deeded to the town, apparently with the stipulation that its exterior remain unaltered.
_	Anne Lancashire describes "Attack of the Clones" as "thoroughly political in its narrative", to the point that interpersonal relations are made subordinate to the political drama that unfolds, and "a critique of the increasing role played by economic and political appetite in contemporary First World international politics in general".
_	The events angered his brother Tobias to the point that he ended up returning to the service of Frederick and was placed in charge of his campaigns to try to reconquer his lost lands after the death of Matthias in 1490.
_	Serena van der Woodsen (Blake Lively) spends the summer attempting to move on from her previous relationship with Dan Humphrey (Penn Badgley), who himself also has trouble moving on to the point that it has affected his internship with a famous author.
_	Growth continued to the point that it was necessary to expand from the old tire warehouse to a facility by September 2012.
_	Klitschko's eye injury had healed to the point that he had been cleared to face Lewis and a tentative date of December 6 was set for the rematch.
_	Admiral Anton Haus was fearful that direct confrontation with the French Navy, even if it should be successful, would weaken the Austro-Hungarian Navy to the point that Italy would have a free hand in the Adriatic.
_	After that, the SWack Church was mostly forgotten for over half a century, to the point that by 2010, the pastor of the Spruce Run Church did not even know its location.
_	Twining also mentions a relief plaque in the cathedral which appears to represent the coronation of Otto IV at Monza in 1209 as it was described by Morigias in 1345 and stresses the point that although four votive crowns are shown hanging above the altar, the crown which the archbishop is placing on the king's head bears no resemblance to the Iron Crown.
_	During the making of HIM's 2007 album "Venus Doom", Valo's alcohol abuse worsened to the point that he was vomiting and defecating blood.
_	The Parthenon is especially exposed and many of the remaining marbles are eroding to the point that they may no longer be identifiable.
_	This infuriates him to the point that he plans on killing Osborn.
_	Hull's league form was steadily deteriorating to the point that relegation to the Football Conference was looking a real possibility.
_	These balloons are launched into what is termed "near space" - defined as the area of Earth's atmosphere between the Armstrong Limit where pressure falls to the point that a human being could not survive without a pressurised suit, and the Kármán Line where aeronautics must take over from aerodynamics in order to maintain flight.
_	They soon fight and bicker among themselves to win his devotion, to the point that he is about to flee, but then a voice calls out, ""Parsifal!""
_	Over the course of the manga she gradually gets over her anemia to the point that in the latter parts it has left her.
_	Eric managed to free himself from his shackle in "Saw III", mere minutes after having been locked away, by smashing and breaking his foot to the point that it could slip through.
_	The Pakistan government on its side is careful to stress the point that, although the assassin is stated to be of Afghan origin, there is no sinister significance in that fact, especially as he has been an exile in Pakistan for some time.
_	Mayall's eyesight later deteriorated to the point that he could no longer read.
_	The king has full confidence in the Muslims and relies on them to handle many of his affairs, including the most important ones, to the point that the Great Intendant for cooking is a Muslim (...)
_	Despite the bridge being an election issue, the Port Authority continued developing the project, progressing to the point that contracts were signed with major participants (including companies operating from the airport).
_	In the beginning, Tawni was openly jealous of Sonny to the point that she committed mail fraud by stealing all of Sonny's fan mail, but later grew more accepting of her as a member of the show.
_	The scientific consensus is that any weight loss reported by individuals on an "HCG diet" may be attributed entirely to the fact that such diets prescribe calorie intake of between 500 and 1,000 calories per day, substantially below recommended levels for an adult, to the point that this may risk health effects associated with malnutrition.
_	Following the Grateful Dead's "Europe '72" tour, Pigpen's health had deteriorated to the point that he could no longer tour with the band.
_	This number has been steadily decreasing, to the point that Benson's elementary school has changed its moniker from the "Benson Tungsten Miners" to the "Benson Golden Eagles" in honor of Golden Eagles, which are sparingly found in the area.
_	Months later, he recovers to the point that he opens his eyes, and is transported to his and Valerie's house to recover properly.
_	Emission lines of hydrogen (the Balmer series) and helium are observed, and are not doubled (as one would expect by Doppler shift of light emitted from the edges of a fast-rotating disc), but the wings are broadened to the point that the spread of source velocities can be as much as 4000 km/s.
_	He eventually bought stock in the company to the point that he became one of their chief stockholders and became involved in the management of the company.
_	Lisa Leslie also struggled with the cargo net obstacle to the point that she became disoriented and reversed her direction, exiting the obstacle in the wrong direction and almost racing towards an obstacle she had already completed.
_	The wings of the queens are reduced to the point that they are not functional (they are brachypterous).
_	Bowman explained that Maddie is a "bully and a bitch" and "just cares about herself" to the point that even when it comes down to saving lives Maddie "could have helped a mate, she doesn't she saves herself, so I think by the time the door comes the audience is like yes, you deserve that".
_	Kennit was often beaten and sexually assaulted by Igrot, to the point that he "died" twice from the injuries Igrot gave him, and had to be restored by Paragon.
_	By 1957 the company had advanced technologically to the point that all its models were using Komatsu engines.
_	The possibility that pointed out by Coleman and E.Weinberg is, even at the classical level one tunes the mass of the scalar field to be zero, quantum correction is able to modify the effective potential, turning the point that enjoys the whole symmetry of the theory from a local minima to a maxima, and generate new minima(vacuum) at configurations with less symmetry.
_	Then, he started harassing Mama Nonie with threatening phone calls, to the point that she decided to get rid of her phone and thus couldn't call an ambulance when she suffered a heart attack.
_	Corridor A-1 uses US 19/SR 400 from the point that Corridor A leaves it, at SR 141 near Cumming, northeast to SR 53 near Bright.
_	Writer Alberto Palcos considers that the book contains highly immoral vocabulary and attacks on Rosas, to the point that it maintains a false allegation of child sexual abuse by Rosas of his daughter.
_	Although his proposal and similar ones by others went down to defeat, Governor Boggs himself saw his once-promising political career destroyed to the point that, by the next election, his own party was reluctant to be associated with him.
_	Hibbs suggested that certain repair machines might one day be reduced in size to the point that it would, in theory, be possible to (as Feynman put it) "swallow the doctor".
_	It is made with eggs, milk, sugar, vanilla, and cinnamon, and baked in the oven where it is broiled to the point that a burnt layer is produced.
_	Conversely, institutional memory may be ingrained to the point that it becomes hard to challenge if something is found to contradict that which was previously thought to have been correct.
_	The presence of a small British naval squadron in the region rendered this plan impractical and additional British reinforcements under Rear-Admiral Sir John Borlase Warren and Lieutenant Colonel George Airey strengthened the defenders to the point that sallies could be made against French offensive positions.
_	On the June 24 episode of "Impact!", Sting assaulted Jarrett to the point that TNA president Dixie Carter suspended him for 30 days without pay the following week.
_	We few Mongols have not yet come to the point that we will make each other's noses bleed," smacked the table, and left the room."
_	In his essay "From Satori to Silicon Valley" (published 1986), cultural historian Theodore Roszak made the point that the Apple Computer emerged from within the West Coast counterculture and the need to produce print-outs, letter labels, and databases.
_	During his dissent, Black cited also "Johnson v. Zerbst", making the point that had the proceedings of Betts’s case been held in federal court, his petition for counsel to be appointed to him would have been accepted and counsel would have been appointed.
_	The PR lost its influence to the point that when the 1990 election was held, the party captured only one seat in the Congress.
_	Ross makes the point that while line, mass, and color are important in every painting, for rapid plein air work one might be better off beginning with thumbnail “scribble” sketches and small two to four values studies using the biggest brush possible for the job.
_	Well into the 1980s, Alabama played most of its important games, as well as the Iron Bowl, at Legion Field—to the point that most of Alabama's "home" football history from the 1920s to the 1980s took place in Birmingham.
_	Licensed to Ironwood, Michigan, it first began broadcasting in 1974, with its signal covering most of the western Upper Peninsula and the extreme northern portion of Wisconsin; because of the effects of tropospheric ducting, it is also easily heard across Lake Superior in Duluth, Minnesota to the point that in 2017, it asked the FCC to move a recently launched VCY America translator on 99.7 in Duluth to move dial positions due to crossover interference (it moved to 97.7).
_	Public company regulation is largely a disclosure-driven regime, but it has grown in recent years to the point that it begins to dictate certain issues of corporate governance.
_	Han's diagnosis extends even to the point that he calls the loss of desire, the disappearance of the ability to devote to "the other", the stranger, the non-self.
_	Historian Todd Endelman makes the point that it is unlikely this activity could have happened without Cromwell’s permission that they could live as professing Jews.
_	Brenda refuses to obey and moves in with Dylan, who becomes increasingly unhappy in the relationship due to his feud with Jim Walsh, and their new living arrangement annoys Dylan to the point that he nearly ends their relationship.
_	The modernization proceeded seamlessly with continuous investments, to the point that in 1977 the plant was distinguished in the Italian landscape for the modernity of the plants and for the quality of work.
_	The Slavonic sources are unanimous on the point that Bogomil's teaching was Manichaean.
_	His standing with his staff was more mixed: he had a habit of "talking down" to them, dominated the school to the point that teachers were left with little initiative, and, as Elliott and Miller put it, "never entered the staff room except to issue an order."
_	The critics in their rejoinder noted the significance of the arguments of F.W.H. Myers' psychical research text "Human Personality and Its Survival of Bodily Death" to the authors to the point that they included a CD-ROM copy of that text in the book, as well as the authors' inclusion of "a long chapter (by Emily Kelly) on the history of psi and related research since the 19th century."
_	These findings make the point that ICC are innervated and transmitters reach high enough concentration to activate post-junctional signaling pathways in ICC.
_	In 2015 Kato injured his hip in the spring, with the pain reaching the point that he could not run.
_	Subsequent U.S. military operations against insurgent positions were ineffective at drawing out insurgents into another open battle, and by September 2006, the situation had deteriorated to the point that the Al-Anbar province that contained Fallujah was reported to be in total insurgent control by the U.S. Marine Corps, with the exception of only pacified Fallujah, but now with an insurgent-plagued Ramadi.
_	The Bayeux Tapestry, probably commissioned by him to adorn his own cathedral, appears to labour the point that he did not actually fight, that is to say shed blood, at Hastings, but rather encouraged the troops from the rear.
_	The following season Julian limited Cousy's playing time, to the point that the frustrated sophomore contemplated transferring out of Holy Cross.
_	Acoustically, however, the important element is the place of the rearmost occlusion, which is the point that the resonant chamber in the mouth terminates.
_	The new Victorian church was not as well built as the older church had been, and by 1968, it had deteriorated to the point that it was thought unsafe for congregational use.
_	As a member of the board of governors of the Federal Reserve System on February 20, 2004, Bernanke gave a speech in which he postulated that we are in a new era called the Great Moderation, where modern macroeconomic policy has decreased the volatility of the business cycle to the point that it should no longer be a central issue in economics.
_	The valley of Bell Creek in its upper reaches includes a "beaded valley" that was little affected by glacial erosion but considerably affected by glacial deposition, to the point that large amounts of glacial till partly or fully block off individual valleys.
_	Some reform-minded cardinals initially voted for Leo Joseph Suenens of Mechelen-Brussels and Franz König of Vienna to make the point that the pope does not have to be Italian.
_	The original stocks consisted of perch, trout and pike, but these are now depleted to the point that now only perch naturally remain.
_	As a way to avoid excessive intrusion, he advises the use of 'nested sets' of expectations, in progressively more narrow policy language, in order to define its meaning with greater precision until: "At some point, the board will have narrowed its words to the point that it can accept any reasonable interpretation of those words.
_	Historically, there were JYF groups throughout Britain, but a number of circumstances led to their closure, to the point that the Warwickshire Junior Young Friends is the last surviving one.
_	"We're never really satisfied until Great Leap gets to the point that it's available to as many people as possible," he said.
_	From Forrest Highway (at the point that was the intersection of the former Australind Bypass and Old Coast Road), the route travels south to Australind via Old Coast Road, east of the Leschenault Inlet.
_	His body has been enhanced by cosmic energy to the point that it ages far more slowly than most humanoids and is superhumanly strong and resistant to harm and immune to terrestrial diseases.
_	They end up being sucked into the wormhole, which destabilizes to the point that it is worthless to "Voyager".
_	In the 1980s roads had deteriorated to the point that many were little more than sparsely paved dirt trails.
_	The Rugby World Cup, coincidentally, got going at around the point that the Soviet Union was disintegrating – no other ex-Soviet team other than Georgia had ever qualified until 2011 when Russia qualified, and the early World Cups were also smaller tournaments.
_	argue that "...these individuals are not self-made, but rather are created by a process of widespread media exposure to the point that their actions, personalities, and even private lives function symbolically to represent significant dynamics and tensions prevalent in the contemporary business atmosphere."
_	As Charity's depression continues to worsen, her cutting increases to the point that she worries about her physical well-being.
_	He often is uncomfortable around people, preferring to distance himself to the point that he memorized his patients by Social Security Number rather than by name.
_	One other possible explanation is that colder waters increases the viscosity of body fluids to the point that it is beneficial to eliminate erythrocytes all together and instead rely on adaptations.
_	But Des Jardins makes the point that most ethical extensionism has been merely broadening the ethical sphere incrementally, a process not agreeable to some environmental ethicists who would prefer more of a total replacement of traditional ethics with an entirely new approach.
_	After her death, Abel is devastated and consumed with guilt about not being able to save her, to the point that he almost quits the AX.
_	Carrington in the late 1820s relates how the rail-road can be used as a route, for pedestrians or those on horseback, from Haytor to Teigngrace, making the point that a tramway usually differs from a railway by effectively being part of a road and also that the frequency of the granite traffic was usually low and slow moving, so passage along the route by the public on foot or horseback would not have been particularly hazardous.
_	According to GameSpot's Jeff Gerstmann, the unlocking of the hidden character Classic Sub-Zero in "Ultimate Mortal Kombat 3" was so "annoying" to the point that players would not do it.
_	Brownlow concluded his argument with the point that the old soldiers were certainly entitled to as much consideration as were convicts.
_	Since then his career also experienced a rise to the point that he became one of the biggest names in the Latin music industry.
_	The EU report notes that continued force feeding leads to early death of the animal, and the birds are typically slaughtered just at the point that mortality would drastically increase from the force feeding.
_	Their measurements of the distances traveled by Alexander's army show a high degree of precision to the point that it had been suggested that they must have used an odometer, although there is no direct mentioning of such a device:
_	Heavy rainfall has been known to flood the village to the point that even All Saints' Church, at the top of the hill, has been affected.
_	Super Free was a highly successful inter-university rave event club, to the point that it was incorporated, having 5 branches nationwide, 30-odd employees and an office in Roppongi.
_	From then on, Jews were forced to work in more menial positions, becoming second-class citizens or to the point that they were "illegally residing" in Nazi Germany.
_	He had a strong arm, though not a particularly accurate one, but by his senior year had improved his passing to the point that he completed 56.4 percent of his passes and had an efficiency rating of 156.1, along with 17 touchdowns.
_	However, Conrad of Germany, the constable of Henry IV who had previously led a contingent at the Crusade of 1101, fought so valiantly that even after everyone around him was dead he still fought on, holding off the Fatimids to the point that his awestruck foe offered to spare his life if he surrendered.
_	Lee by crushing his left arm and leg, injuring Lee to the point that he must abandon being a ninja.
_	He also stated that RH is a market disruptor, often to the point that it “disrupts itself”.
_	Unfortunately by 2005, it had deteriorated to the point that it had to be removed.
_	After a rocky start at the branch location, it was ultimately successful to the point that the York business was closed and the operation consolidated in Brantford.
_	The inclusion of lay students and Torres' refusal to give the college to the Dominican Order created great enmity between him and the Order, to the point that the Dominicans took legal action against him and the college.
_	This goes to the point that as part of a standard build cycle, a Java Card program is compiled into a Java class file by a Java compiler; the class file is post-processed by tools specific to the Java Card platform.
_	The depopulation of the centre of Glasgow in mid-twentieth century reduced the congregation to the point that the church was no longer viable, the last service held in the building in April 1975.
_	She uses the literacy narratives of several individuals to illustrate the point that children from lower-class families do not have literacy integrated into their lives the way that children from middle- and upper-class families do.
_	By increasing the resistive load on an irradiated cell continuously from zero (a "short circuit") to a very high value (an "open circuit") one can determine the maximum power point, the point that maximizes V×I; that is, the load for which the cell can deliver maximum electrical power at that level of irradiation.
_	The team that kicked is awarded a tap-kick restart from the point that the ball left the field.
_	With the Great Migration of blacks from the area to northern and midwestern industrial cities for jobs, the area population was reduced to the point that the school could not survive financially.
_	Though the general flings insults at her, Oriana responds with nothing but pleasantries; that is, up until the point that she informs Gondarino that she sought out his house specifically because of his reputation as a woman hater, hoping to amuse herself by aggravating him.
_	He was so tolerant to the local culture and even more softer than the other wali up to the point that if someone said to be having difficulty making dawah in Kudus they will refer back to Sunan Kudus as the most successful person in this area.
_	Since we know that a profit maximizer, sets quantity at the point that marginal revenue is equal to marginal cost (MR = MC), the formula can be written as:MC = P + ((dP / dQ) * Q)
_	Psychiatrist John Smith concluded that McVeigh was "a decent person who had allowed rage to build up inside him to the point that he had lashed out in one terrible, violent act."
_	Men are expected to perform masculinity to the point that it is naturalized.
_	The introduction continues to say that Belkin was an interesting and mysterious man, even to the point that the woman he left his estate to had never met him.
_	After the point that is made by the sacrum and lumbar vertebrae, the line following is referred to as the croup.
_	Azerrad plays upon the juxtaposition of Cobain's contradictory lyrics (such as "It's fun to lose and to pretend") and states "the point that emerges isn't just the conflict of two opposing ideas, but the confusion and anger that the conflict produces in the narrator—he's angry that he's confused".
_	The physical decline of the younger generations continued until the Flood, to the point that their days were numbered as stated in Genesis 6:3.
_	In its three-minute video, CFR28 makes the point that reforms preventing use of super PAC money to broadcast opinions about candidates means only media companies would be left with that power.
_	His works became unprecedentedly popular to the point that the Malayali people eventually started to call him the father of the Malayalam language, which also popularized Arya-eluttu as a script to write Malayalam.
_	By injecting a little (but not too much) magical realism into the mix, Forsyth leavens his pro-environmental message to the point that those not looking for it might not be conscious of its presence."
_	Criticism has been aimed at the English voice actors' performance, to the point that it has been recommended to try listening to the original Japanese audio.
_	Searle was also sure to make the point that Adequate Seven would not suffer artistically from their move to the new label: ""...we're not about to start working with machines any time soon.
_	The carabao population of Naval Magazine has grown to several hundred, to the point that they have become a pest and caused environmental damage, and polluted the water supply in the Fena Reservoir.
_	Some time later, Skuld threw together a device with the intent of boosting her powers to the point that she could control and regain Noble Scarlet.
_	Caroline Sullivan of "The Guardian" told the network "I think M.I.A. is making the point that if we segregated all ginger people as a minority - in the same way as black and Asian people - there would be an enormous outcry, and that we don't seem to get the same reaction when black people are treated in this way."
_	He was accused of press interference and had ongoing conflicts with the military, to the point that he was cited by the coup-makers as one of the reasons for the 1991 military coup d'état.
_	Popular logic mazes include tilt mazes and other novel designs which usually increase the complexity of the maze, sometimes to the point that the maze has to be designed by a program to eliminate multiple paths.
_	During the processions, then president of the NKR Arkadi Ghukasyan, reiterated the point that the citizens of the republic would have the final say over their future.
_	Ever since being invited to join AL4, she has developed an admiration towards Ren to the point that she has romantic feelings for him.
_	The mobile phone found at the shooting scene was malfunctioning to the point that the police Cellebrite data recovery device could not access it.
_	He later killed her, to make the point that he was no longer the Doctor.
_	The relationship between Master and College worsened to the point that "one tutor started handing out copies of the Master's pronouncements in his role as 'constitutional expert' with a prize for the student who spotted the greatest number of legal mistakes".
_	(It is also important to note that CBS itself contributed to decreasing ratings thanks to the haphazard scheduling of "Game of the Week" broadcasts during the regular season to the point that fans grew tired of tuning into no baseball on summer Saturdays.)
_	Rather than giving battle, the Germanic warriors were luring the Romans up to the point that they were caught without supply, and without water.
_	The charwoman's role is greatly expanded in the film, to the point that she receives second billing in the list of characters.
_	Most had shrunk in size to the point that they were only slightly larger than humans.
_	Bland and Altman make the point that any two methods that are designed to measure the same parameter (or property) should have good correlation when a set of samples are chosen such that the property to be determined varies considerably.
_	In his patients, he sometimes inspired fear and anger, even to the point that one attempted to murder him, but he also believed that the mentally ill could be treated, and possibly cured, and in fact Kirkbride, after the death of his first wife, married a former patient.
_	Kirby's pencils had a reputation for being detailed, to the point that they were difficult to ink.
_	NBC then moved the show to Tuesdays at 10 pm opposite ABC's "Moonlighting", hurting its ratings to the point that NBC ordered its cancellation after only two seasons.
_	In a "New York Times" op-ed piece in January 2018, Stenn made the point that "Injustice can thrive only in silence, and finally the story of Patricia Douglas and others like her now resonates in Hollywood and beyond."
_	Gated reverb was used on countless drum tracks during the 1980s, to the point that the sound became a defining characteristic of that decade's popular music.
_	The restructuring also managed to keep the debt from increasing during Peña Nieto's term because the tax base was broadened to the point that it doubled in six years.
_	The two are now on an elevator, and during their ascension, the man is suddenly overwhelmed by a sexual urge, that quickly degenerates to the point that he brutally rapes the botanist.
_	The traffic situation in Metro Manila, as well as in other urban cities, continues to get worse to the point that it has already affected the overall growth and development of the country.
_	These highwaymen harassed the gold trains to the point that several of the large shippers were considering transferring their business to the Transit Route of Commodore Vanderbilt who promised to hire units of the Nicaraguan army as guards.
_	"Craccum" made the point that commercialism would erode the students' voice.
_	The growth in the number of unions in the early 1900s increased the arbitration courts workload to the point that unions could wait up to a year before getting a hearing.
_	According to Miller, the "Romeo" suicide imagery makes the point that, with our complicity in war, we are killing ourselves.
_	It marks the first Mario game to be developed for mobile devices, and featured simplified controls, to the point that it was promoted as being playable with only one hand.
_	Over several years the distortion grew to the point that the majority of cars used by working families were company cars and the dealership structures, and even the types of cars used, altered to adjust to the tax regime.
_	He injured his hamstrings to the point that he was never able to run without pain, though he has continued to run sporadically into his 60's.
_	This reportedly angered Takei to the point where he nearly left the show, but the two actors have since become good friends, to the point that Koenig was the best man at Takei's wedding in 2008.
_	They share a grammar, to the point that their syntax is identical and a passage in one can be translated to the other simply by changing the content words.
_	The program lacks attention to algebraic manipulation" to the point that "symbolic algebra is minimized".
_	Over the ensuing week, Burgess's condition worsened, to the point that she was hospitalized with lobar pneumonia.
_	It was so named by Lord Rosse in the 1840s, when telescopes had improved to the point that its Saturn-like shape could be discerned.
_	During pre-production, Mewes would have constant mood swings due to heroin withdrawal, to the point that Smith actually threw him out of his car on their way to the set one day.
_	The devastating coffee rust affected the output of coffee to the point that the costs of production saw coffee plantations in many parts replaced with tea plantations.
_	By 1977, enrollment grew to the point that a separate junior high school was required.
_	Commerce between Ohio and Kentucky had increased to the point that the highly congested steamboat traffic was constricting the economy.
_	Trouble escalates to the point that the wedding was called off.
_	"Chi Mai" is also famous in France for being used for a Royal Canin's 1980s commercial, to the point that it is more closely associated with the commercial than with its other appearances, including Dunhill in 1987.
_	The Celtics were dominant, to the point that the league was suffering.
_	Christian iconography has considerably expanded the bare account of the Biblical Magi given in the second chapter of the Gospel of Matthew (–) and used it to press the point that Jesus was recognized, from his earliest infancy, as king of the earth.
_	His illness had debilitated him to the point that he conducted several NRSO concerts from a wheelchair.
_	A few days after this promotion, Ospina was arrested in Cali and sent to Bogotá where he was tortured in the notorious "Sacromonte caves" to the point that he made a suicide attempt.
_	In the relay final the German team had built up a large lead by the point that Dollinger handed the baton to Dörffeldt for the last leg of the race.
_	Advocates of privatization often make the point that government can provide or arrange for citizens to receive a service without the government actually providing it, by contracting out.
_	By the 1840s the textile industry had grown to the point that commercial fabrics were affordable to almost every family.
_	After complaining of a painful hip, she was diagnosed with terminal bone cancer, and the relationship developed to the point that they sought a Christian marriage.
_	Joey and Aubrey leave with Ryder, and Ford calls St. Annes, angering Tess to the point that she hits him in the head with a lamp and thinks she killed him.
_	The position of prime minister has simultaneously undergone, with encouragement from its occupants, what has been described as a "presidentialisation", to the point that its incumbents publicly outshine the actual head of state.
_	The attitudes of the High Church Tories hardened against the expensive war and they became obstructive to the point that Queen Anne was obliged to replace them at the end of the second session.
_	Harrison quoted these words in his interview with Gambaccini, to illustrate the point that "after talking for a lot, you know, sometimes it's nice to be quiet".
_	For example, in the context of a marriage where the marital relationship has collapsed to the point that both spouses are openly committing adultery, the assertion by either spouse of this defense would prevent a divorce even though the family unit is clearly no longer capable of functioning.
_	Thanks to the information received by Donati, the general consul of Italy Alberto Calisse succeeded in opposing effectively the decisions of French authorities who wanted to deport the Jews to Poland under German pressures, at the point that the "Committee Dubouchage" printed a document with the synagogue visa which the French police had to accept because authorized by the Italians.
_	Clayton's bass guitar was heavily processed, to the point that it sounded like a keyboard bass (an instrument utilized on "Mofo").
_	People were weak to the point that they could not move, nor obtain food and water.
_	This was largely addressed in subsequent versions, but the methods were never documented to the point that the comments explained how and why the methods worked.
_	Even more pronounced decreases in cell culture health is observed at faster freezing rates, to the point that the cell culture cannot maintain a cell density.
_	Additionally, by 1884, the Storting's power had grown to the point that a king could no longer appoint a Norwegian government entirely of his own choosing or keep it in office against the will of the Storting.
_	However, attacks from the likes of Tom Boonen and Fabian Cancellara on the Leberg gapped him off to the point that he never was able to rejoin the front of the race.
_	The decision relies upon the point that in Scots Law, a criminal act consists of two elements, the factual act done and the "mens rea" or intention of the perpetrator in carrying out that action.
_	After the reservoirs of the public rainfall catchment system were rapidly depleted following several months of inadequate precipitation, the islands population began increasing the rate of groundwater pumping to the point that groundwater supplied up to 90% of the island’s drinking water during the drought.
_	Jason Kutney stated that the restructuring of debt would, "put the company in a position where that (joining MLS) can be considered, we have to right the ship and make sure we have a model that can work long-term" and that, "We want to break free of these shackles that have held this company hostage the last few months and restructure debt to the point that we can fully engage these (growth) models."
_	The highway was originally routed along what is now SR 7 and SR 32 and, in part, US 50, from the point that marks the western terminus of SR 618 into Belpre.
_	In March 2011, it was reported that a forensic psychologist at the hospital testified that "Hinckley has recovered to the point that he poses no imminent risk of danger to himself or others".
_	Carpenter also cited a passage from the text of the poem, to make the point that it is one of the very few instances in Tolkien's expansive work where sexual passion is given explicit literary treatment, in this case Mordred's
_	For a time he recovered to the point that he was able to walk on his own, but pneumonia developed.
_	Notwithstanding, economic difficulties have continued to hamper the company to the point that its privatisation is often discussed.
_	North of Orangeville, the railroad ran on a bridge over Fishing Creek, near the point that Pennsylvania Route 487 also crosses Fishing Creek.
_	During the seventeenth century, the Prince Stadtholder as official of the States of Holland clashed several times with the city government of Amsterdam about policy, up to the point that the city was beleaguered by the army.
_	The Burmese independence reached in 1948 prompted guerilla conflict which caused great unrest and destruction to the point that Cremonesi and other missionaries were forced into exile so as to remain safe.
_	The ready availability of the cassette and higher quality home recording decks to serve the casual home user allowed the cassette to become the dominant tape format, to the point that the 8 track tape nearly disappeared shortly after the turn of the 1980s.
_	He was able to get his brother to allow him to give some of the product to some of the patients at the sanitarium, and the patients' demand for the product exceeded his expectations to the point that W.K made the decision to leave the sanitarium.
_	Ibn Khallikan, however, states that he was tortured on the orders of Ya'qub to the point that he went insane, and was ultimately imprisoned in a fortress in Kerman.
_	But it got to the point that I was just too excited about the things going on inside my own head, which I could not release while working for someone else."
_	By 1669 the number of women sharing this vision had grown to the point that their work had spread throughout the city and into the surrounding villages, and they had begun to live in community.
_	Haus was fearful that direct confrontation with the French Navy, even if it should be successful, would weaken the Austro-Hungarian Navy to the point that Italy would have a free hand in the Adriatic.
_	They make the point that progress and community had come to isolated, formerly barren places, and that abundant opportunities awaited those willing to move west and work hard on the reclaimed land.
_	In the recent past, there had been a good working relationship between the local miners and the local Liberal Association to the point that by 1913, miners still dominated the local Liberal association.
_	Atlético Madrid earned the point that won them their first league title in 18 years, and their tenth overall.
_	However when Marland died in 1993, Zenk said the character was under-utilized to the point that screen time for the character had effectively "died."
_	"He invited me to his recital in Town Hall ... the first few minutes were excruciating: as I saw later, his fingers had deteriorated to the point that he had almost no flesh on them.
_	Ellis said that the most appropriate response she had seen to the "Slate" article was that by Twitter user @InnyVinny, who made the point that "black people are not a monolith" and then presented a wide array of brown
_	By 1999, Deborah's MS has worsened considerably, to the point that she can hardly hold a toothbrush on her own.
_	However, his behavior in helping Shirley when she goes into labor during a riot at Greendale wins her over to the point that after the baby (whose father is Shirley's former husband Andre) is born, she decides to name her newborn son Ben after him.
_	The Australian Soccer Federation stressed the point that neither club would be welcome till they dropped 'Croatia' from their respective names.
_	Ediz Hook has eroded to the point that rip-rap has to be placed on the feature to protect Port Angeles harbor from the effects of the wave action.
_	The mission of the Arkansas Soldiers in Louisiana grew to the point that at one time the State Task Force was responsible for working with local officials in 14 parishes.
_	By 1929, airship technology had advanced to the point that the first round-the-world flight was completed by the "Graf Zeppelin" in September and in October, the same aircraft inaugurated the first commercial transatlantic service.
_	Too many postage stamps were being diverted from their main purpose and used as currency to the point that the solution for a shortage of coins created a shortage of stamps for mail purposes.
_	Historian Régine Pernoud makes the point that "So long as the English were masters of Rouen, the mere fact that they held the papers in the case, a case which they had managed themselves, maintained their version of what the trial had been".
_	At times, the balls were soaked to the point that the balls might even end up lopsided.
_	heavily promoted "Eyes Wide Shut", while following Kubrick's secrecy campaign – to the point that the film's press kits contained no production notes, nor even the director's suggestions to Semel regarding the marketing campaign, given one week prior to Kubrick's death.
_	Wilkenfield explains that "this rather misses the point that the continuing rise in global greenhouse gas emissions is not a byproduct of injustice or repression but of economic freedom in the West and the unrelenting economic growth by which repressive regimes such as China’s buy legitimacy.
_	Technology had advanced to the point that pottery was becoming common and the small-scale felling of trees had become feasible.
_	At first, things do not improve between Fred and Wilma, to the point that Wilma lashes out at Fred and very nearly decides to divorce him, but she stumbles across the diamond in her suitcase and, assuming that Fred bought it as a surprise present, quickly makes up with him.
_	The rift in the imperial army had by this time deepened to the point that Justin and John outright refused to obey orders from Belisarius to march to the aid of the city of Mediolanum, which was being besieged by the Goths with their Frankish allies, instead waiting for relevant orders from Narses.
_	"The Seattle Times" editorial board had said they feared dealing with the allegations during an election would weaken Murray to the point that an "extreme left-wing ideologue" could become Mayor, so Murray should withdraw from the race to "clear the way for another qualified, pragmatic leader to come forward".
_	Bell received numerous honorary degrees from colleges and universities to the point that the requests almost became burdensome.
_	Even without this to consider, a full merger of WNYW and WWOR's operations would have likely resulted in channel 9's news department being downsized it to the point that it would not be able to adequately cover news events focused on New Jersey, if not shut down altogether.
_	There are also many cases in which homographs are of an entirely separate origin, or whose meanings have diverged to the point that present-day speakers have little historical understanding: for example, "bat".
_	"We think that in these circumstances any reasonable passenger would have understood the police officers to be exercising control to the point that no one in the car was free to depart without police permission."
_	In summer 2008, chunks of the Bluffs had eroded to the point that one quarter of a cottage that the late actor and comedian Billy Van once owned, was left hanging on the cliff—the cottage was deemed a safety hazard by Toronto city officials as a result.
_	After losing money on the single's promotion and its music video, it would be the point that Virgin Records ran out of patience with the Human League.
_	They make the point that gender relations have changed very little since the proliferation of maquiladoras.
_	The bridge had been listed on the National Register of Historic Places in 1976, but a decade later had deteriorated to the point that it had to be closed.
_	The German bombardment increased to the point that the party digging the trench to protect the right flank could not begin and many of the bombers ready to advance at were also caught in no man's land, became casualties and could not participate in the next stage of the attack against the Quadrilateral.
_	The practice has been considered an emblematic example of a meme copied across the world from a hotel to another until the point that most of them now do it.
_	One Fire Department lieutenant was quoted describing colleagues as desperate for help with the distress they felt in the aftermath of the attacks, to the point that they would try anything.
_	Individuals who are familiar with Möbius patients such as family or friends can recognize other signals of emotion such as body language, to the point that they sometimes report forgetting that the person has facial paralysis.
_	Soldiers, particular Druze border guards, initially used extreme and indiscriminate violence to shoot, bash and interrogate throwers of stones and Molotov cocktails, to the point that sickened some fellow soldiers.
_	he also referred to the point that Fatima has addressed by divine message.
_	As time went on, the spiritual level of the nation declined to the point that God allowed the Philistines to capture the tabernacle.
_	They improved their knowledge and rugby skills to the point that they decided it's time for next step, joining Rugby Federation of Bosnia and Herzegovina and all it's competitions.
_	The limited exposure she had into the world of a normal 12-year-old disadvantaged her to the point that she did not know what a normal childhood should be like.
_	Precisely the point that occupied an old sundial (built in the forties, who recalled an ancient Mayan symbol) which then served as a lookout, with the approval of Archbishop Oscar Andres Rodriguez, the city was chosen.
_	These scholars make the point that such a reversal was not the case; rather these prehistoric cultures were egalitarian and had a social structure that included matrilineality - inheritance of assets and parentage traced through the maternal line.
_	In marginal-cost terms, we require individuals to invest one unit of precautions up until the point that those precautions prevent exactly one unit of harm, and no less.
_	Peter's nomination caused prolonged animosity between Mikhail and Peter to the point that the latter had to ask for protection from the Prince of Moscow in 1325.
_	By the mid-1920s patient demand and numbers of staff had grown to the point that current facilities were inadequate.
_	And over the course of my life as Sasha, it was progressing beyond that to the point that I said, ‘O.K., I now have a greater purpose that is much bigger than me, that’s for the future, and I’m going to do it even in death.
_	The market for Enterprise Resource Planning (ERP) systems and other packaged applications started to grow substantially during the 90's to the point that the ERP market alone accounts for approximately $25 billion.
_	The peasant rebellion in Pasir Putih mainly highlighted the point that the peasants were unhappy at having to change their traditional way of life, including the way in which their taxes were being accounted and collected.
_	Since the beginning, preservation of the forest was a priority, to the point that the library's architectural design of the buildings was done to keep the trees as intact as possible.
_	During the high and late Middle Ages, the metabolic view became increasingly dominant to the exclusion of the nonmetabolic view, to the point that it was considered the only orthodox option.
_	This tree from Oceania has adapted very well to Bordighera’s micro climate, to the point that it has reached the height of 21 meters and a diameter of 8.6 meters.
_	With the news of Heihachi's apparent demise, Jinpachi takes over the company from behind the scenes and organizes the fifth King of Iron Fist Tournament in the hopes that someone will free him before the spirit takes him over completely (to the point that he writes to Wang, asking him to compete and put an end to the Mishima bloodline which has been cursed by Heihachi's greedy ambitions).
_	By March 11, tensions had reached the point that armed Democratic supporters were standing outside the state house in an attempt to intimidate Republican lawmakers and discourage them from entering.
_	This never happens but he experiments a lot, to the point that he feared occasionally that his works may be vulnerable in time.
_	He brings up the point that no other league exploits their kids at such an early age.
_	When the scope if the disaster is reduced to the point that the lead federal agency can again assume full control and management without military assistance, JTF-AK will exit, leaving the on-scene experts to finish the job.
_	Hyde tries to win Donna to the point that even Fez began to mock him over his repeated failed attempts.
_	Brooke said that Linggir was very much worried of losing their homeland to the point that Brooke offered him land at Sungai Balingian to migrate to in appreciation of his loyalty and service in participating in expeditions against other rebellious Iban but he did not do so.
_	In 924 he helped secure the dismissal and execution of the vizier Ibn al-Furat, after which his political influence grew enormously, to the point that he briefly deposed al-Muqtadir in 928.
_	Lord Saville declined to comment on the Widgery report and made the point that the Saville Inquiry was a judicial inquiry into Bloody Sunday, not the Widgery Tribunal.
_	Iravathan Mahadevan makes the point that even if one takes the latest dates of 1500 BCE for the Indus script and earliest claimed dates of Brahmi around 500 BCE, a thousand years still separates the two.
_	However, since World War I, German has grown to the point that it is about evenly divided between Romansh-speaking and German-speaking population.
_	Ching to also resume eating, which enrages him to the point that he and Yiu assault Hung.
_	She said that instead of an album with "one-two punch songs", she wanted to make an album that engaged people to the point that they want to listen to it repeatedly, and that they would learn something new each time.
_	Thomas and many of his followers were deeply in debt, to the point that the federal government recognized the eastern tribe as separate from the western tribe, and filed a lawsuit against the Cherokee's creditors, in effect leaving the protection of the Cherokee to the federal government.
_	Eventually it gets to the point that they organize a fight after school.
_	The cause was Alicia’s contentious and overbearing personality; convinced she always knew best, she had interfered with Fergus’s tours to the point that he had finally barred her from participating.
_	He made the point that while it was being treated with more sensitivity than the rape of Toyah Battersby (Georgia Taylor) was, back in 2001, the impression was that the writing team were placing too much pain and anguish upon Carla's character:
_	Mistaken for an average mountain in the rugged High Tatras range in the more distant past, it has since played a symbolic role in the eyes of the rulers and populations of several Central European nations, to the point that between the 19th and mid-20th century, it had four different names with six name reversals.
_	Although he did not become a world champion, he was revered in Argentina and most countries in Latin America, to the point that there are several streets and avenues in other Latin countries named after him, as well as one of the most important football teams in El Salvador.
_	The "whirling camera effects and freaky sound mix overstates the point that our man really is not well".
_	Schweitzer has been guarded in comments on the issue of same-sex marriage to the point that even close observers have been unclear on his opinion.
_	A year before this investigation was concluded, it was revealed that interrogations by special units of the U.S. military services were much harsher and more physical than any of the above DIA practices, to the point that 2 DIA officials reportedly complained, after which they were threatened by non-DIA interrogators.
_	Vanessa and Wonder Woman grew closer to the point that Vanessa considered herself the super heroine's best friend.
_	The actors continuously repeat the point that this is not a play, and that nothing theatrical will happen.
_	He managed one second place from three starts but the condition of his hooves had deteriorated to the point that he could not continue racing.
_	This sewage had contaminated the shellfish beds to the point that discussions of building treatment plants began.
_	His form continued to the point that he went into round 10 at Lausitzring with a chance of clinching the title with 3 rounds to go.
_	He is the youngest of the Watership Down rabbits and has the gift of making friends with everyone including other animals in the Down area, to the point that when he is in trouble they will immediately join together with the Watership Down rabbits to come to his rescue.
_	Slowly the book's critical capital began to rise to the point that, in 1957, Northrop Frye described "Finnegans Wake" as the "chief ironic epic of our time” and Anthony Burgess lauded the book as "a great comic vision, one of the few books of the world that can make us laugh aloud on nearly every page."
_	Over the course of the show, Alan and Judith's mutual hatred increases to the point that one will do anything to upset the other.
_	Hassan developed an interest in music to the point that he is willing to spend whatever money he has earned to buy a violin.
_	The restorers' decision to have the figure look over her back greatly affected subsequent interpretations, to the point that the classicists Mary Beard and J. G. W. Henderson describe it as having "created a 'masterpiece' in place of a fragment".
_	"We want to bring forth the point that one can be sexually harassed even while being clothed from head to toe," stated Film Studies student Sulakshana Biswas, one of the organizers.
_	This was against the established country code and Burns was enraged to the point that the perpetrator felt that he was about to be thrown into the river.
_	This attitude did not change with time, and twenty five years after her marriage, she was described as: "wholly English in her tastes, her principles and her manners, to the point that her almost cynical independence makes, with the etiquette of the German courts, the most singular contrast I know".
_	The archdiocese suggested that the complex would be ideal for use as the Vatican embassy should relations between it and China improve to the point that ambassadors were exchanged.
_	In this method, CO is liquefied under pressure and heated to the point that it becomes supercritical (having properties of both a liquid and a gas), allowing it to act as a solvent.
_	The citizens were so closely involved in repelling the attack to the point that, after the victory, some were given honours and medals.
_	Once the Umayyads expanded into Khwarezm, a stronghold of east Iranian civilization, al-Hajjaj ordered the execution of anyone who could read or write the language, to the point that only the illiterate remained.
_	Thomas chooses his words carefully, "trying to make my phrases more colourful when I'm writing, trying to find the longest way to get to the point that I'm trying to make as opposed to the quickest way."
_	Both retained the Ba'ath name and parallel structures within the Arab world, but hostilities between them grew to the point that the Syrian Ba'ath government became the only Arab government to support Iran (a non-Arabic nation) against Iraq during the First Persian Gulf War.
_	By early 1974, however, opposition to the council reached the point that the OU's board of directors voted to suspend the organization's participation in the council until a full debate and vote were held at the next convention.
_	The fields of diophantine approximation and transcendence theory have expanded, to the point that the techniques have been applied to the Mordell conjecture.
_	He convinced her to the point that she became a jazz devotee.
_	Hasbún is unknown how long worked with Silva and level of impact it had on their municipal work, but maybe helped Silva developed to the point that large urban projects that agenciaron a new building complex period in 2000.
_	Writer Poul Anderson makes the point that the declining empire depicted in his "Dominic Flandry" series does not span the entire galaxy but only a fraction of one of its spiral arms.
_	The awards were also almost totally dominated by the National Film Board, to the point that independent filmmakers sometimes alleged a systemic bias which was itself a contributing factor to the difficulty of building a sustainable commercial film industry in Canada.
_	This created tension with Clay's father, who was outright neglected by his wife in favor of his son, to the point that he was forced to eat his son's leftovers.
_	By 1944 the threat of invasion or seaborne attack had diminished to the point that the fort was reduced to care and maintenance status.
_	As early as the 1970s, Baltimore's Chinatown was in a state of decline to the point that the neighborhood was losing its Chinese characteristics.
_	Chloe Stillwell completely disagreed with Eisenberg and insisted that the character of Doggett was realistic: "Eisenberg's argument completely misses the point that perhaps the show is trying to be as real as possible, and acknowledging that there are real life Pennsatuckies in this world isn't to disenfranchise Appalachia."
_	Many American journalists conceded that the matches had become so intense to the point that they were no longer being played in the spirit that Samuel Ryder had intended.
_	And to the point that he was present when Voight had beaten one of the co-conspirator in order for him to give the name of who was in charge.
_	But Ahmanson did not diversify to the point that would cause the failure of many thrift institutions in the years to come—even into the 1990s the company still did not make auto or consumer loans, leases, or unsecured commercial loans, which tend to be riskier.
_	Using complex geometry, Edmond Laguerre first suggested the existence of two isotropic lines through the point that depend on the imaginary unit :
_	Chin Peng stressed the point that, as a member of the Malayan Communist Party, they were not prepared to be forced by others to give up that ideology, but wished to put their ideology to the people to decide, if that were possible.
_	When positive words become strongly associated with particular brands, these words can become assets—to the point that competing brands may find the words difficult to use.
_	A fuzz bass sound can be created by turning up the volume of a tube amp or transistor amp to the point that preamplifier tube (or transistor preamp) clipping" occurs.
_	Since their reintroduction to Kentucky in the early 90s, they have recovered to the point that a trapping season was started in 2006, and the species is now found in all major waterways.
_	After a few years she began instruction with the purpose of educating women to the point that they would qualify for admittance to the Royal Academy schools, and one of her students, Laura Herford, succeeded on the basis of a drawing that only included her first initials.
_	Specifically, it performs poorly in high sea states, with excessive pitching and rolling to the point that the propeller can leave the water.
_	So it took her to the point that we saw last week where she went to the top of the roof to possibly jump off and commit suicide."
_	McCarthy sensed Favre was not in "the right mind-set" to resume playing for the Packers, while Favre felt that his relationship with Packer management had deteriorated to the point that a return to the team would be untenable.
_	Although it was not among the leading participants of the abolitionist movement in the early 19th century, by the early 20th century its social engagement had increased to the point that it was an important participant in the Social Gospel movement, though it never provided much support for the Prohibitionist movement.
_	As a politician, he maintained a great popularity and was venerated by the majority of the population of the city of Naples, to the point that in the municipal elections of 1952 and 1956 he received almost 300,000 votes, higher than any number of votes received by any candidate in local elections up to that point.
_	But they had the opposite effect, increasing the county's indebtedness to the point that it had to declare bankruptcy.
_	Most criticism centres on the point that Ordnance Survey possesses a virtual government monopoly on geographic data in the UK, while, although a government agency, since 1999 it has been required to act as a Trading Fund or commercial entity.
_	Grammer said of the character, "Gary the Rat has been compromising every scruple to the point that he compromises his humanity."
_	By the end of the 19th century, criticism of natural selection had reached the point that in 1903 the German botanist, , wrote that "We are now standing at the death bed of Darwinism", and in 1907 the Stanford University entomologist Vernon Lyman Kellogg, who supported natural selection, asserted that "... the fair truth is that the Darwinian selection theory, considered with regard to its claimed capacity to be an independently sufficient mechanical explanation of descent, stands today seriously discredited in the biological world."
_	By custom, French is used in restaurants and brasseries to the point that Luxembourgers assume that the service staff will be French speaking and make no attempt to use Luxembourgish.
_	However, Amanda Holden makes the point that, musically, Smyth is "no Wagnerite, she makes use of his motivic technique, while the texture, orchestration, and even some of the music's dramatic density, show knowledge of the works of Richard Strauss ... but it also slips too readily into operatic convention."
_	Limón makes the point that in order for the boy in the novel to embrace rationality, he must put down and deem backwards his Mexican American culture's folk Catholicism.
_	Decreased funding was having a degrading effect on facilities and staffing, to the point that the future of the home was in question.
_	And most important, instead of breaking with Theodore because of some extreme interpretations of his teachings, like others did, Babai clarified his position to the point that differences with western Christology became superficial and mostly an issue of terminology.
_	The size of the group no doubt fluctuated over time and the organization lacked the rigid discipline and regimentation of the official Communist Party USA, to the point that one historian of the Lovestone movement has speculated that "perhaps the Communist Opposition leadership itself did not know the exact number of members at any given time."
_	Channel 19 is the most commonly used by truck drivers on highways, to the point that some radios even have a dedicated button to bring up channel 19 instantly.
_	There's a lot of false stuff on there, to the point that every time I try to fix one thing, something else comes out."
_	Finally, after Pétain's proclamation of the "French State" and the beginning of the implementation of the ""Révolution nationale"" (National Revolution), the French administration opened up many concentration camps, to the point that, as historian Maurice Rajsfus writes:
_	As Hamels had been the Phillies only consistent starter to that point, even to the point that one columnist said the Phillies are a joke "as long as we are forced to look forward to someone other than Cole Hamels on the mound", the Phillies acquired Kyle Lohse to supplement the rotation soon before the trading deadline.
_	What is now known as the Sheely Bridge was originally built to carry State Highway 133 across the Roaring Fork River at Carbondale in 1911, replacing an 1890s bridge that had deteriorated to the point that it could no longer be used or repaired.
_	Human genetic engineering has advanced to the point that anyone—single individuals, same-sex couples, groups of three or more—can reproduce.
_	"Auto Antics" features the final appearance of Eugene "Porky" Lee, who was dismissed from the series after growing significantly taller (to the point that he became taller than George "Spanky" McFarland) during "Our Gang"<nowiki>'</nowiki>s first year at MGM.
_	Evans wrote that Gove was "right about the elites, but misses the point that they weren't able to carry the majority of the German people with them; the largest political party, the Social Democrats, was opposed to annexations and had long been critical of the militarism of the elites".
_	Commenting on Islamophobia in "New Humanist", Benn suggests that people who fear the rise of Islamophobia foster an environment "not intellectually or morally healthy", to the point that what he calls "Islamophobia-phobia" can undermine "critical scrutiny of Islam as somehow impolite, or ignorant of the religion's true nature", encouraging "sentimental pretence that all claims to religious truth are somehow 'equal', or that critical scrutiny of Islam (or any belief system) is ignorant, prejudiced, or 'phobic'".
_	Raimi became extremely overheated, to the point that his costume was literally filled with liters of sweat; special effects artist Gregory Nicotero describes pouring the fluid into several Dixie cups so as to get it out of the costume.
_	Abbe Guillaume-Thomas Raynal attained a fame equivalent to that of Montesquieu, Voltaire or Rousseau with his book "Histoire philosophique et politique des établissements et du commerce des européens dans les deux Indes", even to the point that in 1789 he was considered one of the fathers of the French Revolution.
_	While working in Cleveland, Pendergast impressed personnel man Jeremy Green to the point that when Green's father, Dennis Green, became the head coach of the Arizona Cardinals, Jeremy convinced him to interview Pendergast for the job.
_	The situation further deteriorated as the popularity of cable television expanded the number of viewable networks to the point that the margin of error has increased, because the sampling sizes are too small.
_	He cared for 10,024 orphans during his lifetime, and provided educational opportunities for the orphans to the point that he was even accused by some of raising the poor above their natural station in British life.
_	This conflict reaches the point that one shopkeeper, Wan Saleh, decides to buy out his competitor at cost.
_	The story takes place five decades from now, when brain scanners have been perfected to the point that the government can retrieve up to five years' worth of memories from people's minds — even if they are dead.
_	By 1915, the price of phenol rose to the point that Bayer's aspirin plant was forced to drastically cut production; this was especially problematic because Bayer was instituting a new branding strategy in anticipation of the expiry of the aspirin patent in the United States.
_	In 1995, the relationship between Gaby and his manager, Luis, deteriorated to the point that they were no longer able to work together.
_	In the US legal system the point that in most cases a parody of a work constitutes fair use was upheld in the case of Rick Dees, who decided to use 29 seconds of the music from the song "When Sonny Gets Blue" to parody Johnny Mathis' singing style even after being refused permission.
_	Cardiff involved his audience to the point that they stopped being an audience …
_	He soon caught up with the pair of Salamandrians on their way to obtain material both sides needed to fix their damaged ships, and impressed Y'Gythgba to the point that she tried to get rid of him by blasting the ice beneath his feet rather than trying to hit him.
_	The death of his childhood friend, Rafael Cortijo in 1982, affected him emotionally to the point that he couldn't sing in the tribute to Cortijo celebrated at the Roberto Clemente Coliseum.
_	Robert B. Lloyd makes the point that "albeit the two prologues introduce plays whose plots are of essentially different types, they are almost identical in form..."
_	However, the modern A31 adopts a slightly less direct and less steep approach to the High Street, and reorganisation of central Guildford into a roundabout road system centred on the Friary Centre (named after the medieval Dominican Friary there) has also broken up this direct stretch of road at the point that it reaches Guildford.
_	In fact, the notoriety reached by the Italian brand, which disguised as the original one, came to the point that it managed to enter the 89th edition of the most important International event for menswear Pitti Uomo in 2016 becoming popular among a wider range of consumers to which it wanted to reach compared to the original one.
_	Stations will be jam-packed in, sometimes to the point that one can hear loud and clear two, three, or more stations on the same frequency, at once.
_	If the ischemia has progressed to the point that the affected intestinal segments are gangrenous, a bowel resection of those segments is called for.
_	Relations between Quercitains and Russians are friendly to the point that many marriages are between Russian officers and the local ladies.
_	Because happiness is beyond anything physical, Plotinus stresses the point that worldly fortune does not control true human happiness, and thus “… there exists no single human being that does not either potentially or effectively possess this thing we hold to constitute happiness.”
_	APOBEC3G has a much weaker antiviral effect when its active site has been mutated to the point that the protein can no longer mutate retroviral DNA.
_	He received an elite training in literature to the point that he was arguably the best informed of his era in El Salvador.
_	According to Lee's experience, her privacy had been invaded to the point that she could not stay in her house.
_	By the middle of the 1850s, the heavily Roman Catholic population had grown to the point that multiple parishes were established in the area.
_	Expulsions of diplomats and suspected spies escalated to the point that by the end of October 1986, 100 Soviets, including a further 80 suspected Soviet intelligence agents, were expelled by the U.S. The Soviets expelled ten U.S. diplomats and withdrew all 260 of the Russian support staff working for the U.S. embassy in Moscow.
_	These combined "currencies" have accumulated to the point that they hold more value worldwide than U.S. (paper) dollars, and are the subject of company liquidation disputes and divorce settlements ("Economist", 2005).
_	The name comes from "ciuppin" which is the name of a classic soup from the Italian region Liguria, similar in flavor to cioppino but with less tomato and using Mediterranean seafood cooked to the point that it falls apart.
_	As the bridemaids discuss their love lives, one of them makes a remark about Jenny being emotionally twisted beyond recognition by Connor to the point that she's unable to move on to a new relationship.
_	His reputation grew to the point that King Xiao charged him with breeding and providing the imperial cavalry.
_	His unusual behavior continued to the point that Desha's pregnant wife Cornelia moved out of the house and refused to return.
_	Many long-established words, such as "disgusted", "degrade", and "refresh", do not require a hyphen because they are fully fused to the point that their first syllable is barely even thought about as having a prefix function.
_	Sometimes the relatively normal companion star of a binary pulsar will swell up to the point that it dumps its outer layers onto the pulsar.
_	The main feature of his plans is a desire to eliminate unnecessary circulation space, sometimes to the point that the main staircase is inconvenient, and the external veranda is the best way to get around the house.
_	It is home to fish species including catfish, yellow belly, and European carp; the last have decimated the native fish stocks to the point that they are getting harder to find.
_	His question reflects the point that indigenous cultures are themselves the products of millennia of history and change.
_	It has been claimed to be a mechanism by which homeopathic remedies work, even though they are diluted to the point that no single molecule of the original substance remains.
_	Triumph set up an assembly facility in Speke, Liverpool in 1959, gradually increasing the size of the company's most modern factory to the point that it could produce 100,000 cars per year.
_	The introduction of freeze-dried instant coffee, canned coffee, and franchises such as Starbucks and Doutor Coffee in the late 20th century continued this trend, to the point that Japan is now one of the leading per capita coffee consumers in the world.
_	This occurs when the brake pads are heated to the point that the material begins to break-down and transfer to the disc.
_	He began to speak out against what he believed to be the excesses of the program in a series of speeches to national civil liberties groups, to the point that Sherman Adams, White House Chief of Staff and members of the Justice Department considered him disloyal.
_	It features prominently in Japanese culture, where it is widely seen as a fearsome and reckless animal, to the point that several words and expressions in Japanese referring to recklessness include references to boars.
_	Drawing inspiration for it from a real life relationship that none of his friends were able to understand, Abrams wanted to make the point that when two people are in a loving relationship, they should not be discouraged by how others view them.
_	The moisture content of hides and skins is greatly reduced, and osmotic pressure increased, to the point that bacteria are unable to grow.
_	It is assumed that this album's grouping of "love-gone bad" songs, and Sinatra's poignant renderings, were a direct result of Sinatra's failing relationship with Gardner, to the point that these are called "Ava Songs".
_	By 1947 pressure to renew the Iron Bowl had grown to the point that the state legislature threatened to withhold funding from the two schools unless they scheduled a game, and in 1948 Alabama and Auburn finally agreed to meet on a football field.
_	On 8 December, the Feast of the Immaculate Conception, his situation improved markedly to the point that he could walk again.
_	During this stay a friendship between Wellington and Alava was created, to the point that the Duke had him remain as delegate of the Spanish forces in the British units.
_	He slumped in his first year with the White Sox to the point that eccentric owner Bill Veeck held an "Al Smith Night" to honor his outfielder.
_	The project was progressively scaled back to the point that the two infantry blocks that were actually built were not even connected by an underground gallery.
_	As the song spread, it was adapted, modified and rewritten to the point that dozens of versions existed by the end of the 18th century, although only a few are typically sung nowadays.
_	I don't need to emphasize the point that the method of building the tone into the spelling of the word fits the modern world of telegraphy, the typewriter and the computer." (Durdin 1972: 37).
_	While presenting "Aida" in Rio de Janeiro on June 25, Leopoldo Miguez, the locally hired conductor, reached the summit of a two-month escalating conflict with the performers due to his rather poor command of the work, to the point that the singers went on strike and forced the company's general manager to seek a substitute conductor.
_	The process of forming rusticated concrete blocks was simplified to the point that Sears was able to start selling concrete block machines in their catalogs to the general public.
_	In "Incredible Hulk vs Superman", the Hulk and Superman face each other early in their respective careers (to the point that Banner's identity as the Hulk is still secret), with Lex Luthor attempting to provoke a battle between the Hulk and Superman by using a Hulk Robot to create the impression that the Hulk had abducted Lois Lane and Betty Ross.
_	Things escalate to the point that Surjati takes Janti and leaves.
_	A plan was once conceived to treat one million gallons per day of the waters of the Green Mountain Tunnel to the point that it would be potable and sell it to the Humboldt Industrial Park.
_	The novel repeatedly hammers home the point that only if the German people are united as one in the form of the "Volksgemeinschaft" can Germany recover from the defeat of 1918, and throughout the novel Germans are of all classes are seen as victimized by the French and their "colored" troops.
_	Monod makes the point that behavior cannot be strictly separated as learned or innate since elements are acquired through experience according to an innate program and "the program's structure initiates and guides early learning, which will follow a certain pre-established pattern defined by the species' genetic patrimony" (Monod, 153).
_	The current intro combines live-action and CGI while also paying homage to the original 1982 sequence (to the point that the latter can be seen during the new intro).
_	While federal environmental permits were being secured, the construction process was delayed; by October 1990, the bridge construction was only at the point that had been planned to have been completed in May, and grading and paving work had yet to begin.
_	By that time, construction had only progressed to the point that it was supposed to have been at in late July.
_	The car entries for some of the top division Grand National events with smaller payouts shrank (only 14 cars entered the 1971 Space City 300) to the point that NASCAR allowed the Grand American cars to compete in certain Grand National races.
_	Better methods of fire detection became available, and the risks of fire declined to the point that DEC closed the fire tower in 1988.
_	To make the point that the publication had outlasted the Soviet regime, "Kommersant" is spelled in Russian with a terminal hard sign (ъ) – a letter that is silent at the end of a word in modern Russian, and was thus largely abolished by the post-revolution Russian spelling reform.
_	The pope makes the point that this parable illustrates that mercy is best judged not from the mere externals, but from a deeper examination of what it does to the interior of man.
_	By the 17th century, however, the lake had begun to silt up to the point that it could have been possible to cross on foot.
_	The relationship between Burt and Carole progresses to the point that they decide to live together, and she and Finn move in with the Hummels, since their house is the larger of the two.
_	Moses I. Finley, in "The World of Odysseus", which presents a picture of the society represented by the "Iliad" and the "Odyssey", avoids the question as "beside the point that the narrative is a collection of fictions from beginning to end" Finley, for whom the Trojan War is "a timeless event floating in a timeless world", analyzes the question of historicity, aside from invented narrative details, into five essential elements:
_	It is believed that Sergio Méndez Arceo's actions and views made him too controversial, to the point that it limited his ability to form collegiality with other Mexican bishops and the episcopate.
_	This clarifies the point that the ability of the virus is different from the organism and the ability of both the virus and organisms should be looked at independently.
_	The following morning, Jeff looks outside and sees the front end of his van entirely caved in, to the point that it is undriveable; Kim insists that she merely dented the fender.
_	Where the remains have deteriorated or been mutilated to the point that the body is not easily recognized, a UID's face may be reconstructed to show what it had looked like before death.
_	He experiences first coldness, tingling, then itching, followed by "the faintest burning" which soon intensifies to the point that "he could feel skin curling black on that agonized hand, the flesh crisping and dropping away until only charred bones remained".
_	Robert Hughes makes the point that the sheer peculiarity of Cornell would not easily attract a wide school of followers for the artist.
_	Anti-war themes appear in episodes such as "", depicting a planet-destroying weapon as an analogy to nuclear weapons deployed under the principle of mutually assured destruction, and "A Taste of Armageddon" about a society which has "civilized" war to the point that they no longer see it as something to avoid.
_	When she returned, a case involving a serial rapist affected her deeply, to the point that she panicked during an undercover operation, an action that prevented the team from obtaining probable cause to hold the assailant in custody.
_	In the past, the control had issues with responsiveness to the point that many had opted to simply call plays and allowed the computer to control the action on the field.
_	Rather than use complicated Chinese character keyboard interfaces, Hong Kong English speakers will text and email English translations to the point that the English word often gains independent usage.
_	His impression of Australian rugby union coach Eddie Jones following the decision to award a Super Rugby franchise to Perth was a prime example of this, even to the point that another panelist held Birmingham's left eyebrow in place in order to have him look like the man he was pretending to be.
_	Let be the middle of the interval (the midpoint or the point that bisects the interval).
_	When Jenova originally crashed, it began infecting the Cetra with a virus, to the point that they were almost wiped out.
_	Though described by contemporaries as fearfully devoted to the Queen, to the point that she did not have a mind of her own, she actively campaigned for women's rights, a field the Queen abhorred.
_	In his speech at the Fields Medal award ceremony in 1954, Hermann Weyl gave high praise to Serre, and also made the point that the award was for the first time awarded to a non-analyst.
_	After 80 years short-lifetime radioactive material in the defuelled core would have decayed to the point that human access to the reactor structure would be possible, easing dismantling work.
_	By 1921, the condition of the course had been improved to the point that it was selected to host the 1921 McVitie & Price Tournament.
_	Their efforts were successful to the point that the board was abolished in 1968.
_	When finished, it is revealed that the man was a famous sculptor who wanted to make the point that art isn't just for high society.
_	At the time of the coronation, Ana maria's marriage with Agustin was on the rocks to the point that the two were almost separated.
_	He also noted that Kaga kept on pushing for more role-playing elements, to the point that the team felt it was being turned into a full-fledged role-playing video game.
_	Markham would later say of McMahon that he was abusive and controlling to the point that he would only allow her twenty-five cents to spend on meals.
_	These columns eventually angered Baja California's state government and Mexico's former President José López Portillo to the point that the government ordered Blancornelas to fire Miranda and banned its distribution.
_	Over time, fidelity, dynamic and noise levels improved to the point that it was harder to tell the difference between a live performance in the studio and the recorded version.
_	At one point during the 1990s the congregation had declined to less than ten members, and inactivity threatened again, but it rebounded to the point that the church considered hiring an assistant pastor.
_	He used reflexes to validate the point that animals without developed brains lack strong motor skills: "...we find animals without brain and without any traces of the mind, to be capable of very few kinds of movements".
_	He writes that "in the north soldiers are stupid and impatient, to the point that they cannot see the strength of the musket, and they insist on holding tight to their fast lances (a type of fire lance), and although when comparing and vying on the practice field the musket can hit the bullseye ten times better than the fast-lance and five times better than the bow and arrow, they refuse to be convinced."
_	Afterwards, an unexpected and lively friendship arised between the two kings to the point that, sometime later, Louis offered Henry an elephant which had been given to him by the Sultan of Egypt and ratified a papal bull, as the feudal overlord of Henry, that annulled the Provisions of Oxford and declared himself as a firm supporter of the Royal prerogative in England.
_	His argument rests on the point that, outside of the mentions in the "History", the only extant referencing of Marius' work is always in the context of Juvenal, and that the "History's" description of him as a historian cannot be taken at face value, given how it invents or distorts so many other citations.
_	Steele persisted with this approach, to the point that Wilson concludes that the “round headed opening became Steele's motif for public buildings.
_	Amid the sarcasm and vitirol of Nevinson's response, he did make the point that the soldiers in the painting were sketched from a group home on leave from the Front that he had encountered on the London Underground.
_	By this time, the uncertainty about the best configuration for an aircraft carrier had increased to the point that the Admiralty forbade the builder from working above the hangar deck without express permission.
_	In Japanese culture, the boar is widely seen as a fearsome and reckless animal, to the point that several words and expressions in Japanese referring to recklessness include references to boars.
_	This alarmed her to the point that both of them swore off alcohol entirely.
_	Fortunately, mammals have evolved to the point that they have invented the internet and can now access the Castle.
_	In 2009, he shot a short film portraying a dystopian world where everyone is plugged into iPods to the point that all human conversation has ceased.
_	In Canada the amount of mail sent to Santa Claus increased every Christmas, up to the point that Canada Post decided to start an official Santa Claus letter-response program in 1983.
_	As Tala was returning to camp, everyone was beginning to be irked by Maribel's continued presence to the point that Carlo had an argument with Isabel and Maribel.
_	Her sickness gets to the point that she can barely talk, and Ethan begs Dr. Victor Frankenstein to help her.
_	By 1973 the community of Benedictine nuns of the Abbey of Viboldone, near Milan, which had been established in 1941 to care for the needy children of wartime Italy, had grown to the point that they considered opening a new foundation.
_	What is more, she later told "Spin": "some critics have taken my writing so literally to the point that they'll listen to 'Down by the Water' and believe I have actually given birth to a child and drowned her."
_	Connie's visits with Paul become more frequent, to the point that she is late to pick up Charlie from school.
_	He writes that "in the north soldiers are stupid and impatient, to the point that they cannot see the strength of the musket, and they insist on holding tight to their fast lances (a type of fire lance), and although when comparing and vying on the practice field the musket can hit the bullseye ten times better than the fast-lance and five times better than the bow and arrow, they refuse to be convinced."
_	These experiments left her with six arms (two of which were robotic), turned her hair grey, and drove the young woman insane through forcibly evolving Rita's mind to the point that she could see into other dimensions that were used for time-travel/teleportation.
_	The literary community initially greeted her with enthusiasm, arranging readings of her works, which were widely published, even to the point that her popularity aroused resentment of some young poets (the "Ketuvim" “Writings” group, headed by Avraham Shlonsky, 1900–1973) and made her a target in their struggle against the older poets (the "Moznayim" “Scales” group, led by Hayyim Nahman Bialik, of which Elisheva herself was a member).
_	The body and Özgecan's face were burnt to the point that it rendered identification impossible; clothes found with the body were used in identification.
_	Others tend to blame the attitude of Social Darwinism more generally, accusing it of corrupting the attitude of able-bodied people in the US in particular towards disabled people—often to the point that it prevents that country's culture from readily accepting disabled people in aspects and venues that are not directly legality or law-related, e.g. theater, film, dance, and sexuality.
_	In areas with many tourists, such as the Tanah Toraja, "rumah adat" are preserved as a spectacle for tourists, their former residents living elsewhere, with design elements exaggerated to the point that these "rumah adat" are considerably less comfortable than the original designs.
_	There were rumours that the KGB infiltration of the clergy even reached the point that KGB agents listened to confessions.
_	Over the next several days, George and Rudy-2 try to fix things, but the problems persist, to the point that, fed up with the problems and thinking George is responsible, Mr. Spacely heads on up to check on things personally.
_	Stigmonus showed Jordan examples of humanity’s cruelty and selfishness as if to make the point that it isn’t worth saving.
_	The second movement is a series of dances, and opens with a rustic ländler, which becomes distorted to the point that it no longer resembles a dance.
_	He expressed his first interest in painting, which he learned from his father, and which he perfected to the point that he was called a "contemporary Salvator Rosa".
_	He competed with the song "Na cabanha junto á praia" (In a little house next to the beach), which was well received in the festival to the point that he managed to get the third place with 32 points.
_	Horrified, Gabrielle kicks Carlos out and asks for a divorce but tells Xiao-Mei to stay, causing tension between them to the point that she runs away once.
_	The ninth century also saw the inclusion of numerous saints in the calendar (a practice already begun by the second century), even to the point that normal Sunday propers were taking place over those normally appointed for Sunday.
_	Cooper considered the Steyr Scout "perfect" and often made the point that "I've got mine!"
_	His efforts were successful to the point that in 1889 fifty-three men were mustered into the New York State National Guard as Troop A, becoming the cavalry arm of the Empire State.
_	Reports from eye witnesses speak of the town of Hargeisa as mere rubble, devastated to the point that it is barely recognizable even to its inhabitants.
_	Maxie is grief-stricken, to the point that she belittles her mother at Georgie's funeral for abandoning them.
_	India clinched the Test series after winning the third Test in Bombay, but the intense pressure affected the players of both teams to the point that they pursued mainly defensive tactics that led to drawn matches and whole series without a victor.
_	Anti-gas equipment and procedures improved significantly during the war, to the point that gas attacks had become less devastating at the war's end.
_	Then it is simple to evaluate the polynomial at the point that will yield formula_3.
_	It came to the point that his mother felt she could not control him any longer, and thus sent him and other relatives to Singapore.
_	Things deteriorated to the point that the division was withdrawn from the lines and rebuilt in early 1945 with the removal of the 366th Infantry Regiment (formed into two engineer general service regiments) and the addition of the 473rd and 442nd Infantry Regiments.
_	During the London press conference, KSI mocked Logan Paul about his girlfriend Chloe Bennet and his father Greg Paul to the point that both Paul Brothers walked out of the press conference prematurely.
_	In addition, the finding that the Bezwoda study was false further drove the point that the treatment was not of significant benefit compared to standard treatment, because it was the only study that suggested a degree of recurrence-free survival benefit from HDC/BMT.
_	Pop Culture Shock's Ken Haley criticises the manga's art as "bland" but concedes the point that "it does a good job at depicting scantily clad underage girls in compromising positions."
_	They are also a cheaper option than a "T. blondi"; "L. parahybana" reproduces in large numbers to the point that the price of spiderlings drops dramatically.
_	However, the film has been criticized for its many inaccuracies in portraying Hitler's temperament and related events, to the point that it has been likened to fiction.
_	"The Times" arts and entertainment writer Ian Johns described the 2006 British documentary "The Trouble with Atheism" as "reiterating the point that the dogmatic intensity of atheists is the secular equivalent of the blinkered zeal of fanatical mullahs and biblical fundamentalists".
_	If no score had been registered, this would usually result in a downfield free kick; but, under the circumstances, it meant that Baker was given the option of letting the point that he'd scored stand (ensuring a draw would result) or cancelling the point and having a set shot for goal from the same place.
_	Krupp and Fairall find other problems with the claims, including the point that if the Sphinx is meant to represent the constellation of Leo, then it should be on the opposite side of the Nile (the 'Milky Way') from the pyramids ('Orion'), that the vernal equinox around 10,500 BCE was in Virgo and not Leo, and that the constellations of the Zodiac originate from Mesopotamia and were unknown in Egypt at the time.
_	The Cheyenne verb system is very complex and verb constructions are central to the morphosyntax of the language, to the point that even adjectives and even some nouns are largely substantive in nature.
_	He has found the Knight Sabers a few Genom-related contracts, and Sylia trusts him to the point that he knows her true identity.
_	And Hull's league form was steadily deteriorating to the point that relegation to the Conference was looking a real possibility – which surely would have meant the death of the club.
_	The accident leaves Cassie racked with guilt and emotionally vulnerable to the point that she begins hallucinating strange visions and waking-dreams, even though Cassie's friends Annabel (Eliza Dushku) and Matt (Wes Bentley), as well as a local priest called Father Jude (Luke Wilson), all attempt to assist her in coping with the loss.
_	During this trip the stormy relations between Jones and Pallenberg deteriorated to the point that she left Morocco with Richards.
_	When an old woman intrudes on their conversation, Bosola’s insults turn on her, calling her hideous to the point that no amount of make-up would help.
_	In particular, this argument is based on the point that Ernst Zermelo and John von Neumann give distinct, and completely adequate, identifications of natural numbers with sets (this argument is called Benacerraf's identification problem).
_	In 1995, her drug problems had developed to the point that she gave a "disastrous" performance at the Met in "Aïda", where she recalled that she could not hit a note at one point during the performance.
_	She is convicted of murder and sentenced to die by guillotine, but a voiceover at the end tells us that her sentence was commuted by degrees to the point that she ultimately left prison, married, and had five children.
_	There is also a globally accepted theory that is which brings upon the point that colonisation of most of Remote Oceania after 3250–3100 cal BP was enabled by vegetative forms of cultivation and plants characteristic of the New Guinea region.
_	"The songs are based in the pop tradition, with melody proudly taking center stage, but the tidy and immaculately composed classical arrangements and the subtle electronic flourishes give the whole thing a much grander feel that immediately drives home the point that these folks can’t be contained by small stages for very long, neither literally nor figuratively.
_	Again and again he hammered home the point that paranormal claims rest upon arguments from ignorance."
_	The majority of reviewers raised the point that the novel was poorly concluded and lacked a climax and interest at events such as the discovery of Renn's true parents and the destruction of Yashra's palace.
_	1986 was also the year that WHUD began to equal out the vocal/instrumental ratio to the point that by early 1990 it was an even split.
_	Disagreements grew between the two, to the point that Tillier fired Sibley.
_	The P227 uses a double row magazine for increased ammunition capacity and is very slightly larger to the point that it is not very noticeable.
_	The narrator makes the point that skywriting the information would be no more effective in making it public.
_	Her "autobiographical memory" was extremely accurate to the point that she remembered every day of her life in detail (with some exceptions).
_	According to the life course approach, individual life course and trajectories do not develop in an empty space but they are nested into a wider social and historical context at the point that ignoring such context would lead to partial and sometimes misleading interpretations of social phenomena.
_	She felt threatened to the point that she drew up a will at a center for victims of domestic violence.
_	The panelists interview and scrutinize down to the tiniest detail the applicant to the point that almost half of them would not even make it to the apprenticeship program.
_	His mother has smothered and sheltered him his whole life, to the point that he is awkward and socially inept, especially around people his own age.
_	By 2010, however, the platform decking had deteriorated to the point that it could no longer be used even by CTA personnel.
_	During filming with wet roads, several cars lost control to the point that one driver broke his shoulder bone and another nearly careened into the upstairs window of a house.
_	Matters deteriorated to the point that Ferdinand recalled Diego in 1514.
_	US Special Forces sent to capture them usually were killed or returned with heavy casualties to the point that teams refused to go.
_	The Government repeatedly made the point that they had been advised by the police that 90 days was a necessary term of detention to prevent terrorism:
_	By the 17th century, water pump designs had improved to the point that they produced measurable vacuums, but this was not immediately understood.
_	Following Hannah's departure, the two have begun to reconnect, to the point that, during a case that saw the two trapped in an elevator during a blackout for several hours, Booth and Brennan admitted that they are each interested in a relationship, but require more time to sort out their own feelings before they make such a commitment.
_	Hemanth Kumar of "The Times of India" rated the film 3.5 out of 5 and wrote ""Gopala Gopala" begins as a story about an atheist, who seems to offend a lot of people around him, and in the end, the film drives home the point that when you help others, it is as good as worshiping God himself.
_	According to "New York Times" reviewer Anita Gates, "the production easily makes the point that ethnicity is transcended by the humanity of frightened, imperfect people facing unpleasant realities."
_	The drought raised that salinity even more, to the point that it could be tasted in well water.
_	Hoyt was also worried that the manner of his appointment and Senate confirmation would prejudice the citizens of Idaho Territory against him to the point that he could not effectively serve.
_	The tragic family loss was not lost on the British to the point that the British government decided to reimburse don Diego part of his economic losses due to the sinking of the "Mercedes".
_	Many English-speaking families left to form a separate parish in 1846, but Emanuel continued growing to the point that division was necessary by the end of the 1850s.
_	Only a few mentioned the point that, as the Dallas Morning News put it, one should “not assume that nationalism is inevitably anti-American,” and the New Republic was unusual in adding that “American blindness ... has driven many people particularly Asians, towards communism.”
_	However, competition with rival Kintetsu hurt ridership on the line over the years to the point that some even proposed selling or abandoning the line at times.
_	Nuclear decommissioning is the administrative and technical process whereby a nuclear facility such as a nuclear power plant (NPP), a research reactor, an isotope production plant, a particle accelerator, or uranium mine is dismantled to the point that it no longer requires measures for radiation protection.
_	Expanding on the accounts of Albert of Aix, Peter the Hermit is given prominence in the preaching of the First Crusade, to the point that it was he, not Pope Urban II, who originally conceived the crusade.
_	However, the church attendance rapidly grew, to the point that the building needed to expand.
_	She is one of the most influential writers in Catholicism, to the point that she is one of only four women to be declared a doctor of the Church.
_	However, there are other economists that argue "depression continues up until the point that the activity has returned to its original state".
_	They emphasised the point that an easement is not a personal right, it belongs to land, it attaches to dominant land for the benefit of that land.
_	But it is real, widespread, and substantial to the point that it can decide elections".
_	With President Ronald Reagan's support, Cecil prevails, his reputation growing to the point that he and his wife are invited by the Reagans to be guests at a state dinner.
_	Continued migration of Mormon settlers into the territory, with their tendency to vote as a unified block, worried Wolfley to the point that he called them "a most dangerous and unscrupulous factor in politics".
_	The A7V was something of a bane for German tank crews to the point that the Germans actually preferred to fight in captured British specimens instead of their own designs.
_	However, after the entire structure was inspected, it was found that most of the original construction mortar for the Nave had been made using high proportions of sand and lime, with only a little cement, and that this mortar had deteriorated to the point that it was not much more than sand.
_	However, as the series progresses, less and less enemies are immune to her power as it grows to the point that even
_	On the point that the song sounds like a cover itself, Rosen asked, "who wants to listen to an original song on a television show that relies on covers unless it sounds like a cover itself?"
_	Recognition of its significance gradually increased to the point that it is now routinely cited in biology books.
_	The use of religious images in general continued to increase up to the end of the 7th century, to the point that in 695, upon assuming the throne, Byzantine emperor Justinian II put an image of Christ on the obverse side of his gold coins, resulting in a rift which ended the use of Byzantine coin types in the Islamic world.
_	Punk documented in an out-of-character interview a year later on how he was constantly reminded to make Reigns look "really, really strong" in the match at TLC to the point that Punk requested to lose the match, which was rejected.
_	He also stressed the point that the majority of ISPs don't block the torrent protocol.
_	In 2004, according to Robert Charles, assistant secretary of state for the INL, aerial eradication efforts were getting close to the point that continued suppression of the drug crops would convince growers that continued cultivation will be futile.
_	Many of the obituaries made the point that Barrymore fell short of his potential.
_	Instead, the requirements for naturalization has been steadily lowered for Zainichi to the point that only criminal records or affiliation to North Korea would be a hindrance for naturalization.
_	However, many khachkars were destroyed from this period onward to the point that only 5,000 were counted standing in 1903–1904.
_	In colonial times, Capt. George Vancouver gave several head of cattle to the Hawaiian king, Pai`ea Kamehameha, monarch of the Hawaiian Kingdom, and by the early 19th century, they had multiplied considerably, to the point that they were wreaking havoc throughout the countryside.
_	Within the hour, the situation on board had worsened to the point that the pumps could no longer hold their own against the in-rushing water.
_	Since it left his mind incapable of separating his own personality from those of his ancestors', Clay became mentally unstable to the point that he ultimately committed suicide.
_	However, these retail changes were accompanied by a degradation of the mall's physical appearance, which had deteriorated to the point that its owner, Glimcher Realty Trust, labeled the mall a "fixer-upper".
_	Race makes the point that the communist victory in Long An was accomplished primarily in the pre-military phase (before 1960) of the Vietnam War by gaining the support of landless, poor, and middle-class peasants.
_	By 1868, his condition had progressed to the point that he was admitted to St. Elizabeths Hospital, a lunatic asylum (as mental hospitals were then called) in Washington, D.C. After eighteen months he showed no improvement.
_	Wilfrid, always short of money, made a number of attempts to get Lady Anne to sign control or ownership of her portion of Crabbet to him, going so far at one point as to alienate Judith and her mother to the point that Lady Anne disinherited Judith (though she wisely chose not to favour Wilfred).
_	Conflict between Mormons and the U.S. government escalated to the point that, in 1890, Congress disincorporated the LDS Church and seized most of its assets.
_	Among writings to support Symmachus, "Gesta de Xysti purgatione" narrated a decision by Sixtus III, who cleared his name from defamation and permanently excommunicated the offender; "Gesta de Polychronii episcopi Hierosolynitani accusatione" concerned a purely apocryphal simonical Bishop of Jerusalem "Polychronius", who claimed Jerusalem as the first see and his supremacy over other bishops; "Gesta Liberii papae" concerned mass baptisms carried out by Pope Liberius during his exile from the seat of Peter; "Sinuessanae synodi gesta de Marcellino" recounted the accusation brought against Pope Marcellinus, that in the company of the Emperor Diocletian he had offered incense to the pagan gods, making the point that when Marcellinus eventually confessed to the misdeed it was declared that the pope had condemned himself, since no one had ever judged the pontiff, because the first see will not be judged by anyone.
_	The unusual stability of the helium-4 nucleus is also important cosmologically: it explains the fact that in the first few minutes after the Big Bang, as the "soup" of free protons and neutrons which had initially been created in about 6:1 ratio cooled to the point that nuclear binding was possible, almost all first compound atomic nuclei to form were helium-4 nuclei.
_	"That's probably the greatest thing about Warhol: the way he penetrated and summarized our world, to the point that distinguishing between him and our everyday life is basically impossible, and in any case useless."
_	This was the common tradition from the 10th century onward, to the point that Jubb Yussef served as a geographical landmark in the region:
_	During the 1960s, they expanded to the point that they were open six months a year (they serve about 50,000 people per season), not three, and the dining room is now three times the original size.
_	Although he is a former alcoholic, he appears to have his condition well in hand, to the point that he can keep alcohol at home to serve to the people he entertains.
_	Feynman and Albert Hibbs suggested that certain repair machines might one day be reduced in size to the point that it would be possible to (as Feynman put it) "swallow the doctor".
_	In the lead-up to the broadcast of the second series, the entire first series was repeated, helping to generate a critical buzz around the programme, to the point that millions of viewers were waiting to discover the ultimate resolutions to the various plot-lines and generating front-page newspaper coverage.
_	Roosevelt's father contracted malaria and a serious infection resulting from a minor leg wound, weakening him to the point that he considered taking a fatal dose of morphine rather than being a burden to his companions.
_	Playing in the point that touches the most others (four in the "plus sign" - center point, three in the "bulky five" - the one point in the square touching the outside point) will give the desired result to whoever does so.
_	Over time, wadi deposits may become "Inverted Wadis" where the presence at one time of underground water caused vegetation and sediment to fill in the wadi's eroded channel, to the point that previous washes appear as ridges running through desert regions.
_	Many raised the point that ADEs are not typical workplaces and provide significantly more support and opportunities than open employment workplaces.
_	Recent studies have shown that islet transplantation has progressed to the point that 58% of the people in one study were insulin independent one year after the operation.
_	Haldane made the point that various common water-related organic compounds have ammonia-related analogs; for instance the ammonia-related amine group (-NH) is analogous to the water-related hydroxyl group (-OH).
_	He was also known for his spookiness, however, to the point that crowds hushed themselves when he was performing.
_	What followed is a series of inventions and improvements that refined the instrument to the point that its accuracy exceeded that which was required for determining longitude.
_	The calcification of the splint is usually a permanent blemish, though over a period of many years, the excess calcification may be reabsorbed to some degree, occasionally to the point that the splint is no longer visible.
_	This approach overlooks the point that evolution is not a teleological process, but a passive, consequential and undirected biological process, where environmental variations and drift effects are present alongside random gene mutations and natural selection.
_	Resistance was totally crushed by General Rodolfo Graziani in the 1930s and the country was again controlled by the Italians with the help of Arab fascists, to the point that many Libyan colonial troops fought on the side of Italy between 1940 and 1943: two divisions of Libyan colonial troops were created in the late 1930s and 30,000 native Libyans fought for Italy during World War II.
_	Combining thermodynamics and the changes brought about by cosmic expansion, one can calculate the fraction of protons and neutrons based on the temperature at the point that the universe cooled enough to allow formation of nuclei.
_	(A jump is like a “call”, i.e. the point that was jumped from is remembered.)
_	Sandy Pearlman, who produced the original album, was not a big fan of Joe Strummer's voice, to the point that he ensured the drums were mixed louder than the lead singer's vocals on the entire album.
_	Economic decline had forced the successive sultans to raise taxations to the point that Tuareg clans were abandoning Kano.
_	Kathy Sierra, author of the blog "Creating Passionate Users", was the target of threats and misogynistic insults to the point that she canceled her keynote speech at a technology conference in San Diego, fearing for her safety.
_	The front end of the Glass Train was crushed to the point that it was pushed back into the train, and the motor bogie was so damaged that it was completely irrepairable, meaning that the trainset will not be able to drive ever again, unless a new motor bogie is reconstructed, however at a high unaffordable price.
_	As governor of Hangzhou, Bai Juyi realised that the farmland nearby depended on the water of West Lake, but, due to the negligence of previous governors, the old dike had collapsed and the lake had dried out to the point that the local farmers were suffering from severe drought.
_	The former proved especially successful, to the point that when a larger armored fire-control tower and standard bridge was proposed for the "Nevada" class, it was rejected in favor of a roomier bridge like that of "Florida".
_	According to the German newspaper "Die Zeit", the failings exposed at Bad Nenndorf resulted in the conditions of prisoners elsewhere in Germany being improved to the point that they were better treated than the civilian population.
_	Normally, inflammation can usually be controlled within one to two weeks, using a nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drug and subacromial steroid injections to decrease inflammation, to the point that pain has been significantly decreased to make stretching tolerable.
_	A number of Moraes' editorials had earned the ire of Prime Minister Indira Gandhi and the situation deteriorated to the point that a retreat to London became the best course.
_	The doctors and nurses of Mercy Hospital worked as a team to the point that, as nurses describes their duties; they said that until the doctor arrived, the emergency room nurse was the doctor.
_	PENS is a neo-Nazi organization created in Barcelona in 1970 and that had strong links with the secret services of the Superior Center of Defense Information (SECED), to the point that he could pay a local and print large runs of Nazi propaganda.
_	Chinese: 桃形挂牌; Pinyin: "táo xíng guà pái") are peach-shaped Chinese numismatic charms used to wish for longevity, as longevity has traditionally due to Confucianism always been valued very highly to the point that Chinese Emperors would write the character for longevity () to those of the lowest social class if they had reached high ages, and in Chinese culture this was seen to be among the greatest gifts, for this reason this character often appears on peach charms and other Chinese numismatic charms.
_	These explanations underscore the point that while good forestry legislation is necessary, it is obviously not sufficient.
_	DOT continued to remake the road in Westchester, where 90,000 vehicles used the parkway on an average day, reconfiguring exits, widening the roadways and putting asphalt over the original concrete, to the point that most of the parkway in the county bore little resemblance to its original appearance.
_	Ryan C. Benson, the winner of the program’s first season, publicly admitted that "he dropped some of the weight by fasting and dehydrating himself to the point that he was urinating blood".
_	Chamorro's presidency saw decreasing US interest in Nicaragua to the point that when Chamorro traveled to the US in April 1991 to ask Congress for more economic aid, few members even showed up to listen to her.
_	She then confides in Russell that she and her friends don't expect Glen to follow through with his trip to America, to the point that they've started a bet.
_	"The tea cultivation begun there [India] in the nineteenth century by the British, however, has accelerated to the point that today India is listed as the world's leading producer, its 715,000 tons well ahead of China's 540,000 tons, and of course, the teas of Assam, Ceylon (from the island nation known as Sri Lanka), and Darjeeling are world famous.
_	The electric fine motion control rod design greatly enhances positive actual control rod position and similarly reduces the risk of a control rod drive accident to the point that no velocity limiter is required at the base of the cruciform control rod blades.
_	In the ad, Louisiana resident and veteran Evan Wolf makes the point that the necessity of using the Guard to help clean up efforts takes the military away from critical national security missions.
_	The importance of Agnone grew during the Angevin and also in the Aragonese reigns to the point that during the reign of the Bourbons of the Two Sicilies, the city was among the 56 royal towns, that reported directly to the King, and was free from any other type of feudal subjection.
_	The handwriting is good, indicating that it was written by a professional scribe, but the text is full of errors – to the point that the Greek does not make sense in places.
_	During this period, Gambit found he had an uncontrollable amount of energy flowing through him, to the point that he could not withstand it.
_	As water evaporates during the dry season, salinity levels increase to the point that salt-loving microorganisms begin to thrive.
_	In 1928 he recovered enough to the point that he could resume teaching.
_	J made the point that the rules on administration were intended to be "a more flexible, cheaper and comparatively informal alternative to liquidation" and so with regard to doing what is expedient "the fewer applications which need to be made to the court the better."
_	The Man with a Beard But No Hair is a high-voiced man who has no background history, but is said to be villainous to the point that even Count Olaf fears him.
_	The Oliver Gascoigne family originated at the point that Richard Oliver, originally of Castle Oliver, Limerick, Ireland, inherited the fortune of Sir Thomas Gascoigne of Parlington Hall, Yorkshire, in 1810.
_	It is at the point that a chimney is formed through which radioactive fallout may reach the surface.
_	Hammer appeared in major marketing campaigns for companies such as Pepsi, KFC, Toshiba and Taco Bell to the point that he was criticized as a "sellout".
_	The Catholic Encyclopaedia make the point that the oath and the penalties were so severe that it stopped the efforts of the Gallicanizing party among the English Catholics, who had been ready to offer forms of submission similar to the old oath of Allegiance, which was condemned anew about this time by Pope Innocent X.
_	The texture is much more viscous and thick than regular milk, and the odor is really strong, to the point that it smells almost spoiled.
_	Whereas black respondents saw anti-black racism as a continuing problem, white ones tended to see such racism as a thing of the past, to the point that they saw prejudice against white people as being more prevalent.
_	He frequently came under scrutiny from his constituents in the meadow; it somehow got to the point that Hodge-Podge would honk Bedfellow's nose every time that the man spoke (for talking "bull patties").
_	With the increasing power of computers and widespread use of CCD cameras, digital PIV has become increasingly common, to the point that it is the primary technique today.
_	The name has long been a source of amusement and double entendres, to the point that the catering staff of Flintshire County Council decided in 2009 to rename it to "Spotted Richard" because of all the jokes they were receiving.
_	The relationship between the pair was great enough to the point that Pedro II also granted Viçoso with the Order of the Rose (with the rank of officer) and the Order of Christ.
_	By the beginning of 2003, his condition had worsened to the point that he had to undergo anterior cervical discectomy and fusion surgery at Wellington Hospital, London.
_	Within the bindu, the point that forms a part of the letter, is Brahma.
_	By 1844, these venues fell out of fashion, as customers grew tired of the 'smelly' ice substitute, and it was only thirty years later, that refrigeration technology developed to the point that natural ice could finally be feasibly used in the rink.
_	His holiness was observed in his life enough to the point that the faithful started to press the competent ecclesial authorities to launch the process for sainthood with the informative phase of the investigation ending on 11 July 1716; the formal introduction to the cause came under Pope Innocent XIII on 3 July 1723.
_	The contract mainly emphasized the point that gang members had to swear allegiance to the gang, to never cooperate with police, and most importantly, according to Thai, to never undertake criminal action without the permission of the local gang underboss.
_	While this tactic worked, to the point that Nagar also reached the puzzle phase, Sar Mayee still managed to finish the puzzle first and win.
_	The terrain feature called Doubleup Hollow at the point that steep ascent began is indicative of the technique of doubling up the wagon teams that was required to get wagons over the worst part of the climb.
_	Cuba and Puerto Rico prospered to the point that Spain's first train was between Havana and Camagüey, and the first telegraph in Latin America was in Puerto Rico, established by Samuel Morse, whose daughter lived there with her husband.
_	As Fry is immune to the Dark Ones' psionic powers he alone can save it from Leo Wong's plans to turn it into a golf course, and from the Dark Ones, who have evolved to the point that no one knows what they look like.
_	Upon Jess' return, he realizes the problem, takes charge, and tension again mounts to the point that Jane fears for her father's safety.
_	The leaching vats were located in a large room near the entrance, but this room is damp and the wooden vats have deteriorated to the point that they are difficult to recognize.
_	Before 1998, such ballots were counted up to the point that the numbering stopped or became non-consecutive, and were then classified as exhausted.
_	The team's report was a long list of mismanagement to the point that budgets were "effectively meaningless as a financial management tool."
_	She is used by the series' writers to say things no other character would, to the point that Morris considers some of her lines nonsensical.
_	Militarily, Greece itself declined to the point that the Romans conquered the land (168 BC onwards), though Greek culture would in turn conquer Roman life.
_	During the course of her lifetime, King's name was mispronounced to the point that it bothered her.
_	In 1835, pressure on the missionaries had increased to the point that the entire LMS team left the island.
_	Michael Kidd, the choreographer, had conflicts with costume designer Irene Sharaff and Kelly, to the point that he and Kelly were no longer on speaking terms.
_	In men like Jeremiah, the divine word is incarnated to the point that the prophet shares in the divine suffering and God shares in the prophets suffering.
_	The lives of the prophets are tied up in the divine life to the point that they embody the word of God in their lives as well as their words.
_	In general, theory will agree well with observation up to the point that enough data have been generated to expose latent biases.
_	Although very large vessels, such as the ships delivering cars and other motor vehicles from factories in Asia, call at Hamilton, recent years have seen an increase in the size of the cruise ships which visit Bermuda to the point that none can fit through the channel into Hamilton Harbour (in past, only the very largest ocean liners, like the QE2 and the Canberra, were unable to enter, being forced to use an anchorage beyond the Great Sound).
_	Mortimer Collier, the Honorary secretary of Plymouth CC was making the point that the team put out against Tavistock was in fact, a 2nd XI (and not a full strength one at that) as Plymouth had not accepted a 1st team challenge and that until Tavistock proved they could beat Plymouth’s 2nd XI, Plymouth would not accept a match against their 1st team (the corresponding match in 1859 had seen Plymouth IIs beat Tavistock 1st team).
_	Though not the first painting by Jean Metzinger to employ the concept of multiple perspective—three years had passed since he first propounded the idea in "Note sur la peinture", published in 1910—"L'Oiseau bleu" arguably exemplifies the extreme, a maxima, a "summum bonum" of such pictorial processes, while still maintaining elements of recognizable form; the extreme activity of geometric faceting visible in "L'Oiseau bleu" is not frenzied to the point that any understandable link between physicality or naturalness is lost.
_	The scope of predicatively founded mathematics, while less than that of the commonly accepted Zermelo-Fraenkel theory, is much greater than that of constructive mathematics, to the point that Solomon Feferman has said that "all of scientifically applicable analysis can be developed [using predicative methods]".
_	In 2009, the presence of the American journalism industry had declined to the point that several newspaper corporations were filing for bankruptcy, resulting in less direct competition between newspapers within the same circulation area.
_	As they would explain in their eponymous episode, however, they cannot be separated for too long, or else their energies will build to the point that they become unstable, and their super-speed would have a cataclysmic effect on the planet.
_	Cregga has an intense hatred for Damug Warfang and his Rapscallion army, to the point that she abruptly takes fully half of the Long Patrol, 500 fighting hares, and relentlessly pursues Damug across many leagues.
_	This had the effect of multiplying the effectiveness of the RAF to the point that it was as if they had three times as many fighters, allowing them to defeat the larger German force.
_	This was due to the plant's location at the lower part of the stream, between Norrfors and Klabböle, where the water cools off to the point that it becomes supercooled.
_	Capcom senior community manager Seth Killian has found the character too powerful to the point that his constant defeats with him led him to quit the "Tekken" series.
_	The foreign exchange reserves had dried up to the point that India could barely finance three weeks worth of imports.
_	She seems to sit on neutral ground with him, to the point that Katana rescues her from being ganged up on in a bad part of town.
_	Around the same time, analysis conducted by the Livermore National Laboratory and RAND Corporation at Teller's instruction found that the seismic effect of an underground test could be artificially dampened (referred to as "decoupling") to the point that a 300-kiloton detonation would appear in seismic readings as a one-kiloton detonation.
_	Paul's sister Jane also started doting on Johnny to the point that Auntie Jane also started spoiling him.
_	The ship was further damaged by a storm to the point that Pedersen and her crew were forced to abandon her and seek refuge aboard the "Belvedere".
_	Grade 2 sprains occur when the ligament is stretched to the point that it becomes loose; this is also referred to as a partial tear.
_	In the northern woods trees are exposed to the most sunlight and heat on the southwest facing side, so this side is heated during warm sunny winter days to the point that it can be awoken from dormancy.
_	With increasing competition from buses and personal transport usage declined to the point that by the early 1980s the line was no longer considered a viable transport link.
_	The film was heavily re-cut, to the point that some of the narrative became almost incomprehensible.
_	The production rate for a particular nuclide is a function of geomagnetic latitude, the amount of sky that can be seen from the point that is sampled, elevation, sample depth, and density of the material in which the sample is embedded.
_	This angered White to the point that he threatened to quit.
_	Furthermore, he interprets a wealth of empirical studies to make the point that Christians (with others) need to attend to the values operative within these empirical studies.
_	He recalls that they were miserable since their Christmas holiday had been cut short to shoot the video, and spent most of the day on the dark and cold set drinking, to the point that he was "half cut" by the time the last scenes were shot.
_	The rear wing on Stommelen's Embassy Hill broke, sending him into the barrier, ironically at the point that his own mechanics had worked on.
_	The more transactions involved, the more difficult they are to detect, to the point that transaction processing systems find there is a practical limit to the deadlocks they can detect.
_	According to Foner, Twain used the conduct of Ament to "drive home the point that the missionary movement served as a front for imperialism.
_	Despite its more limited signal, Q100 grew to the point that it often received higher Arbitron listenership ratings than several of its 100,000-watt competitors, including sister station 99X.
_	The popularity of Yancey's 1997 book "What's So Amazing About Grace?" helped boost the sales of "Reaching for the Invisible God" to the point that it appeared on religion bestseller lists immediately upon publication.
_	But Zanna finds that everyone is now heterosexual, and that no one can remember what life was like before the spell, to the point that Zanna himself is ostracized.
_	When confronted with the point that the Jews in Iran are not Israelis, she simplifies her argument, offering a big smile and saying, "I don't know...
_	The issue of the ownership of the MERS system is blurred between the entities to the point that courts tend to confuse the eRegistry system with the nominee because they use the same "MERS" acronym.
_	When the scandal first broke, the reaction was that Jackson's reputation was sullied to the point that his viability as a senatorial candidate was diminished.
_	As tensions mounted, the environment around the fort increasingly resembled a siege, to the point that the South Carolina authorities placed picket ships to observe the movements of the troops and threatened to attack when forty rifles were transferred to one of the harbor forts from the U.S. arsenal in the city.
_	Nelson was noted for his considerable ability to inspire and bring out the best in his men, to the point that it gained a name "The Nelson Touch".
_	Considered for a long time prior to the 2005 election as the Alliance's unique candidate, as the contest drew nearer, however, his public persona began to lose credibility, perhaps due to a mediocre mayorship of the Santiago municipality the previous years, and his candidacy began to lose steam, to the point that it was called into question.
_	She also expressed regret for taking advice from Nakagawa, making the point that Nakagawa isn't even from America but Brazil.
_	As a testament to the danger of the tests in which he is used—often resulting in his being broken into pieces, burnt, or otherwise mutilated—Buster has had to be extensively repaired and rebuilt over the course of the series to the point that the episode "Buster Special" was devoted to his being completely redesigned and rebuilt as "Buster 2.0".
_	In 1993, during the Oslo peace process, Nasrallah and several other top Hezbollah generals came out staunchly opposed to any final peace agreement between the Israelis and Palestinians to the point that they accused Palestinian National Authority President Yasser Arafat of blasphemy and treachery to the Muslim people.
_	He went on to argue that simple preclusion of a defense witness was too extreme a penalty for a discovery violation, to the point that it "subverts criminal justice by basing convictions on a partial presentation of the facts".
_	Near the end of the decade, the southern terminus was truncated again to the point that it was in 1954.
_	The structure is based on two parabolic concrete arches which lean over to the point that they are closer to being parallel to the ground than they are to being vertical.
_	Times New Roman, the development of which Morison led to the point that he felt he could consider it his own design, has become one of the most used typefaces of all time.
_	Relations between Rome and Byzantium worsened to the point that Pope Martin I excommunicated the Patriarch Sergius and the Monothelite heretics, but was arrested, deported to Constantinople and eventually exiled to Cherson in Crimea where he died in 655.
_	Reflecting on his career as a detective, Holmes (Ian McKellen) comments that Watson took considerable latitude in writing up the cases for publication, to the point that he views the finished products as little more than "penny dreadfuls."
_	Bóveda was greatly involved in this project, to the point that Castelao considered him the person "without whom there would have not been a Statute".
_	The previous lane alignment was dangerous and created congestion, as lane shifts were often required to avoid a left sided exit-only lane; moreover, the concrete supports deteriorated to the point that steel shoring are needed to reinforce the intersection's many bridges.
_	In a study of injecting drug users, 53% of a group of 914 candidates reported that methamphetamine was their first drug injected into their bodies; however, the study continued to convey the point that it is a young adults' drug.
_	As they get to know each other after a rocky start, Ira and Margo hit it off to the point that she offers to become his new partner.
_	With relatively simple, and relatively smooth waveshaping functions (sin(a*x), atan(a*x), polynomial functions, for example), this procedure may reduce aliased content in the harmonic signal to the point that it is musically acceptable.
_	Failure will occur if the body of the engine is allowed to reach too high a temperature; either the engine will physically fail, or any lubricants used will degrade to the point that they no longer protect the engine.
_	It was the biggest bank robbery in the history of the People's Republic of Poland, to the point that the Polish government for a while considered withdrawing all 50-złoty and 100-złoty bills from the market, which would help find the robbers.
_	Meyer was also a German patriot and one of the Jews who refused to believe that the rise to power of the Nazi party constituted a danger, to the point that he even returned to Germany in 1938 after a journey to the United States with his wife.
_	Dawkins declares that there was no first person, to make the point that evolutionary biologists use the term "species" to demark differences in gene composition — over often thousands of generations of separation — rather than from any one generation to the next.
_	Food ties people together, and Shange makes the point that "Our food isn't reflective of our lack of culture, it is, in fact, the very opposite - it's the foundation from which we grow and continue to thrive."
_	The essay makes the point that to establish an American identity people need to break away from Europe, from its history, its politics, and its culture.
_	Here Martí makes the point that for America to succeed it must use the knowledge and history that pertains to it and that European ideas were not formed in America and therefore do not take into account the realities of this American continent.
_	During this time Abyss turned on Hogan and went on a rampage, which included attacking the TNA World Heavyweight Champion Rob Van Dam to the point that he was forced to vacate the title, all the while claiming that he was controlled by some entity, that was coming to TNA.
_	The company's motto is Beer is Culture, a play on the cultural significance of beer and brewing, as well as the point that yeast is, in fact, a culture.
_	The close proximity between the two begins to set off gossip and suspicions, to the point that a monsignor from the diocese (Bolger) comes to give Father Rivard a talking-to.
_	The title and central conceit of a family struggling to "keep up" with the neighbors resonated with its audience, to the point that the phrase "keeping up with the Joneses" became a common catchphrase.
_	At the suggestion of Biker inmate Jaz Hoyt almost every inmate group donates to send Alex Jr. to his destination- to the point that Rebadow's family can afford to send him.
_	It is later revealed that she is a lesbian, and some episodes of the eleventh season put emphasis on this, to the point of satirically portraying Jenny as a stereotypical lesbian who is uninterested in serious relationships and is content to have sex with any woman she meets, to the point that she is able to seduce (or "recruit") straight women (at one point, Walden claims that he didn't know one of Jenny's one-night-stands, who is his friend, was a lesbian, and Jenny responds "Neither did she until last week", insinuating that the woman was straight but Jenny made her gay), among them Walden's own mother (a running gag is Walden and Alan trying to keep their dates from meeting Jenny for this exact reason), though later in the series she abandons her promiscuous lifestyle and tries to find a steady lover.
_	Both narratives agree on the point that the Tamil culture is the source of all civilized culture in the world, and Tamil is the mother language of all other languages in the world.
_	Act II repeatedly attempts to drive home the point that Hitler feared Pius more than any of his contemporaries and that Pius's commercial interests preclude him from condemning Hitler.
_	The bow is the forward part of the hull of a ship or boat, the point that is usually most forward when the vessel is underway.
_	The survivors are able to fend off the normal zombies but the gigantic zombie is seemingly unstoppable to the point that even bullets do not faze it.
_	In the 21st Century it has increasingly taken up online media and multimedia, to the point that it has more visitors online than in person.
_	The third raid may have spared nearby Kokura from destruction, as Kokura was to be the primary target for the second atomic bomb the following day, but smoke from the fires in Yawata combined with cloud cover decreased visibility to the point that the secondary target of Nagasaki was bombed instead.
_	They strongly pushed the point that if the Union succumbed to the slavery ways, then they would not live in the world that they wanted to live in anymore.
_	The text can be seen to the point that it is clearly readable.
_	Moses and his supporters considered the book to be overwhelmingly biased against him, to the point that Moses put out a 23-page typed statement challenging some of its assertions (he claimed he never used the anti-Italian slurs the book attributes to him about Fiorello La Guardia, for instance) and what his supporters saw as a record of unprecedented accomplishment.
_	Sider makes the point that David Lewis feels he was forced to defend CT, due to modal realism.
_	After hearing the news, Cavendish claimed that no one could do the same job Renshaw had done for him the previous three years, reiterating the point that he believed Renshaw to be the best in the world at leading out a sprinter.
_	As was common with journalists who championed musical primitivism in the 1980s, Chusid considered outsiders more "authentic" than artists whose music is "exploited through conventional music channels" and "revised, remodeled, and re-coifed; touched-up and tweaked; Photoshopped and focus-grouped" by the time it reaches the listener, to the point that it is "Music by Committee".
_	Reportedly, Washington was shocked to discover that the violent war between the Crips, Bloods, and Hispanic gangs had escalated to the point that fighting using firearms, as opposed to fist fighting, was now normal.
_	Petitioner was "definitely insane, yes, sir," in 1920 and "has been insane at all times, at least since July, 1918, the time of this episode on the Marne"; that is, "to the point that he was unable to adapt himself.
_	Reciprocal teaching also follows a very scaffolded curve, beginning with high levels of teacher instruction, modeling, and input, which is gradually withdrawn to the point that students are able to use the strategies independently.
_	Thrasybulus led his force, which had already grown to the point that he could leave 200 men at Phyle while taking 1,000 with him, to Piraeus, the port of Athens.
_	As water leaves the faucet, the filament attached to the faucet begins to neck down, eventually to the point that the main droplet detaches from the surface.
_	After Tommy left, the Clancy Brothers began scaling back their busy touring schedule to the point that, by the mid-70s, they were touring only part of the year.
_	The criminals' actions worsened to the point that they made hostages of Melody Bell and Joe Fenton in order to force Daniel to repay them.
_	The words may or may not be grammatically correct, but are semantically confused to the point that the listener cannot extract any meaning from them.
_	Damming of the river upstream has impacted flows to the point that the River Wakefield now flows about once every five years.
_	Yet, they were meticulously corrected, to the point that very few differences in terms of the text itself can be observed among them.
_	Because her position was lost, its a possibility that she was barred from participating from philosophical discussions, to the point that she had to demand what were the new topics were from other philosophers whether they be of high status or not.
_	Her senses are further heightened to the point that she is able to smell a missing teammate nearly a mile away and underground.
_	Dave Meltzer reported that members of Roman Reigns' family were legitimately upset at the finish of the main event, writing that especially his father Leati/Sika was furious to the point that there was "nearly a bad scene".
_	The tea cultivation begun there [India] in the nineteenth century by the British, however, has accelerated to the point that today India is listed as the world's leading producer, its 715, 000 tons well ahead of China's 540, 000 tons, and of course, the teas of Assam, Ceylon (from the island nation known as Sri Lanka), and Darjeeling are world famous.
_	The uvular R has also been adopted in aspiring patricians in and around Oslo, to the point that it was for some time fashionable to "import" governesses from the Kristiansand area.
_	"Re Burley" was cited to make the point that since criminals can easily escape from the US to Canada, it had been "imperative that little leniency be accorded citizens in this regard."
_	With lances pointed, and making loud sounds and shouts, they made the royalist cavalry of "Tarija" disband at their charge, retreating over their own infantry and disorganizing it to the point that, almost without resistance, the rebel cavalry reached the enemy's rearguard.
_	Brands-owned restaurants within the city limits to the point that Taco Bell is down to one location on the city's west side in 2015.
_	It is situated near the point that the meandering Berg River flows into the sea at St. Helena Bay.
_	Conditions in the city deteriorated to the point that residents voted to temporarily disincorporate the city in 1869.
_	This emphasis on the relationship between anthropologists and those they study—the point that, while astronomers and stars; chemists and elements; botanists and plants are fundamentally different, anthropologists and those they study are equally human—implied that anthropologists themselves could be objects of anthropological study.
_	Everitt (2004) makes the point that professional philosophers are more interested in the grounds for giving or withholding assent to propositions:
_	She also recited the Sundiata Epic; her performances of this and other songs led to interest from French ethnomusicologists, and their recordings increased her popularity even further, to the point that she was better known than most male griots, even.
_	In "The International", he recovers that moment in Belfast's history just before the outbreak of the Troubles, to show diverse strands of city life around a city centre hotel, essentially to make the point that the political propagandists who explain their positions through history overlook its inconvenient complexity and the possibility that things might have turned out differently.
_	Changes within the top levels in the organization continued to the point that most remnants of the Busch era turned over.
_	Although they cannot be completely prevented, research suggests that with careful shaping of the vehicle the nuisance due to them may be reduced to the point that overland supersonic flight may become a practical option.
_	He reached high levels of popularity in the 1970s, while conducting the television series "Recitals Spectacular", to the point that one of his recordings in 1978 sold more than one million plates.
_	There’s little doubt he has a face in mind as he sings about the girl that got away, and then changes to the point that he doesn’t want her back anymore anyway."
_	This was the youngster's first proper bowl and it badly affected him and destroyed his confidence to bowl on Australian pitches where he could get little movement with the ball, to the point that Brown reserved him for the country matches after the Second Test.
_	Dorian and his lover Elliot, the first violinist of the quartet, have frequent outbursts, which have slowed the quartet’s progress to the point that Dorian is fired because he "steals" an expensive Lazara violin that was given to the group and is played by Elliot.
_	At the same time, Australian universities faced unprecedented demand for international student places, which Monash met on a larger scale than most, to the point that today around 30% of its students are from outside Australia.
_	This lack of emphasis on a single character was intentional, to the point that even Marth was not considered by Kaga to be the main character.
_	The equipment was perfected to the point that by 13 March 1914 a test transmission was successfully heard at the Eiffel Tower in Paris, France, about away.
_	His approach to nutrition made the point that it is an exact science, and can be accurately measured and tested.
_	In particular, they decided that they would not concede the point that smoking has adverse health effects and would instead attempt to create controversy, lest they be held legally liable for the deaths of smokers.
_	Jencks makes the point that Post-Modernism (like Modernism) varies for each field of art, and that for architecture it is not just a reaction to Modernism but what he terms "double coding":
_	The IDE has the capability of inferring a greater amount of context based on what the developer is typing, to the point that basic language constructs such as for and while are also included in the choice list.
_	But in March 1886 he was so overcome with nervous depression and became ill to the point that he had to return home in order to recover.
_	The relationship between Oscar and the Royals had soured to the point that Cincinnati had also approached the Lakers and Knicks about deals involving their star player (the Knicks players who were discussed in those scenarios are unknown, but Los Angeles stated publicly that the Royals asked about Jerry West and Wilt Chamberlain, with the Lakers saying they would not consider trading either star).
_	Rickover found himself frequently and loudly in bureaucratic combat with these senior naval officers, to the point that he almost missed becoming an admiral: two selection boards passed over Captain Rickover for promotion.
_	Although "BBW" may have been first used in the context of BBW Magazine, the term's usage spread over the years, to the point that even women who had never heard of the magazine began to refer to themselves as "BBWs".
_	Whereas most previous "Myst" titles had forgone 3D graphics rendered in real-time in favor of interactive prerendered environments, Rand Miller decided that technology had advanced to the point that "End of Ages" could use real-time graphics without sacrificing player immersion.
_	He made the point that EirGrid had not considered this scope of works whatsoever with relation to the areas of Mine workings in Lemgare, Lisdrumgormley & Annaglogh relative to their Proposed Development.
_	By 1839, the Catholic community in Wapakoneta had grown to the point that it could be created a separate parish, and the members built a small frame church on the southeastern corner of the intersection of Pearl and Blackhoof Streets near the city's downtown.
_	Several Reform politicians continued to attempt to reach out to Mackenzie, but he rebuffed all of them, to the point that by 1857, only David Christie still attempted to include Mackenzie in Reform Party plans.
_	Moreover, the time and frequency reassignment operations can be used to sharpen the representation by attributing the spectral energy reported by the short-time Fourier transform to the point that is the local center of gravity of the complex energy distribution.
_	She became intolerant to even slightest manifestations of anti-Semitism to the point that many Jews felt embarrassed by her overreaction.
_	As a result, Lucario can read the thoughts and movements of other beings by sensing the Aura that they emit, to the point that it can even see otherwise invisible foes.
_	An exception is a recent study comparing RT-qPCR, RT-LAMP, and RPA for detection of Schmallenberg virus and bovine viral diarrhea virus, which effectively makes the point that each amplification technique has strengths and weaknesses, which may vary by the target, and that the properties of the available amplification techniques need to be evaluated in combination with the requirements for each application.
_	Despite this, the now unknown source whom both Wyntoun and Bower relied on made the point that Fife deferred to his father on affairs of state emphasising the difference in styles in the guardianships of his two sons.
_	Needless possible Janicio marking the center of the court, to the point that there was no danger.
_	Thus, practice of these literacy skills were enforced in Jack’s household to the point that he acquired an aversion for several of them.
_	There were frequent calls for modification or repeal of the Orders, which damaged relations with the United States to the point that, by early 1812, the two nations were on the brink of war.
_	He goes on to point out that today the mechanism of invariance is sufficiently understood to the point that no non-physical principle ("biotonic law") is needed for its interpretation.
_	Some scholars have raised the point that widespread corruption among officials and royal court led to the public dissatisfaction and helped the Iranian Revolution.
_	When concentrations is too low catalyst activity is substantially decreased and polymerization enhanced to the point that it is difficult to maintain acid strength.
_	The hind (metathoracic) wings of scale insects are reduced, commonly to the point that they generally are overlooked.
_	Through his policies, significant health infrastructure has been built and access expanded in many areas of the country, while the costs have been lowered significantly for many people to the point that many medicines have already been distributed free of charge.
_	At the end of 1913, the chronically ill Post's health deteriorated to the point that he canceled public appearances, which prompted speculation in the press regarding his well-being.
_	In the 1980s, Michael Farber wrote in the "Montreal Gazette" that the "Star"s coverage was Toronto-centric to the point that any story was said to carry an explanation as to "What it means to Metro."
_	It goes something like this: (1) Spot an Israeli action that can serve as the ground of "criticism of Israel" (e.g., Israel's military incursion into the area near Jenin in April 2002 in response to Palestinian terrorist massacres); (2) Then "dissent" in the strongest possible terms, for instance by likening the "razing of Jenin" to the destruction of the Warsaw Ghetto, while anticipating that "powerful" and "repressive" Jewish institutions will try to "silence" the critics by calling them anti-Semites; (3) When taken to task by more sober-minded critics who find that, contrary to your charge, there was no such thing as "the razing of Jenin" and that the IDF has nothing in common with the SS, cry "foul" and claim their censure perfectly illustrates the point that there really is a Jewish organizational conspiracy to silence "criticism of Israel" by branding the authors of such criticism "antisemites".
_	Pedlar advertised that the metal ceilings reduced the risk of fire to the point that insurance companies would lower rates for houses so-equipped.
_	However, Friedlander pointed to the fact of the near total deportation of foreign Jews from France as contrasted with the majority of French Jews surviving the Holocaust, and made the point that if IBM's role was so essential, this may not have been the case.
_	In 1969 Voge detected a submerged Soviet submarine and used hold-down tactics on the sub to the point that she forced the sub to surface.
_	In 1920, a colt of Old Granny's named Nelson's Buck No. 2 impressed veterinarian Eric Christian to the point that Christian asked the Nelsons not to geld him.
_	This scheme has been refined to the point that the error margin in dates of rocks can be as low as less than two million years in two-and-a-half billion years.
_	However, her smothering tendencies enrage him to the point that he "make[s] a giant gesture that's really inappropriate" and proposes marriage in an attempt to repulse her.
_	As years went by the political influence of the "partido de San German" grew to the point that it challenged that of San Juan.
_	Robredo's first serve is not considered his weapon due to its lack of any significant pace, but it is not weak to the point that opponents can capitalise on it.
_	Although authors were encouraged to write, production of literature fell off to the point that in 1962 only forty-two novels were published.
_	The U.S. Air Force has actually increased mention of 'effects-based' thinking in official doctrine and has codified it in AF Doctrine Document 2. Lt Gen (Ret) Deptula makes the point that EBO is not service specific at all, and states, that "EBO can be a springboard for the better linking of military, economic, information, and diplomatic instruments of power to conduct security strategy in depth.
_	He has also made the point that on account of Basil's inner need to conflict with his wife's wishes, "Basil couldn't be Basil if he didn't have Sybil".
_	The Dutch literary establishment reacted negatively to Haighton's stewardship of the magazine, to the point that by 1943 "De Nieuwe Gids" had only 98 registered subscribers.
_	"Celestial Empire" is about an alternate history world where, using its Treasure Fleet, Imperial China was greatly expanded in size and role by later emperors to the point that the Chinese Empire is a space-faring superpower.
_	They believed that the alcohol trade led to innumerable social conflicts, “murders, violations, and monstrous unheard-of crimes” to the point that many native groups also wanted the trade stopped.
_	The cause of the breakup was determined to be that the plane's plywood outer skin was bonded to the ribs and spars with water-based aliphatic resin glue, and flight in rain had caused the bond to deteriorate to the point that sections of the plywood suddenly separated in flight.
_	The curses add a way for the players to naturally increase the difficulty to the point that suits them.
_	It did not fault the crew, instead criticizing Metro-North for failing to maintain the track and surrounding ballast to the point that the track went out of gauge.
_	4 = Somewhat upset to the point that you cannot easily ignore an unpleasant thought.
_	In it, he made the point that the Church's willingness to side with anti-socialist and conservative forces had led to its susceptibility for National Socialist ideology.
_	He felt that Arrow's "knocks" made the point that "Barry's superpowers are an amazing gift ... he must hone and perfect to become a truly heroic character."
_	Mkhedruli, in the 11th to 17th centuries also came to employ digraphs to the point that they were obligatory, requiring adherence to a complex system.
_	However, the Nazis had intimidated the other parties to the point that even if all 81 KPD deputies and 120 SPD deputies had been present, the Enabling Act would have still passed by more than the two-thirds majority required.
_	His practice is rooted in taking found objects and transforming them through physical and semantic changes to the point that they become ironic or poetic.
_	This may evolve into a new word, up to the point that the process is no longer recognized as onomatopoeia.
_	Polish, Chinese and Lebanese migrants would integrate fully into Costa Rican society with time to the point that many prominent Costa Ricans from industry, politics, arts, academy, etc. are of those descents.
_	Later that year, church headquarters sent a letter to local church leaders, stating that if women asked to be admitted to attend a general conference priesthood session in a stake center, the male leaders were "to inform them that the meeting is for men and that men are invited to attend", but since the church's meetinghouses "should be places of peace, not contention," if women "become insistent" about entering the priesthood session "to the point that their presence would be disruptive, please allow them to enter and view the conference."
_	A hydrolock occurs when a liquid fills a combustion chamber to the point that it is impossible to turn the crankshaft without a catastrophic failure of the engine or one of its vital components.
_	In the 1960s, the same café was one of the birthplaces of Argentine rock, to the point that the early hit "La balsa" starts with a reference to the washroom of "La Perla" (in author Tanguito's version).
_	With Iyasu's soldiers in a tense standoff with the Imperial guard, the situation deteriorated to the point that gunfire was exchanged, and the bedridden Emperor had to be moved to the cellars as his bedroom windows were shattered in the battle.
_	Lord Steyn posed the question, "That immediately raises the point that there must be an explanation for the fact that she contracted PDA4.
_	Over a century, the existence of kolintang became increasingly rarer to the point that they became virtually extinct.
_	However, from 1881 the Catholic population had swollen to the point that the priest from Montpelier was traveling to Barre to conduct worship for 31 families, initially in the town hall.
_	"Saturdays and Sundays have been packed to the point that our parking lot was just about full, which we would estimate to be 8,000 to 10,000 people," said park Marketing Director Mike Mefford.
_	He was never used in experiments, but for the next nine years, his home was a small cage, whose restricted size resulted in muscular atrophy to the point that Oliver's limbs trembled.
_	There is a fine balance between keeping the consumers interested in a product or brand, and annoying them to the point that they have no interest in supporting a company.
_	After a last siege by Louis XV, the city could finally breathe to the point that the fortifications were dismantled a few decades later.
_	Under the leadership of John L. Lancaster, the Texas and Pacific Railway experienced its height during the first half of the 20th century, and Marshall's ceramics industry expanded to the point that the city was called by boosters the "Pottery Capital of the World".
_	Three months later in February, 1938, Riggs’ popularity had grown to the point that he was named the “Voice of Lucky Strike,” and given a twenty-two year $550 per week contract.
_	Though the Orb's Monday night performances had only several hardcore followers initially, their chill-out room act grew popular over the course of their six-month stay to the point that the room was often packed with around 100 people.
_	Cimarrones would mount attacks on transport caravans, to the point that it was very disruptive to trade by the 1550s.
_	Only a few years after folk music fieldwork had begun to flourish, the commercial recording industry had developed to the point that recording Appalachian music for popular consumption had become a viable enterprise.
_	Styrke enjoyed the lyric to the point that they began forming the song around it, stating that the lyric "really set the tone for the whole thing".
_	He has raised the bar to the point that very few, if any who come after him, will ever achieve his success".
_	The Stenographer highlights the point that, for Maud to be able to produce milk pointed to the fact she is likely already pregnant.
_	Rediff.com criticized her commenting, "Genelia stands up yet again to prove the point that if you are pretty and well dressed, you can get away with anything, without acting."
_	Despite the extremes of the "buwaya", it is so sacred to the ancient Tagalogs to the point that killing one (with a tomb or none) is punishable by death.
_	The fire metaphor used in the Aggi-Vacchagotta Sutta (which is also used elsewhere) is a radical way of making the point that the liberated sage is beyond phenomenal experience.
_	In a pyramid, the vertex is the point that is part of all the lateral faces, or where all the lateral edges meet.
_	By 2002, the laboratory had expanded to the point that it received subsidies from the Canada Foundation for Innovation (CFI) and the Canadian Institutes of Health Research (CIHR), which gave added impetus to the work in progress, including projects involving the use of videoconferencing in the treatment of panic disorder with agoraphobia, and the use of virtual reality in the treatment of anxiety disorders.
_	Knowing how to mobilize the economic fabric of Neuchâtel to the point that "when a tunnel was digging in town, it meant, basically, that a new striker was going to sign with the club," he signed players like Heinz Hermann, Uli Stielike, Hossam Hassan, Lajos Detári, or coach Gilbert Gress.
_	However, given the fact that King is immortal, to the point that he has recovered from death almost instantly on numerous occasions, it seems improbable that he actually "permanently" died.
_	When a magnetized ferromagnetic material is heated to the Curie point temperature, the molecules are agitated to the point that the magnetic domains lose the organization, and the magnetic properties they cause cease.
_	Soon, her memory degraded to the point that she could not remember anything for more than a few seconds at a time, and Hiroyasu had to keep a constant watch on her to prevent her from wandering away.
_	His subsequent wanderings among desolate landscapes on the verge of reality are set in a closely detailed, and somehow Kafkaesque, atmosphere, undercutting the point that the most dreamlike occurrences are also the realest.
_	At the start of the war there were 40 boys and girls attending and these numbers increased to the point that a second school was opened at Aberlour House in 1947 by which time nearly 100 pupils were attending.
_	In a battle royal, all the wrestlers enter the ring to the point that there are 20-30 wrestlers in the ring at one time.
_	With southern Thailand attracting thousands more tourists every day, Dr Thon makes the point that the ecosystem is under threat and is fast disappearing.
_	However starting in 2011, "Days of Our Lives" started to lose ground significantly to the point that it sometimes occupied the last position among all soaps for both total viewership and the 18-49 women demographic.
_	With the commercial success of groups like Brownman Revival, Tropical Depression, and Hemp Republic, the Filipino reggae scene has seen more popularity, to the point that more reggae festivals are being introduced and expanded around the country.
_	However, this is arguably based on a complete misunderstanding of the novel, given that she equates it to the musical "Springtime for Hitler" (from the Mel Brooks film and later musical "The Producers"), missing the point that "Springtime for Hitler" is "a love-letter to Hitler" (in character Max Bialystock's words) and "Making History" is about trying to remove Hitler from history altogether.
_	According to Blackie Lawless, "Capitol had gotten to the point that they were no longer going to be the label that supported this kind of music."
_	The film was beset by tension on the unhappy set, with Barbra Streisand clashing with her costar Walter Matthau and director Gene Kelly; Kidd also had conflicts with costume designer Irene Sharaff and Kelly, to the point that he and Kelly were no longer on speaking terms.
_	As U.S. Government IT acquisitions have suffered a resurgence of legal disputes (protests) following a change in the applicable law, FEDSIM has become experienced in protest defense to the point that agencies seek its services for this reason.
_	However, eventually Charles' eyesight weakened to the point that she could no longer use a microscope but she continued writing.
_	Unfortunately, he is an incredibly peaceful and un-warlike individual to the point that he allows Cluny and Redtooth to enter the Abbey for a parley, an unforgivable error in strategy.
_	Sugunan's indifference when Bindu's mother dies drives home the point that she is just a non entity in her husband's life.
_	Despite his usual indifference to his friends and their actions, Jerry apparently is very satisfied with his life, to the point that he actually feels worried about anything that might threaten the group lifestyle.
_	Mollenard suddenly suffers from a collapse in his health, and comes increasingly under the domination of his detested wife – to the point that he considers shooting himself.
_	However, the Roman desire to hinder the kingship from becoming important went so far that, even in the area of religion, the king of sacrifices was formally, in all but protocol, subordinated to the first of the pontiffs, the pontifex maximus (whose position in origin, rather than with the name of priest, is better described as "minister of religion"), to the point that at some point in history, the "regia" or royal palace at the Forum Romanum, originally inhabited by the king of sacrifices, was ceded to the pontifex maximus.
_	After the death of the children, the townsfolk soon turned hostile to her and her family, blaming Michiru for their death; they started to ostracize the Sagaes, to the point that when Michiru went to buy tofu, she was turned away.
_	The National Security Archive makes the point that the US government and intelligence community did not suddenly come upon terrorism on September 11, 2001.
_	Einstein stressed the point that by this transformation a spherical light wave in one frame is transformed into a spherical light wave in another one.
_	It is constructed of wood, paper, and chicken wire, and Hardtke stated that "It was to make the point that you could make a better sculpture for less money.".
_	The index has been criticised for weighting the carbon footprint too heavily, to the point that the US would have had to be universally happy and would have had to have a life expectancy of 439 years to equal Vanuatu's score in the 2006 index.
_	Both constitutions emphasize the point that the same person cannot be appointed Prosecutor General for more than two consecutive terms.
_	The enormous impact of his teachings in the Externado have caused irreconcilable fractures, to the point that some parents wealthy -along with teachers-the institution decided to leave and form their own.
_	Ferguson and Warren moved to a house on Long Island, where they often fought, sometimes to the point that police intervention was required.
_	Dominique's discovery of Alain Bashung's dark 2002 album, "L'Imprudence" shocked him to the point that it put his music into question and he decided to explore different ways of working.
_	After decades of turbulent politics bolstered by Marxist-Leninist rhetoric, and with the collapse of the Soviet Union, the Congolese gradually moderated their economic and political views to the point that, in 1992, Congo completed a transition to multi-party democracy.
_	In the early years of the 20th century, Filandia was a prosperous community - trade and industry had grown to the point that by 1900 there were estimated to be 250,000 coffee bushes in Filandia.
_	One of his most successful recordings was "Cien Barrios Porteños" (The one hundred barrios of Buenos Aires), to the point that presenters would announce him as "the singer of the 100 barrios".
_	Schenkenschanz had military significance when it was the point that split the Rhine river into two arms, the southern Waal and the northern Nederrijn.
_	She was described as "unassuming" and a "typical student", to the point that it took her roommate four years to realize Liu was a celebrity in China.
_	The Gestapo took him to their headquarters in the Avenue Foch, and he was subjected to brutal torture, including beatings, electrical shocks to the genitals, psychological gameplaying, sleep deprivation, and repeated submersion in ice-cold water—to the point that artificial respiration was sometimes required.
_	Ibe of YNaija, commenting on the audio and video, extensively said: "the point that may have been overlooked remains that Dorobucci is an average song at best.
_	President Mitterrand remained personally involved throughout the building process, to the point that the planning team referred to him to decide on the seats’ colour following internal disagreement.
_	Relationships grew worse to the point that Washington seriously considered economic and diplomatic isolation of Argentina and tried unsuccessfully to keep it out of the United Nations in 1945.
_	The film highlights the point that these companies have pollution below 1% and then shows the methods/techniques adopted by them.
_	The Kilbrandon Commission went on to make the point that, if Parliament can legislate for the Isle of Man at all, about which there was no doubt, then surely this power knows no bounds: if Parliament can legislate, it can legislate in whatever area it chooses; this is, after all, implicit in the notion of the sovereignty of Parliament.
_	Hayami tells him that they are like "ghost data", meaning that they're to the point that they don't exist.
_	All of these fishes are highly specialized ambush predators that resemble leaves, down to the point that their swimming style resembles a drifting leaf (thus the common name leaf fish, which is shared with old world fishes of family Nandidae with a similar lifestyle); when a prey animal - such as an aquatic insect or smaller fish - comes within range, the fish attacks, swallowing the prey potentially within a quarter of a second.
_	Like Holy Cross, the church had seen a drop in parishioners to the point that in 1961 it celebrated only four baptisms and one marriage.
_	The verbal violence of the folk tales shared during her luncheon with her German hosts and Israeli friend was as significant to Angelou as physical violence, to the point that she became ill.
_	We know for certain that Nino Martoglio participated in those meetings and kept the company cheerful, to the point that the tenor Giulio Crimi laughed so hard he popped the buttons off his collar.
_	In such a case, the point that is converged to is known as an attractive fixed point.
_	Physicist Stephen Hawking, Microsoft founder Bill Gates and SpaceX founder Elon Musk have expressed concerns about the possibility that AI could develop to the point that humans could not control it, with Hawking theorizing that this could "spell the end of the human race".
_	The band also had commitments to finish as the Tennessee River Boys, to the point that they occasionally had to promote themselves under both names in the same day.
_	This car was in better condition than the previous Monacos and became Hunter's trademark vehicle — to the point that when it was destroyed in the third season, it was replaced with an identical one.
_	Alito makes the point that where there is a record the defendant adamantly asserted her innocence; therefore on its face the plea withdrawal was reasonable.
_	Care must be taken to avoid overheating the metal to the point that it gives off sparks from rapid oxidation (burning), or else the weld will be poor and brittle.
_	Feynman and Albert Hibbs suggested that certain repair machines might one day be reduced in size to the point that it would be possible to (as Feynman put it) "swallow the doctor".
_	When they find a body in the Black Middens, January feels vindicated, to the point that he threatens to leave the others behind and escape on his own if they refuse to come.
_	He is represented as a man of sensibility suffering from an extreme case of unrequited love who descends into suicidal and homicidal despair, even to the point that the reader is invited to identify with Hackman rather than with his victim.
_	Just as Germans had been carefully taught to hate the Jews, to the point that they could readily torment and kill them, so had Catholics"; that author Goldhagen "sees a deep vein of Jew-hatred ingrained within Catholic tradition; and he does not think that there was any difference of kind, between that old religious Jew-hatred and the murderous racial antisemitism of the twentieth century".
_	As tastes have changed in Jamaica in favor of more meat and packaged food the national food import bill has grown to the point that it threatens the health of the economy.
_	In CMLL he became involved in a storyline with Mr. Niebla that escalated to the point that both wrestlers put their mask on the line in a "Luchas de Apuestas" match.
_	By the 1930s the population of the Camden community had grown to the point that more space was needed.
_	The median narrows to the point that there are no shoulders between the median barrier and the passing lanes on both sides.
_	The Belgic warriors set traps in the woods for Roman foragers, and maintained an immensely advantageous position to the point that Caesar was forced to call for reinforcements of three legions from Trebonius.
_	He writes that "in the north soldiers are stupid and impatient, to the point that they cannot see the strength of the musket, and they insist on holding tight to their fast lances (a type of fire lance), and although when comparing and vying on the practice field the musket can hit the bullseye ten times better than the fast-lance and five times better than the bow and arrow, they refuse to be convinced."
_	Since the original identification of Schimmelpenning syndrome, the number of findings has expanded to the point that the syndrome is associated with a considerable constellation of abnormalities.
_	He agreed with criticisms including the point that Watts had failed to correct for time of observation bias, and noted that independent satellite temperature measurements were closer to the NOAA figures.
_	Oettingen makes the point that there is regularity in human action because of human societal living together but that there is freedom of action of the individual "because the regularity of moral statistical numbers is never absolute".
_	Miriam Aziz of The Robert Schumann Centre, of the European University Institute, makes the point that there is a difference between the wording of the Settlement Convention "the full authority of a sovereign State" and the wording in the Treaty on the Final Settlement with Respect to Germany of 1990 in which Germany is referred to as having "full sovereignty over its internal and external affairs", gives rise to a distinction between "de facto" and "de jure" sovereignty.
_	Originally industrial paint robots were large and expensive, but robot prices have come down to the point that general industry can now afford the same level of automation used by the large automotive manufacturers.
_	He loves dancing and (his own) beauty to the point that he's willing to betray Demon Card for them.
_	He also frequently uses the word "awesome," to the point that, when under the effects of truth serum, Ellie angrily tells him that if everything is 'awesome,' then awesome becomes mediocre.
_	The congregation again grew to the point that the structure was no longer suitable.
_	They then spent a lot of time trying to get to the point that Homer would have an "over filled trash can", and through its extensive use of packaging, the concept of Love Day was formed.
_	Many of the responses included death threats against her or her family to the point that the Capitol Police provided round-the-clock plainclothes bodyguards.
_	They make the point that 'invoking legends or particular translations of Maori place-names to "fit" a known event must be undertaken with considerable care and suitable provisos', and characterise this type of reasoning as 'attempts to creatively rewrite New Zealand's cultural and tectonic past'.
_	By the end of the series, however, her love for Tenchi has become very powerful — to the point that she nearly dies for him.
_	She was overwhelmed to the point that she called for a meeting with all major television stations in Mexico and had them ask all the questions they wanted to ask, saying that if they did not ask then, they would never get answers because she planned on closing that chapter in her life because it was very painful to talk about something so private.
_	In both the religion of Darius, Xerxes and Zoroaster, he was worshipped as the supreme god to the point that the rest were almost excluded.
_	From the 15th century onwards, whisky was heavily taxed in Scotland, to the point that most of the spirit was produced illegally.
_	In an interview with Malaysiakini, Uthayakumar said that he was very patriotic to the point that he called himself a Malaysian and at one point refused to visit India.
_	Kay Rasmus Nielsen (March 12, 1886 – June 21, 1957) was a Danish illustrator who was popular in the early 20th century, the "golden age of illustration" which lasted from when Daniel Vierge and other pioneers developed printing technology to the point that drawings and paintings could be reproduced with reasonable facility.
_	In fact, a team of Autobots is often weaker than a single Decepticon, to the point that a single Decepticon can trash the Autobots several times over, and even "win", in some episodes.
_	Haus was fearful that direct confrontation with the French Navy, even if it should be successful, would weaken the Austro-Hungarian Navy to the point that Italy would have a free hand in the Adriatic.
_	When Maria graduated from UCSD in 2005, with a major in Communications and a minor in Law, she had gone from playing low limits to high-stakes cash games and had grown her poker bankroll to the point that she felt confident to embark on a career as a professional poker player.
_	It also began broadcasting images of burning buildings and cars in what viewers said was the first time government media had acknowledged the growing unrest in the east, which it suggested was spreading to the point that the government had no choice but to address it directly, possibly even with force of arms on the 20th.
_	Rumours also emerged that LeBlanc was clashing with his co-host behind the scenes because they did not get on well, to the point that he threatened to leave unless
_	Freight traffic remained steady for some years but declined after World War II to the point that the railway was no longer economic.
_	The break-up fight was ended when Priscilla intentionally angered him to the point that he grew in size.
_	Conceivably under this proposal USA’s economy could improve to the point that demand for USA goods abroad closely approaches or exceeds the demand for foreign goods within USA’s domestic market.
_	Eventually, Mini becomes frustrated with waiting for her mother to return to her, and her behavior degrades severely, to the point that no school is willing to teach her, nor is any governess willing to deal with her.
_	After accepting the head coaching position in 1983, Bauerle quietly built up his men’s team to the point that in 1988, Georgia earned its first NCAAs trip in 32 years, finishing 41st overall.
_	Some antagonists, such as Yang Kang and Wanyan Honglie, also deviate from their counterparts in the novel, to the point that they are portrayed in a more positive light.
_	With such series driving home the point that real history is made by mere humans and not "super-humans", the Franco-Belgian historical comic had come a long way since their first romanticized and/or idealized appearances in the 1940s-1970s, particularly in "Tintin" and "Pilote" as portrayed by such artists as the ("Le Chevalier blanc", "Harald le Viking"), William Vance ("Howard Flynn", "Rodric", "Ramiro"), François Craenhals ("Chevalier Ardent") or Victor Hubinon ("Barbe Rouge"), to name but a few.
_	The club has declined since then, to the point that its first team plays in tier eleven, the lowest level in its region.
_	As attendance for the Orthodox service dwindled to the point that it was unable to attract a "minyan", the egalitarian service moved upstairs and the synagogue began attracting more new members and went in a new direction, and is today unaffiliated with any larger Jewish religious movement.
_	Moreover, the European languages which gave rise to the creole languages of European colonies all belong to the same subgroup of Western Indo-European and have highly convergent grammars; to the point that Whorf joined them into a single Standard Average European language group.
_	The collection grew to the point that it required a separate building and formed the nucleus for the Springville Museum of Art.
_	Publicity in "Fur & Feather" magazine had increased interest in the fledgling fancy and caused an increase in entries in the rat sections of mouse shows during 1974 and 1975 to the point that after cajoling from the mouse fanciers it was decided to form a club or society purely for rat fanciers.
_	Furthermore, the main line of research via tokamaks has been developed to the point that it is now possible to undertake the penultimate step in magnetic confinement plasma physics research with a self-sustained reaction.
_	On the west façade and the spire, where he could find no documentary evidence to assist him, he detailed his own new designs, to the point that the building as it stands today is almost entirely his creation.
_	War journalism, combat films, and footage of World War II combat influenced the documentary-style camera work of the Battle of Geonosis, even to the point that hand-held shakes were digitally added to computer-generated sequences.
_	This is also the point that minimizes the squared distance from the faces of the tetrahedron.
_	The Navy deliberately burnt her in May 1832 because her timbers had rotted to the point that she was no longer fit for active service.
_	The station's fortunes fall dramatically after his departure, to the point that by the time of "The New WKRP in Cincinnati", the station is back in the same position as it was before he arrived.
_	The compiler itself must be extensible to the point that it is really a collection of plugins that assist with the translation of source language input into "anything".
_	By the 1980s aluminum welding techniques had improved to the point that aluminum tube could safely be used in place of steel.
_	It is widely considered that they met at the Yatasto relay, to the point that the event is named after the place.
_	Victor Suvorov, the pseudonym of a former Soviet military intelligence (i.e., GRU) officer, makes the point that a defecting HUMINT officer is a special threat to walk-in or other volunteer assets of the country that he is leaving.
_	Over his last two seasons of university, he was able to develop his football skills to the point that both the CFL and NFL took notice.
_	COCA absorbed another student film program "Tuesday Flicks" (foreign and independent films on Tuesday nights) and developed the "American Cinema" program (double features exploring the auteur concept in American directors on Thursday nights), COCA for Kids (Sunday matinée kids films), "New German Cinema" in cooperation with the German Department on Monday nights, and helped student groups the Science Fiction Forum, Hillel and SAB Concerts develop film programs to the point that there was a movie on campus every day of the week.
_	The mother tongue movement in Taiwan even influenced Xiamen (Amoy) to the point that in 2010, Xiamen also began to implement the teaching of Hokkien dialect in its schools.
_	All in all, Gaziel was, first and foremost, a liberal, conservative, eurocentric bourgeois, and, like many cultured men of his time, he was well aware of the dramatic, and to them disappointing, changes the world had experienced along the first half of the 20th century, to the point that in "Portugal far away" he wrote: "I am not any more a man of the present times, neither of the future".
_	Humorously, it is shown in the same episode that Alex has been sent to the principal's office way too often (implying Alex is a delinquent student) to the point that the two have somewhat of regular routines down, such as serving drink and snacks to each other and complementing the office's new mural of horses.
_	His callousness extends to the point that he calls
_	They made the point that when Missouri applied to be a state, they did not tell the Union that they had over three-thousand slaves, which just furthered their point of slavery being unacceptable.
_	It is not known if the idea's development extended to the point that Greer would have had to modify it to include the Fifth Doctor.
_	Spurred on by Loki's sacrifice, Thor, and the others battle the Void to the point that it reverts to the Sentry's human form.
_	Villeneuve interpreted this as an order to maintain position on the track; Pironi did not and thus overtook Villeneuve on the final lap, infuriating the Canadian to the point that he vowed never to speak to Pironi again.
_	At the point that coding begins, a feature is already 44% complete (Domain Walkthrough 1%, Design 40% and Design Inspection 3% = 44%).
_	The article, which he presented in terms of advice he had given his own children on dealing with African Americans, made the point that members of any race could theoretically warn their children about the dangers posed by other ethnic groups.
_	However, its condition had deteriorated to the point that by 2011, Pakistan's Senate Standing Committee on Sports had became concerned about its continuing suitability.
_	"In each period I have attempted to trace the implications of the media of communication for the character of knowledge and to suggest that a monopoly or oligopoly of knowledge is built up to the point that equilibrium is disturbed."
_	Taylor's limp continued to progress to the point that within three months he needed a walking stick.
_	This is because according to the lawsuit, the iOS 9 update slowed down the iPhone 4S to the point that the phone was unusable (as performance was sluggish) and that Apple knew this fact (planned obsolescence).
_	It eventually got to the point that staff were afraid of the machine, even when safely ensconced in a booth constructed of bullet-proof glass and quarter-inch-thick steel.
_	Her magical powers increase if not used, but overuse can deplete them to the point that further use strains her physical well-being; as with other magical users, the only way to restore her waning powers is an extended period of rest.
_	All of the ceremonial edifices were built in various phases, one on top of the other, to the point that what we now see is usually the last stage of construction.
_	The Alps are a habitat for 30,000 species of wildlife, ranging from the tiniest snow fleas to brown bears, many of which have made adaptations to the harsh cold conditions and high altitudes to the point that some only survive in specific micro-climates either directly above or below the snow line.
_	Costs have decreased to the point that the average consumer may save approximately $17,527 over a 20-year period by installing solar panels.
_	Whedon uses several disorienting effects to heighten the reality of the situations in the episode to the point that they seem surreal.
_	Since the eradication of the goats and rabbits on Round Island the skink population has increased to the point that some could be relocated to other islands, like Gunner's Quoin (Coin du Mire) and the Île aux Aigrettes.
_	Verse 1 refers to scribes and Pharisees who have come from Jerusalem, and theologian Johann Bengel makes the point that these events could not therefore have taken place at the time of the Passover.
_	Gardner makes the point that Forteanism serves to remind science that no theory is above doubt, and that knowledge is provisional, it serves a 'sound and healthy' purpose.
_	The “self-emptying” of the Son in the incarnation was not to be understood as a humiliation to the point that the human Christ would have to be "adopted" once more in divinity, he claimed.
_	In 1893, Viennese wood-worker Bernhard Kessler opened a workshop that succeeded to the point that he expanded to London in 1926, opening "Bernhard Kessler & Sons" to be managed by his son Leopold.
_	It states that numerous major rivers around the world have become depleted to the point that they can fail to reach their destinations.
_	However, the match resulted in a no contest when Yoshiko began to shoot on Yasukawa, legitimately assaulting her to the point that the match had to be stopped.
_	The situation worsened to the point that 140 soldiers were ordered to help dig the train out from beneath of snow.
_	The demand for these cookies grew to the point that bakers began to produce them domestically.
_	During the second half of the 19th century, the population of Saint-Aubin declined to the point that in 1901, there were only inhabitants.
_	He had been an All-American tackle at Yale University and was known for working the players extremely hard, to the point that "they considered the actual games to be breathers compared to the scrimmages." but agreed to the conditions as long as he could act as the referee.
_	Reformed theology, by contrast, teaches that people are completely incapable of self-redemption to the point that human nature itself is evil, but the grace of God overcomes even the unwilling heart.
_	The Commentator's stance is described in the About section of the website as "Centre-right internationalist", though Shepherd's own political outlook is said in that section to have moved on: "Owner Robin Shepherd... has developed his thinking to the point that he now regards the old Right-Left dichotomy as redundant.
_	"Spin" gave the song a positive review and described the hook in the song "This is something like a holocaust / Millions of our people lost," by adding that "He's making the point that inner-city violence, by the dictionary definition of the word ("a mass slaughter of people"), is a holocaust, but is never framed as such".
_	The modern Caterham Seven is based on the Series 3 Lotus Seven, though developed to the point that no part is the same as on the original Lotus.
_	A Philadelphia reviewer criticized the number of people in the cast — missing the point that employment was the reason the Federal Theatre existed — but still granted that the production "frequently smacks you between the eyes with its dramatic force.
_	The northern white rhino is critically endangered to the point that only two of these rhinos are known to remain in the world, both in captivity.
_	When "Onda Rock" retrospectively commented that "Veil" records "all sorts of contamination to the point that the distortion seeks to camouflage, distorting, the typical features of rock music," Poss said that the band "tried not to repeat twice the same album" and said that he thinks "Veil" "show how the Poss-Stenger torque is gained," commenting "I thought that we could delve a little 'more in rock music ("Pearls of Wisdom", for one thing,) while continuing to develop new hybrid music trans-genre.
_	His eyesight improved to the point that he attempted—and briefly succeeded—in a comeback attempt with the Red Sox during the Spring of 1975.
_	Hokkien and Teochew share many phonemes to the point that they are mutually intelligible.
_	If humidity changes are extreme, the soundboard can warp so much to the point that it can collapse and lose its crown, which may require rebuilding or replacing the instrument.
_	Nishihara saw the development of business enterprises and residential land development in the mid-1960s; by 1979 the population of Nishihara had increased to the point that the village was elevated to town status.
_	On 5 August 2012, Lacey surged up the pitch and scored the point that sealed Donegal's comprehensive victory over Kerry in the All-Ireland Senior Football Championship quarter-final at Croke Park.
_	She is fiercely protective of Pike and Wilson, to the point that she is accused of "mollycoddling" by Captain Mainwaring.
_	On March 9, 2012, "Project M" became the first event to gain media attention after a party invite was posted on Twitter by Farmington Hills, Michigan high schooler Mikey Vasovski, and was subsequently passed to thousands of users, to the point that the message was being resent once per second, and was posted on Craigslist.
_	As of 2011 her illness had progressed to the point that she can no longer perform.
_	His overseer and advisor throughout his world domination plots is Uka Uka, whom Cortex ironically feared at first to the point that he got down on his hands and knees in his presence.
_	Grizabella is, at the time of her appearance, a very old cat, withered by her age to the point that she no longer resembles the proud, carefree, flamboyant dancer of her youth.
_	Even relatively small amounts of springback in structures that are formed to a significant depth may cause the blank to distort to the point that tolerances cannot be held.
_	After a bitter and rancorous election and lengthy disputes with his only competitor, Lucius Junius Silanus, which reached the point that many people were asking for Augustus to return to put an end to it, Lepidus was elected consul, serving alongside his old friend Marcus Lollius.
_	In The Game, each individual assumes the role of a member in a "happy" family, completely subsuming his or her individual personality to the point that each individual is known only by the identity he or she is playing:
_	He improved the parish jail system to the point that it was called one of the “most constitutionally operated system in the state", according to the "Baton Rouge Morning Advocate".
_	Part of his 'blessings' include a degree of enhanced strength, allowing him to easily engage Wonder Girl in battle, and enhanced reflexes to the point that he caught Arrowette's arrow in mid-air and then threw it back at her so fast it pierced right through her shoulder; although he admits that he is not on Superboy's level in a purely physical confrontation, he also possesses sufficient combat skills to consider himself the equal of Robin.
_	After a few days of LPCI, decay heat will have sufficiently abated to the point that defueling of the reactor is able to commence with a degree of caution.
_	Since according to the rules of "zavah", the seven days must be counted from the point that the abnormal discharge ceases, it has historically been considered important in Judaism to determine when this occurs.
_	He's hyperactive (to the point that he was rejected by the Awesomes during Mr. Awesome's tenure as leader for that reason) and in a hurry to do the right thing.
_	The change of musical direction, with the introduction of progressive metal elements, and the many variations of style adopted in the songs were generally praised, to the point that a Metal Storm reviewer compares After Forever to "Symphony X with Floor Jansen on vocals".
_	Stephanie Zacharek of "Time" magazine gave a positive review with a description as "Wild, Vivid and Crazy-Beautiful" as she wrote "Nearly everything about "Beauty and the Beast" is larger than life, to the point that watching it can be a little overwhelming." and added that "it's loaded with feeling, almost like a brash interpretive dance expressing the passion and elation little girls (and some boys, too) must have felt upon seeing the earlier version."
_	II rules a strong Germany and his troops continue to occupy Belgium, the Ukraine, and the puppet Kingdom of Poland, but post-war relations with the U.S. soured to the point that many people on both sides of the Atlantic believed that Germany and the United States would someday be engaged in a full-fledged war.
_	Many internal refurbishments over the years have altered the interior of 10 Downing Street, 11 Downing Street and 12 Downing Street to the point that they are all part of a single complex.
_	The RUDY attack opens concurrent POST HTTP connections to the HTTP server and delays sending the body of the POST request to the point that the server resources are saturated.
_	By the early 2010s the field was considered to have increased its abilities to the point that applications for basic science research were beginning to be realized, and practical applications in medicine and other fields were beginning to be considered feasible.
_	Pepsin and urease were the first proteins purified to the point that they could be crystallized.
_	Not that Gaga's mission of inclusion, tolerance, love and empowerment is anything but positive and necessary – but a drawn-out monologue repeatedly making the point that no one should give a f-k in the face of criticism only restated what is already in the lyrics."
_	Marcelo received immense fan support during Philippine Idol to the point that some of them even lent their services to her by giving her a total make-over from her choice of clothes, hairstyle, posture, and even her manner of speaking.
_	In Margaret Atwood's semi-satiric dystopia "Oryx and Crake", university literary studies have declined to the point that the protagonist, Snowman, is instructed to write his thesis on self-help books as literature; more revealing of the authors and of the society that produced them than genuinely helpful.
_	The two companies soon reached the point that further growth was not possible without a wider network of local and international clients on one hand, as well as the rising competitive threat of international investment banks in the progressively more active Egyptian market in terms of investment baking privatization transactions as well as higher trading volumes .
_	Valentino adores dogs to the point that he once named a second line of clothing after his late pug Oliver.
_	By the late 1860s, the parish was growing to the point that a single priest could no longer serve everyone: an assistant pastor was appointed in 1868, even though a second parish, St. Bernard, had been formed in 1860.
_	During the latter half of the twentieth century many universities were founded in the city to the point that some studies regard Manizales as the second largest University city in the country.
_	After coming to life, Slappy will try to make the person who brought him back to life serve him as a slave, to the point that he will frame that person for things that he does.
_	Berry’s relationship with ESPN grew to the point that it purchased TalentedMrRoto.com and hired Berry as director of fantasy sports in February 2007.
_	In September 2006, the All-Party Parliamentary Group against Anti-Semitism of the British Parliament published the Report of the All-Party Parliamentary Inquiry into Antisemitism, the result of an investigation into whether the belief that the "prevailing opinion both within the Jewish community and beyond" that antisemitism had "receded to the point that it existed only on the margins of society." was correct.
_	The town's name originates from the nearby coastal feature of the same name, a series of rocky ledges on the point that was first described in an 1875 hydrographic survey.
_	Martin finds that Kelly and Carmody made the point that when people exert their rights with support from friends, they may defeat those with prestige.
_	They beat him to the point that they almost kill him.
_	From as early as Blayton could remember she declared herself an artist and demonstrated this fact at the age of four by repeatedly crayoning murals up the steps in her home to the point that her mother declared to her father that she was convinced that they must have brought the wrong baby home from the Hospital.
_	Since the introduction in 1991 of a rhythmical line of study at the Carl Nielsen Academy of Music Odense, the library's acquisition within the jazz genre has increased to the point that on 1 May 2007 the collection consisted of more than 900 books, 850 sheet music, 312 78's, 191 EPs, 4100 LPs, 4200 CDs, 179 DAT tapes and 73 videos plus a number of current and ceased to be published journals including older Danish publications.
_	While comparing prices, Marla and Mina bonded with each other, to the point that Marla considered hiring Mina as a replacement for Josh.
_	However, the population of the order has grown to the point that the Savoy chapel can no longer accommodate the gathering of members held every four years, and St. George's Chapel at Windsor Castle is now employed for the event.
_	The campaign to build the rail trail that will eventually link Lake Erie with Washington, D.C. via Beaver County, has progressed to the point that the organizers, Vincent Troia and Mario Leone, are prepared to display their work.
_	Taggart for intimidating their daughter to the point that she kept her relationship secret.
_	The purpose of these signals is to allow traffic signal controllers to safely select movements as needed to maximize traffic flows, and to prevent vehicles from stacking up in left turn pockets to the point that they block through lanes of traffic.
_	Jane's death manifests significant repercussions throughout Season 3, and is largely responsible for Jesse's downward spiral throughout the first half of the season, as well as her father Donald's deep depression that affects him to the point that he fails in his duties as an air-traffic controller, leading to a mid-air collision between a 737 and a King Air 350 ("ABQ").
_	Under Monson's guidance, the 49ers have improved each season, to the point that on February 24, 2011 Long Beach defeated Cal Poly 61–55 to clinch their first Big West regular season title since 2006–07 and the #1 seed in the Big West Tournament.
_	In the second part of the letter to the Christian nobility of the German nation, Luther debates the point that it is the Pope's sole authority to interpret, or confirm interpretation of, scriptures, the large problem being that there is no proof announcing this authority is the Pope's alone and thus assuming this authority for themselves.
_	On 7 January 2008, Jeremy Clarkson found himself the subject of direct debit fraud after publishing his bank account and sort code details in his column in "The Sun" to make the point that public concern over the 2007 UK child benefit data scandal was unnecessary.
_	It is alleged that Roa Sierra’s mental health had also deteriorated to the point that he was convinced he was a reincarnation of Gonzalo Jiménez de Quesada and of Francisco de Paula Santander.
_	Police harassment of the British underground in general became commonplace, to the point that in 1967 the police seemed to focus in particular on the apparent source of agitation: the underground press.
_	Commissioner Phiyega claims that members of the SAPS who were directly in the path of the attack had moved back in a defensive manner up until the point that it was believed that their safety was under threat, at which point they were cleared to use maximum force to halt the attack and protect themselves.
_	Priscilla's attack is apparently the most successful, as Wonder Woman was slowly crumbling up to the point that her face had become black and cracked by the time the Justice League attacked the Hall of Doom, relying on the powers of her lasso to keep her from crumbling apart.
_	Barfield's involvement in Christian ministry was extensive to the point that an effort was made to obtain a commutation to life imprisonment.
_	President Kjell Eugenio Laugerud García gave order to evacuate people, most of whom were sorry about losing all of their belongings after the eruption; in the meantime, ash was travelling as far away s the Mexican states of Chiapas and Oaxaca, to the point that Mexican authorities were on alert due to the amounts of it that they were getting.
_	Metzinger and Gleizes in "Du "Cubisme"", written during the assemblage of the "Maison Cubiste", wrote about the autonomous nature of art, stressing the point that decorative considerations should not govern the spirit of art.
_	The second episode also makes references to Dave's trip to a glacier in Norway, parodying Cameron's similar visit; it makes the point that for an apparently pointless trip, the harm on the environment from Dave's flight would be high.
_	In Mecca, the number of pilgrims grew exponentially to the point that Indonesians were markedly referred as "rice of the Hejaz."
_	In 2017, while attending the ceremony for his induction into the Arkansas Golf Hall of Fame, he announced his retirement from professional golf, saying "I had gotten to the point that it was just not fulfilling anymore".
_	This condition persisted until integrity deteriorated to the point that Torchman [Suiren] and Fuhsi arose to manage all under heaven, whereupon there was accord, but no longer unity.
_	In the video, Khan recounts a recent trip he and his friend took to the cinema to watch the film, described some awkward incidents in the cinema whilst watching the film and raises the point that the phrase could sound exceptionally racist to the untrained ear.
_	The team was extremely active in stage 15 on Angliru, to the point that one post-race analysis suggested they "left it all" on the climb.
_	In the U.S. and Canada, Klondike is the best-known solitaire card game, to the point that the term "solitaire", in the absence of additional qualifiers, typically refers to Klondike.
_	Her mother made the point that two of her sons had been killed in India on active service whilst she had little political rights.
_	Russian has a wide variety of diminutive forms for names, to the point that for non-Russian speakers it can be difficult to connect a nickname to the original.
_	As she follows him, she meets Akito, who believes that Tohru's kindness to and acceptance of the cursed zodiac members has made them unfaithful to her, weakening their "bond" to the point that Momiji and Hiro have been freed from the curse.
_	The reinjection of wastewater into the field to increase oil recovery increased the reservoir pressure to the point that gas was forced upwards along the paths of least resistance – newly formed fractures along the fault, as well as the old wellbores – until it reached the ground surface.
_	By the late nineteenth century, this settlement had grown to the point that it had become the permanent meeting place of Ohio Yearly Meeting.
_	In other cases, such as those recovered after decades in a wrecked condition, they have been reconstructed to the point that the majority of their structure is made up of modern parts.
_	French phrases have also become popular to the point that Prof.
_	Esteban apologizes and feels guilt over what he has done, to the point that he is about to take his own life, but Manuel stops him from hanging himself.
_	Amro was arrested and detained twenty in 2012 without any charges filed against him, and on a further six occasions in 2013 up to the point that the aforesaid statement was written.
_	The larvae of Brachycera Cyclorrhapha have a wormlike appearance, with little differentiation of body regions (head, thorax, abdomen) to the point that they are commonly called, improperly, worms.
_	For every inhabitant of the Chalk, Granny Aching "was" the Chalk; its best shepherd, its wisest woman and its memory, to the point that even the Chalk's Feegles say of her that she ""[told] the hills what they are, every day.
_	White people in the South, he argued, were literally driven mad by the "Negro-complex," to the point that "men and women who are otherwise kind and law-abiding will indulge in the most revolting forms of cruelty towards black people."
_	Layouts are physical props intended to simulate a sort of alternate reality where life is easier than either the grim existence of the colonists in their marginal off-world colonies, or even Earth, where global warming has progressed to the point that Antarctica is prime vacation resort territory.
_	Reyes resurfaced years later as "the Reaper", a mysterious mercenary responsible for terrorist attacks all around the world, having been consumed by his hunger for fame to the point that he no longer cared what he was known for.
_	As the year wore on, her condition had deteriorated to the point that James had Carl Gustav Jung take her in as a patient.
_	They are widely watched throughout the country, to the point that they have been described as a significant element in national identity and unity, and have been exported to over 120 countries.
_	However modifications to the cars would eventually extend to the point that Electramotive would begin to construct their own chassis to replace the older cars, no longer relying on Lola for the cockpit tubs.
_	The book, through various other narratives, underscores the point that the people are to live in dignity.
_	Canaletto's painting began to suffer from repetitiveness, losing its fluidity, and becoming mechanical to the point that the English art critic George Vertue suggested that the man painting under the name 'Canaletto' was an impostor.
_	Megadeth guitarist and frontman Dave Mustaine made the point that Hazlewood had been paid royalties for years before he made the complaint, although Mustaine eventually omitted the song anyway from newer pressings of the album.
_	The second Slayer is destroyed when Spider-Man lures it into Smythe's own spider-filled lab, causing the machine's sensors to overload to the point that it shut down.
_	This is also the point that he began touring.
_	A creation of Harrod Blank, this Beetle was featured in the 1992 documentary Wild Wheels (the documentary featured a scene in a courtroom where Blank was seen contesting a parking citation to the point that art cars and their respective artists were usually subjected to police harassment).
_	He helps Momma run her store and shows Maya kindness to the point that she wishes that he could be her father.
_	He underwent a bone marrow transplant that briefly reduced his immune system to the point that he could have very little human contact.
_	He learns that Harden loved O'Callaghan to the point that even after his death she was unable to return Phillips's feelings; that Banks is a member of an anarchist society almost completely controlled by the authorities (and which has more bark than bite, as Alleyn finds out when he attends a meeting in disguise with his amanuensis, Nigel Bathgate); that O'Callaghan's sister, an unbalanced, shrill, unintelligent hysteric, has been bullying her brother into taking quack medicine produced by an avowed Communist; and that Dr. Roberts the anaesthetist is a firm believer in eugenics to the point that he is unable to prevent himself from expounding on the topic for hours.
_	The mutual hostility went to the point that both despots requested military aid from the Turks against the other.
_	By the end of 1944, AAF training diminished to the point that the Army closed Harris Neck AAF, transferring its personnel and aircraft to Waycross.
_	From 1872 to 1874 the Indians killed approximately 1,215,000 bison as part of providing for their food, shelter, and other basic needs; American hunters slaughtered an estimated 4,374,000 bison, reducing the population to the point that it could not reproduce normally and continue to sustain the Indians.
_	To do this, Snerdly calls up a femme fatale cat named Kitty Glitter, telling her that he has fixed her up a date with a handsome rich cat, as he describes T.C. Kitty is eager to have a rich cat for a husband (to the point that she puts on a wedding dress for the date), but this plan is foiled when she mistakes Brain for T.C.
_	ENTel oversaw an expansion and modernisation of the country's telecommunications, but with arrival of the military dictatorship of 1976-83 began a period of stagnation which had an adverse effect on the quality of service and on waiting lists for service and repairs, to the point that to get a phone line had to wait up to 15 years.
_	Over time, the marriage disintegrated to the point that, as recounted in her book, Trudeau had an affair with US Senator Ted Kennedy.
_	Adult male residents of Jalal Street, in the center of Khan Yunis, were allegedly lined up and fired upon from fixed positions with Bren light machine guns, firing extraneously to the point that a stench of cordite filled the air.
_	Interions also shed like cats, to the point that their lost hair can even clog up machinery and electronics.
_	This Rule strictly enclosed women, to the point that nuns of Sainte-Croix were unable to attend Radegund's funeral.
_	Castle Goring had been left to decay to the point that it was on Historic England’s Heritage at Risk Register, which described its situation as "very grave".
_	When originally introduced Anacondas were plagued with poor accuracy, but changes to the barrels quickly corrected the problems to the point that Colt billed its new pistol as among the most accurate .44 Magnum revolvers in production.
_	The correlatives, although clearly cognate with European languages (for example, "kiel, tiel" with French "quel" (which), "tel" (such); "ĉiu" with Italian "ciascun" (each), and "-es" with the German genitive "-es," etc.), have been analogically leveled to the point that they are often given as examples of Esperanto innovations.
_	Historian Pekka Korvenmaa makes the point that leading theme was the creation of the atmosphere of medieval urban environments - and Sonck later designed a similar proposal in 1904 to rearrange the immediate surroundings of St.Michael's Church in Helsinki, with numerous "fantastic" spired buildings.
_	Paul VI abolished the canopies altogether, since, under his papacy, the population of the College of Cardinals had increased so much to the point that they would need to be seated in rows of two against the walls, making the canopies obstruct the view of the cardinals in the back row.
_	Martinets often use etiquette and other rules as an excuse to trump ethics, to the point that etiquette loses its ethical ground.
_	As an aircraft flies closer to either pole the dipping error becomes more prevalent to the point that the compass can become unreliable because its pivot point has surpassed its 18 degrees of tilt.
_	Catholics as well as the Reformers pointed to the office of the Papacy as responsible for the fallen state of the church as they considered the conduct of those in power had grown so spiritually or morally corrupt to the point that it was called the Antichrist power by those within as well as outside of the church.
_	Between the royal authority and the Creoles they begin to record friction to the point that Talledo intercepts a communiqué of encouraging the rebellion between the Piñeres from Mompóx and those of Piñeres from Cartagena.
_	The name refers to prairies near the point that were maintained through seasonal burning by indigenous cultivators.
_	In August 2011, the Dominican Air Force said that since taking delivery of the Super Tucanos in 2009, it has driven away drug flights to the point that they no longer enter the country's airspace.
_	Communication between local media, MyNetworkTV and Equity (which was infamous for having little to no presence of any local non-engineering staff for their stations, running almost all operations remotely from Little Rock) was non-existent to the point that the market's professional wrestling fans placed paid advertising in the "Lexington Herald-Leader" expressing their frustration, forcing the hand of MyNetworkTV to affiliate on a station viewable both over-the-air and on cable in a critical WWE market.
_	Within the framework of formal logic it is impossible that both "P" and "not-P" are true, and it was attempted to justify faultless disagreements within the framework of relativism of the Truth, Max Kölbel and Sven Rosenkranz present arguments to the point that genuine faultless disagreements are impossible
_	The minority then felt politically safer in "threatening" filibusters more regularly, which became normalized over time to the point that 60 votes are now required to end debate on nearly every controversial legislative item.
_	In Camden, New Jersey, Mischief Night escalated to the point that in the 1990s widespread arson was committed, with over 130 arsons on the night of October 30, 1991.
_	When Caprara's mission became a matter of public knowledge, Pope Clement was denounced in various cities as a heretic, and anti-Catholic sentiment in England was aroused to the point that the British government severed its contacts with the Papacy.
_	At that time, the highway began at the free bridge over the Red River north of Quanah, Texas, and followed what is today SH-6 to the point that is now SH-34's southern terminus.
_	Since then, the party's official name was neglected in favour of the alliance's and, since most of the UdC member parties have joined the UDC too, the UDC and the UdC started to overlap almost completely to the point that they are now undistinguishable.
_	Both Thayer and Cott include in their books photographs of a non-countershaded white cockerel against a white background, to make the point that in Thayer's words "a monochrome object can not be 'obliterated', no matter what its background" or in Cott's words "Colour resemblance alone is not sufficient to afford concealment".
_	However, to view the development of calculus as entirely independent between the work of Newton and Leibniz misses the point that both had some knowledge of the methods of the other (though Newton did develop most fundamentals before Leibniz started) and in fact worked together on a few aspects, in particular power series, as is shown in a letter to Henry Oldenburg dated 24 October 1676, where Newton remarks that Leibniz had developed a number of methods, one of which was new to him.
_	In a 2011 interview, Lo Schiavo reiterated that he never questioned his decision, noting that all but one trustee voted in favor of shuttering the program in 1985 "because we had to make the point that we mean what we say and we intended to be good citizens."
_	They found that as the pilot progressed, children's attention was not only captured and sustained, but they became excited and actively participated with what they saw, to the point that they stood up to get closer to the television and spoke back to the host.
_	Erikson makes the point that Martin's standing up to a Holy Roman Church can only be understood in the context of his initial disobedience to his father.
_	Tardini's response was positive to the point that the Pope was surprised.
_	By the 1870s, the congregation had grown to the point that the old log church had become too small to hold its parishioners.
_	Over time these ARM models got very detailed till to the point that some implementations preferred to use the ARM instead of the formally required AIM/MIM.
_	She favored her younger sons, particularly Magnus, to the point that he had difficulties handling his responsibilities on his own, and protected her younger children from her eldest son the king and what she regarded as his bad influence.
_	Pope John Paul II, however, when deciding to canonize him, overruled the commission he had established (which agreed with the earlier assessment of heroic charity), wishing to make the point that the systematic hatred of (whole categories of) humanity propagated by the Nazi regime was in itself inherently an act of hatred of religious (Christian) faith, meaning Kolbe's death equated to martyrdom.
_	Records show that in 1359, Bernat Alemany d'Orriols, cousin to queen Sibila of Fortia, came into discord with the count John I of Empúries starting an open war to the point that the count besieged the castle.
_	The IBI started its activities in 1961 and it was soon overwhelmed by the speed of technological developments to the point that in 1969 it was about to become defunct due to a lack of content.
_	When "Litke" reached Cape Dezhnev again on 14 October, she suffered multiple hull cracks, a damaged rudder, lost propeller blades and most importantly, her right shaft was warped to the point that it rendered the right engine useless.
_	The poem is settled in the rose, to the point that the poem’s tone is one of sweet, suffering melancholy, a tone that is reaching for the sublime.
_	Burns used the example of Holy Willie to make the point that the Calvinist theology underpinning the entire Kirk was equally hypocritical.
_	Microsoft's attempt to fix the problem was ineffective, to the point that Microsoft pushed the support deadline further to June 30, 2014.
_	While widely popular in Japan, to the point that some of his stories were made into multiple movies, only a small portion of his writings have been translated and published in English.
_	It was Herophilus who made the point that damage to motor nerves induced paralysis.
_	Physicist Stephen Hawking, Microsoft founder Bill Gates, and SpaceX founder Elon Musk have expressed concerns about the possibility that AI could evolve to the point that humans could not control it, with Hawking theorizing that this could "spell the end of the human race".
_	His ultimate dream is to win an Academy Award, to the point that he constantly practices his acceptance speech, just so he will not be caught speechless if and when it ever does happen.
_	In essence this means that from the point that his wife asks for a get and the Beth Din recommends that he deliver the get, until he gives the get, the husband is obligated “to support my Wife-to-Be from the date that our domestic residence together shall cease for whatever reasons, at the rate of … in lieu of my Jewish law obligation of support so long as the two of us remain married according to Jewish law….
_	The hand begins to talk again, this time making the point that it would rather live than die for April.
_	Musicians Buddy Holly and John Lennon became synonymous with the styles of eye-glasses they wore to the point that thick, black horn-rimmed glasses are often called "Buddy Holly glasses" and perfectly round metal eyeglass frames called "John Lennon (or Harry Potter) Glasses."
_	Hal Hinson of "The Washington Post" felt that Gaston was "overbearing" because "everything about him is comically exaggerated and satirized to the point that you feel as if the cleft in his chin might swallow you whole."
_	David Keen is one of the major critics of greed vs. grievance theory, defined primarily by Paul Collier, and argues the point that a conflict, although he cannot define it, cannot be pinpointed to simply one motive.
_	Houbraken wrote that he was given an aphrodisiac in 1624 by a young lady who wished to marry him, and this addled his brain to the point that until his death he could only discuss art topics coherently.
_	By 1925 the price of natural rubber had increased to the point that many companies were exploring methods of producing synthetic rubber to compete with natural rubber.
_	After Wonder Woman and other members of the League had been apparently killed in battle with Ares, Batman donned Ares' discarded helmet to use it against him, only to succumb to the helmet's power, to the point that he not only defeated Ares, but even killed Diana when it was revealed that she had survived the attack because he was already so far under the helmet's influence.
_	Bounty hunting has of course led Rally to making many enemies, most notably Gray, the leader of gangsters whose use of armaments, including bombs, have likened them to terrorists; and Goldie Musou, a leading figure in the Mafia who uses drugs to manipulate people to the point that they can be brainwashed into killing their nearest and dearest.
_	They found that only the students from the U.S. were distracted by multitasking to the point that their GPA suffered.
_	However, in 1913 this agreement deteriorated to the point that the FYN was forced to purchase its own locomotives and rolling stock.
_	Moved to a new location along Constitution Avenue near the White House, the gatehouses deteriorated to the point that they had to be rebuilt in 1938.
_	The reason that Asturias presents Guatemala in this model of a palimpsest (a new culture imposed upon an older one which also sits atop an even older one, etc.) is to make the point that in order to understand Guatemalan identity fully and in its entirety, one must combine all these levels and unite them as parts of a common Guatemalan narrative.
_	Believing themselves too far from this trend to the point that it would not be useful to take part in the congress, Jean-Luc Mélenchon and Marc Dolez announced on 7 November their decision, "by fidelity to their commitments", and for their independence of action, to leave the Socialist Party, and to create a new movement "without concession facing the right".
_	The condition of the populations left behind worsened to the point that when the "cipais" tried to raise another 5,000 carriers from the kingdom of Barue in March 1917, the population rebelled.
_	Peter David's paternal grandparents, Martin and Hela David, and Peter's father, Gunter, came to the United States in the 1930s after the antisemitism in Nazi Germany progressed to the point that Martin's Berlin shoestore became the target of vandalism.
_	This is the name for a specific area in Pierce County that is at the point that Old Alma Highway merges into State Route 203.
_	After "Singled Out"'s cancellation, Malone hosted segments for the Game Show Network until his grandmother's health declined to the point that he had to quit the day to day schedule of television in order to care for her full-time.
_	And attacks in Tanta escalated to the point that a government official publicly addressed the summoned ringleaders saying "Your evil deeds have shown you to be far removed from the teachings of Islám for Islám is a religion of peace" and made them sign a statement of good behavior.
_	In the 1960s production and sales of bicycles, sewing machines, wristwatches, and transistor radios grew to the point that these items became common household possessions, followed in the late 1970s by television sets and cameras.
_	By the end of "Iron Council", civil unrest had grown to the point that martial law was necessary to keep the reigning government in power.
_	Hubs are multi-disciplinary meant to advance highly promising areas of energy science and technology from their early stages of research to the point that the risk level will be low enough for industry to commercialize the technologies.
_	A review system is also needed because, over the course of a very long sentence, the balance between the grounds of detention (punishment, deterrence, public protection and rehabilitation) can shift to the point that detention can no longer be justified."
_	Photogen and Nycteris married; they continued to rely on and rejoice in each other's strengths, to the point that Photogen came to prefer the night and Nycteris the day.
_	The theatre gained in prestige to the point that invitations to work there were highly prized in the theatrical profession.
_	By February 19 the canvas had progressed to the point that Jo observed, "Each day I don't see how E. can add another stroke"—but also that his changes were making "this picture…
_	He became one of the top celebrities in Paris, to the point that effigies made of chocolate, marzipan, and gingerbread were made of his "grotesque" figure and sold and consumed in great quantities throughout Paris.
_	Paine's "libertine" text leads the young man to "bold slanders of the bible", even to the point that he "threw aside his father's good old family bible, and for a surer guide to pleasure took up the AGE OF REASON!"
_	Likewise, they were called "Rûm" (Rome) by their eastern enemies to the point that competing neighbours even acquired its name, such as the Sultanate of Rûm.
_	For example, when the admission of Iraq War veteran Private Brian Dancer sparks political debate with the staff of Sacred Heart to the point that his health is endangered, Kelso removes the employee discount at the hospital's coffee shop (with the exception of himself) in order to unite the staff once more by giving them someone to hate.
_	However, the decision to allow the poor man to die is shown to affect Kelso to the point that he is visibly saddened when he goes home, though he makes sure to hide this fact from the other employees.
_	The film is essentially a re-telling of the first film, to the point that Morgana has two manta ray cohorts very similar to Flotsam and Jetsam, desires the trident and revenge against Triton, and is even voiced by Pat Carroll.
_	Together, they begin to fight Silvah, hoping to wear him down to the point that he is unable to cast the spell.
_	Because of his exposure to mutant genes, Banner holds a deep murderous resentment for all mutants to the point that he volunteered for a suicide mission to detonate a chemical bomb that would destroy the entire mutant stronghold, forcing his former teammates to sacrifice their lives to detonate the bomb early.
_	Eisenhower also made the point that dialogue at the Four Powers Summit was the type of international negotiation that could lead to a relationship between the United States and the Soviet Union where there would be no need to spy on each other.
_	Following the match, the revelation that Douglas and Lizzy Borden were allies emerged, which would crush Rob Black to the point that Borden inherited the power of XPW.
_	In 1953 the National Park Service established the Fort Caroline National Memorial along the southern bank of the St. John's River near the point that commemorates Laudonnière's first landing.
_	One author makes the point that certain portions of the Greek manuscripts of Matthew 5–7 do not agree with the KJV of the text, and concludes that the Book of Mormon version of the sermon should not contain text similar to the KJV.
_	Xiongnu was greatly weakened to the point that they would huddle up into the barren northern Gobi desert (leading to decline of their population), and unable to raid south for the next decade.
_	The Syrah cuttings also have gained a reputation to the point that some vineyards will refer to their plants as stemming from the Bien Nacido clone.
_	It is all located on a vast planet (also called "Mort") that had been stripped of its natural resources to the point that the ecology had been utterly destroyed.
_	Shepherd typically recruited both from West Virginia, both locally in the Eastern Panhandle and in the interior of and elsewhere in the state, and from the comparatively wealthy Maryland and Virginia suburbs surrounding Washington D.C. Dr. Westbrook made the point that SAT and ACT scores are an indirect measure of socioeconomic status.
_	However, Santos found the series' connection with "Tsubasa" to be confusing to the point that only readers from both series would understand some explanations.
_	Computer-assisted video tracking technology has improved to the point that it can determine the position of a ball at impact with a margin of error less than five millimeters.
_	The second study also found after 6 months of sensory enrichment therapy, 21% of the children who initially had been given an autism classification, using the Autism Diagnostic Observation Schedule, improved to the point that, although they remained on the autism spectrum, they no longer met the criteria for classic autism.
_	He has also let his anger come to the point that he almost killed Chuck when his former sensei locked Chuck in his trunk and goaded Casey to a game of chicken; Casey acquiesced despite knowing Chuck was in the trunk.
_	The content grew to the point that the developers contemplated dividing "New Mystery of the Emblem" itself into two releases.
_	In addition to the animals' hostile potential and strength well beyond any human being, chimpanzees physically mature a lot more proportionally than do human beings, and even among the most cleanly and well-organized of housekeepers, maintaining cleanliness and control of chimpanzees is physically demanding to the point that it is impossible for humans to control, especially due to the animals' strength and aggression.
_	By 1900 the population had grown to the point that the ward was divided in three.
_	After May 1860, when he resigned from the Comitia of the RCP Lond., his health declined to the point that he used a wheelchair.
_	Insect development and growing degree days are also used by some farmers and horticulturalists to time their use of organic or biological pest control or other pest control methods so they are applying the procedure or treatment at the point that the pest is most vulnerable.
_	According to Erdkamp, Columella wanted to make the point that "grain offers little profit compared to wine.
_	Under the care of each parent, Motoko's childhood was subjected to excessively rigorous training, straining her to the point that she developed three split-personalities, Hibiki, Fujiko, and Mikiri, colloquially known as HiFuMi.
_	The verbal violence of the folk tales shared during her luncheon with her German hosts and Israeli friend is as significant to Angelou as physical violence, to the point that she becomes ill.
_	He doesn't believe her, but she scares him to the point that he is convinced.
_	The modest naval victory over the British was lauded in France to the point that the king was said to be preparing a marshal's baton for La Galissonière's return.
_	In "Plaza Prom", she insisted that Mr. Gar take her to prom and even dressed up nicely to the point that even K.O. thought she looked breath-taking.
_	In 2010, a 16.1 percent tax increase was proposed as part of the county budget, with Cunningham said was necessary due to difficult financial times, but would avoid the need to sell assets, deplete savings, impose massive layoffs, or reduce government services to the point that the problem would grow worse in subsequent years.
_	The State's power and control continued to increase to the point that "the universities of Costa Rica, Guatemala, Honduras, and Nicaragua all held State monopolies on the authority to grant academic degrees and professional licenses".
_	Using various means (political pressure, protests, and voting power), NIMBYs to try to keep newcomers out by defeating development projects in the local government permitting process, or slowing them down to the point that they become uneconomical for the builders.
_	Bimo are the most revered, to the point that the Nosu religion is also called "bimo religion".
_	The speech of a child with developmental verbal dyspraxia may be unintelligible to the point that daily communication needs cannot be met.
_	Most centres on the point that Ordnance Survey possesses a virtual government monopoly on geographic data in the UK, but, although a government agency, it has been required to act as a Trading Fund (i.e. a commercial entity) from 1999 to 2015.
_	However, he criticized Webster for failing to address the point that psychoanalysis added a "critical dimension to a growing theory of human behavior and spirituality".
_	After about 100,000 miles of operation, the chain may stretch to the point that the hydraulic-operated chain tensioner cannot take up any more slack.
_	Burton v. Wilmington Parking Authority, 365 U.S. 715 (1961), was a United States Supreme Court case that considered the application of the Equal Protection Clause on a private business that operates in close relationship to a government to the point that it becomes a "state actor".
_	It forms a pair with the story of Daniel in the lions' den, both making the point that the God of the Jews will deliver those who are faithful to him.
_	Despite this praise, Green is thought of as a "one-poem" poet, to the point that he became known as "Spleen-Green."
_	Rosti's mother was enamoured with Egypt to the point that when it was time for the diplomat father to terminate his political assignment (in Cairo) and return to his country, she refused to travel with him and decided to remain in Egypt with her son.
_	In a Viennese doubles match he insulted his recurring partner Suzanne Lenglen to the point that she dropped her racquet and bailed.
_	Care provides long-term acute care for severely ill patients, aiming to improve their health to the point that they no longer need hospital care.
_	Portions of the panels and friezes are worn to the point that large areas are incomplete.
_	For heavier nuclei, more energy is needed to bind them, to the point that energy is released by breaking them up into 2 fragments (known as atomic fission).
_	At mid-decade, his popularity grew to the point that it was virtually impossible to have an intellectual debate about political or ideological theoretical questions without mentioning his name.
_	Following the campaign, Hill became involved in a dispute with James Longstreet over a series of newspaper articles that appeared in the "Richmond Examiner"; relations between them deteriorated to the point that Hill was placed under arrest and Hill challenged Longstreet to a duel.
_	Inaccuracies could accumulate to the point that they prevent delivering a feasible result.
_	The authorities hope that when Singapore's community of values had evolved to the point that a common language of art could be used to complete the task of building such a monument again.
_	Painter's "influence was so great that many scientists preferred to believe his count over the actual evidence", to the point that "textbooks from the time carried photographs showing twenty-three pairs of chromosomes, and yet the caption would say there were twenty-four".
_	The situation escalated to the point that Bell filmed a scene in which Nora Batty put her house up for sale.
_	Nicole is ridiculed to the point that there is no end in sight for Nicole.
_	The One however describes the control system as "excellent - to the point that it's easier to control" in comparison to the Mega Drive.
_	In a 2015 article, Bryan Grosnick made the point that "on base" and "slugging" may not be comparable enough to be simply added together.
_	He then said, "If you watch the entire video, it is actually making the point that you cannot be quiet about what's going on because you're afraid of one word.
_	In 1989, when the owner had a hard (wood and fiberglass) top installed to replace the pipe structure canopy, it was determined that its lower height more than compensated for its slightly greater weight, and vessel stability was increased to the point that passenger loading would have gone from 0 with the former top to 14 passengers.
_	Overfishing has depleted some fish populations to the point that large scale commercial fishing, on average around the world, is not economically viable without government assistance.
_	Mulally called his Lexus LS430 the 'finest car in the world', just as Ford was about to announce his selection as CEO, making the point that Ford was not then in a leadership position, though he then faced some criticism and switched to driving Ford models.
_	At night multiple campfires will be set around houses, some to the point that entire valleys may initially appear to be engulfed in flame.
_	Queer Nation members were known for entering social spaces like straight bars and clubs and engaging in straight-identified behaviour like playing spin the bottle to make the point that most public spaces were straight spaces.
_	In 1962, though he declined to seek the governorship himself the following year, Rogers called for the election of "a governor who is big enough, generous enough and honest to the point that he will sacrifice the dictatorial powers now held by the governor and return that power to the people and to the legislature where it so desperately needs to be ..."
_	"The Huffington Post" made the point that the 70% deforestation of the Philippines since 1900, as reported by the national Forest Management Bureau, made far more lethal flooding from cyclones like Haiyan more likely.
_	In 1930, it held its first Watermelon Festival, an annual tradition that lasted until watermelon production in the area dwindled to the point that watermelons for the last festival in 1957 had to be brought in from outside the area.
_	These changes had a significant positive impact on quality and circulation, to the point that the paper is now considered a rival to "Le Devoir" for the title of Quebec's newspaper of record.
_	Thus this Western "proa" often diverged radically from the traditional "proa" to the point that the only shared feature was the windward/leeward hull arrangement.
_	The occurrence of sibling cannibalism in several species underlines the point that inclusive fitness theory should not be understood to simply predict that genetically related individuals will inevitably recognize and engage in positive social behaviors towards genetic relatives.
_	By the point that Liu arrived at the Uyghurs' headquarters, Uyghur forces had already advanced into Tang territory and were ready to attack.
_	While teaching he fixed things around the school to the point that the students referred to him as "Brother Fix-It" since he dealt with maintenance issues and was often seen with a wrench in his hand.
_	The rift damaged Roach-Laurel relations to the point that Roach said that after "Toyland", he no longer wished to produce Laurel and Hardy films.
_	By around the 1950s, the Chinese community had shrunk to the point that Chinatown almost ceased to exist.
_	However, entering into Blade Mode reduces Raiden's energy to the point that if dropped to a certain level, it cannot be used.
_	He has developed the art of underplaying to the point that anyone around him who so much as flinches looks hammily histrionic."
_	Malagard has since died, her body expanding and imploding to the point that the entire layer is literally her remains, and Glasya, daughter of Asmodeus, currently rules Malboge.
_	It proved hugely successful, to the point that a local newspaper claimed that "everybody is Polish on Dyngus Day."
_	Zane had been feuding with Gloucester County Democratic Party head Michael A. Angelini, and the feud had escalated to the point that Zane faced the prospect of a challenge in the Democratic primary from Stephen M. Sweeney, then director of the Gloucester County Board of Chosen Freeholders.
_	By December 9, the transmission line had deteriorated to the point that the station's effective radiated power was reduced to levels where viewers could then only receive the station via cable, satellite or its digital signal in most areas.
_	Dee Dee has a great love and fascination for buttons to the point that her catch-phrase is "Oooooooh, what does this button do?".
_	As rules of the NFL have loosened to favor the offense, the Patriots have increasingly adopted a wide open approach, to the point that they are often now thought of as a short pass first team.
_	In 1906, Wilkes-Barre planned to re-sign Neuer, praising his hitting ability to the point that they were considering trying him out as an outfielder or first baseman.
_	He blessed her from Liege and healed her to the point that she could get up and walk a few steps and even attend mass in the abbey church.
_	The match reportedly saw Yoshiko shooting on Yasukawa, legitimately beating her to the point that the match had to be stopped.
_	Following a stage of intensive development in the late Renaissance, largely in Italy, the violin had improved (in volume, tone, and agility), to the point that it not only became a very important instrument in art music, but proved highly appealing to folk musicians as well, ultimately spreading very widely, sometimes displacing earlier bowed instruments.
_	She developed an obsessive love of reading from an early age, to the point that she would surreptitiously read during class and neglect her homework.
_	But as the Twentieth Century moved nearer and nearer its close, the world had shrunk to the point that there was little room for living in secret and the power of humankind had grown to doomsday proportions.
_	He makes the point that his agent Kirby McCauley had selected the obscure 1977 film "Rituals" as his favorite, while King himself chose 1979's "Tourist Trap" as one that "wields an eerie spooky power.
_	Late in 2003, it was determined that WCBS-FM's broad-based oldies format, which had played music from the 1950s through the 1980s, had been watered down to the point that the pre-1964 oldies were practically gone.
_	The Native American tribes, angered that the position of reservations had not changed, fought back against the Soviets and succeeded, to the point that they were all loaded onto a giant prison ship and deported to deep space along with other rebels of Latino and Caucasian descent—a population of over 5,000 consisting entirely of people with the will and heritage to survive.
_	Jardine later wrote about the number of times Hobbs and Sutcliffe were hit "all over the body" during their stand and made the point that, if a batsman is to make runs on an Australian sticky wicket, then being hit by the ball is inevitable.
_	By the early 20th century, the Equal Protection Clause had been eclipsed to the point that Justice Oliver Wendell Holmes, Jr. dismissed it as "the usual last resort of constitutional arguments."
_	Rimsky-Korsakov relates some of Balakirev's extremes in behavior at this point—how he had "given up eating meat, and ate fish, but ... only those which had died, never the killed variety"; how he would remove his hat and quickly cross himself whenever he passed by a church; and how his compassion for animals reached the point that whenever an insect was found in a room, he would carefully catch it and release it from a window, saying, "Go thee, deary, in the Lord, go!"
_	The pressure kept building up to the point that Catholic countries were threatening to break away from the Church.
_	Severe vibration caused critical stress corrosion of the airframes to the point that the aircraft were beyond economical operation.
_	Outraged, McCoy arranges a sham prosecution to make sure her murderers go to prison for life, skirting legal ethics to the point that he almost faced disbarment and was replaced by a special prosecutor.
_	In it, the original animals are anthropomorphic humanoid animals (to the point that, primary, only their heads are that of animals) and the action occurs in modern Paris with other anthropomorphic animals in human roles.
_	Considering that the only Christian poet before Bede was Cædmon, Stephens makes the point that there could have been no one else during this time period or living in the same area that could have authored the poem other than Cædmon.
_	If a homeowner makes additions or improvements to her house to the point that the owner has invested considerably more than the market value of other houses in that area, then she has likely over-invested in that house.
_	Because of the condition of her body, her weight and race are unknown, as her remains were deteriorated to the point that they weighed fourteen pounds.
_	Mondale and Ferraro rarely touched during their appearances together, to the point that he would not even place his palm on her back when they stood side-by-side; Ferraro later said this was because anything more and "people were afraid that it would look like, 'Oh, my God, they're dating.'".
_	The network began to transition away from the original double trapezoid imaging in March 2015, when the new Sutton Foster series "Younger" was launched without either traditional TV Land branding or advertising, choosing instead to go with a different imaging campaign to the point that "TV Land" was merely shown in regular text on-screen during the series to differentiate it from the rest of the network's schedule.
_	The treasury situation had deteriorated to the point that some soldiers had to be released for lack of funds to pay them.
_	Distrust between the Rokkaku lords and their retainers reached the point that Yoshikata and his son were driven from the castle.
_	The process was twofold – first, obtaining the thumbprint for the lock (which Kari did by tricking Grant into copying a stack of CDs, thus giving them a copy of the master print) and then devising a method of successfully transcribing the fingerprint to the point that it could be used to bypass the lock.
_	After World War II, Transnistria was heavily industrialised, to the point that, in 1990, it was responsible for 40% of Moldova's GDP and 90% of its electricity, although it accounted for only 17% of Moldova's population.
_	One critic of Munn’s 1936 pamphlet "Conditions and Trends in Education for Librarianship" contended that Munn, at that time considered a progressive in the field, essentially was too conservative in his views on limiting advanced technical training for graduate school librarians, making the point that “as long as he [Munn] limits library training...to contemporary library practices and existing library forms, he definitely omits consideration of the non-serviced areas and groups.
_	In a case nine years later ("Maxwell v. Dow"), the Court quoted the "equal...justice under...law" phrase that it had used in "Caldwell" and "Leeper", to make the point that Utah could devise its own criminal procedure, as long as defendants are "proceeded against by the same kind of procedure and ... have the same kind of trial, and the equal protection of the laws is secured to them."
_	The Tsugaru dialect is reputed to be too divergent from standard Japanese for those who are not native speakers, to the point that even people living in the same prefecture may have trouble understanding it.
_	He went on to make the point that: "As a friend of the poor who was loved by God's creatures, Saint Francis invited all of creation – animals, plants, natural forces, even Brother Sun and Sister Moon – to give honor and praise to the Lord.
_	The Spaniards enslaved many of the native people, overworking and harming them to the point that many perished within fifty years of European arrival.
_	In its application to the FCC for special temporary authority to remain silent, the station's license holder claimed that "losses have reached the point that the station no longer generates sufficient funds to pay operating expenses" and that the company is seeking to either sell the station or refinance and return to operation.
_	Traffic begin to grow to the point that in 1964, the Yancey had acquired a second diesel locomotive, a GE 50-ton switcher built new in March 1941 at GE's Schenectady, New York locomotive plant for the US Navy as 65-0098, carrying the builder's number 12984.
_	Afterward, the relations between the Bohemia King John and Ryksa-Elizabeth were peaceful, to the point that a certain weakness could be interpreted by King John's actions, made evident in his approval of grants to the Cistercian convent in Moravia in response to the request of the Dowager Queen.
_	The Indians moved from the Gila River Indian Reservation due to white settlers upstream diverting water from the Gila River to the point that the Indians could no longer farm there.
_	In other words, throughout the work, various melodic, harmonic, and rhythmic ideas are presented and then gradually modified to the point that they transform into something radically different and undergo a complete change of nature.
_	His growing instability had sharpened his "strangenesses", to the point that the news of his suicide on May 8, 1959 by a gunshot to the head did not surprise those who knew him.
_	The linguist William Downes makes the point that the principal characteristic of register, no matter how peculiar or diverse, is that it is obvious and immediately recognisable (Downes. 1998, 309).
_	Due to setbacks in mining and a lack of support from the federal government, Cope's financial situation steadily deteriorated, to the point that his fossil collection was his only significant asset.
_	The 'VIP culture' has also been toned down and financial management done but not to the point that is needed for a developing country like Pakistan.
_	Since the client is a friend of Stanley, Dwight (who is operating without concern for niceties now that the documentary has driven home the point that he will never be the branch manager at Dunder Mifflin) cannot take no for an answer, so he shoots Stanley with bull tranquilizers.
_	Hooker's verdict on the growing manuscript was "incomparably more favourable" than Darwin had anticipated, while Darwin tried to put over the point that "external conditions do extremely little", it was the selection of "chance" variations that produced new species.
_	Attacks on McCord escalated to the point that he filed a libel suit against a newspaper in New York City.
_	Due to the shorter repeater spacings required by digital systems, long-distance still used FDM until the late 1970s when optical fiber was improved to the point that digital connections became the cheapest ones for all distances, short and long.
_	Historian John K. Fairbank (1992: 158–159) says this type of imagery was not officially endorsed by the central authorities in China at that time: in fact the "kǎozhèng" movement of the Qing scholars (consisting of "Song Learning" and "Han Learning") as supported by the government was opposed to this to the point that out of some 2,320 resultingly suppressed works many were banned for having a perceived critical, "antibarbarian tone".
_	Shao's other friends shared the same low opinion of Li, to the point that Shao avoided talking about him in their presence.
_	The two were romantically involved, to the point that she took his surname, until Shaw's death.
_	In its application to the FCC for special temporary authority to remain silent, the station's license holder claimed that "losses have reached the point that the station no longer generates sufficient funds to pay operating expenses" and that the company is seeking to either sell the station or refinance and return to operation.
_	Since the 1950s, computer-assisted developed to the point that databases became central to the journalist's work by the 1980s.
_	The corruption has grown to the point that it even affects the witch's magic, making its effects unpredictable, thus explaining Elinor's newly-ursine form.
_	Their relationship gets to the point that the two live together for a while, but they break up after Santana discovers that Brody is a gigolo.
_	Saying that he "attempted to save his life" might be exaggerated, since it was obvious to even non-medical staff that Elvis had been dead for several hours when his entourage found him in his bathroom (his face was rigid (to the point that mouth-to-mouth ressuscitation was impossible, said Joe Esposito) and had already turned blue (cook Nancy Rooks' testimony + she heard a "loud noise upstairs" around 9:30(-10:00) a.m., about 4 hours before Elvis' body was finally discovered); nurse Marion Cocke: "It was so evident he had been gone a long time").
_	These procedures may produce a suspension of tonality or may create a sense of tonal ambiguity, even to the point that at times the sense of tonality is completely lost.
_	the point that lethal substances and instruments specifically intended for use in an assassination were delivered by the CIA to the Congo Station.
_	The schism between Cramer and Kirk accelerated in 1966 to the point that in a 1988 interview, Kirk said that he could not recall Cramer having rendered him any assistance at all in either the 1964 or 1966 campaigns: "Cramer never helped me do anything.
_	Breeds such as the Mangalitsa hog of Hungary or Large Black pig of Great Britain are experiencing an enormous resurgence, to the point that breeders are unable to keep up with demand.
_	The case against Chapman rests mainly on the point that he undoubtedly was a violent man with a misogynistic streak.
_	The fire metaphor used in the Aggi-Vacchagotta Sutta (which is also used elsewhere) is a radical way of making the point that the liberated sage is beyond phenomenal experience.
_	By the following year the Twin Lakes and Roaring Fork Toll Company had improved the path through the pass, which followed a route close to Highway 82's present alignment, to the point that horses could make the trip.
_	In Toronto, for instance, the network has been abandoned to the point that no level of government will take responsibility for its ownership.
_	Honeywood became very popular in his east Melbourne electorate, to the point that even as the Liberals were decimated in 2002, he retained his seat comfortably, and even won enough votes on the first count to retain the seat without the need for preferences.
_	However, Yano's secrets (including the fact that he slept with Nana's little sister, Yuri, after the accident and his unwillingness to talk about his feelings for his dead girlfriend) make Nanami unsure to the point that she decides to end the relationship, believing she is unable to make him happy.
_	In "Traveling Shoes", Angelou has matured as a writer to the point that she can experiment with form.
_	Many American primetime shows use an extensive amount of innuendo to the point that it is rated TV-PG/14 D for dialogue.
_	In 1963 she came again to Italy and during the journey she joined an excursion in Egypt, where she became fascinated by ancient Egyptian civilization at the point that once in Italy she started to study archaeology at the University of Perugia and later graduated at the University of Florence.
_	to the point that it is Giaffir's mistake to underestimate Selim, the prince is forced to strip himself of a masculine identity to hide in the court.
_	Buller (2005) makes the point that the entire field of evolutionary psychology is never confirmed or falsified; only specific hypotheses, motivated by the general assumptions of evolutionary psychology, are testable.
_	The Pakistani Government contended that the breaking of the sound barrier was a deliberate attempt to make the point that the Pakistan Air Force (PAF) had no aircraft in its inventory that could come close to the MiG-25's cruising altitude (up to ).
_	The steel wire in a PCCP pipeline is stressed to the point that any corrosion of the wire can result in failure.
_	He is often annoyed by Zack and Cody Martin's schemes and antics (to the point that he had vowed never to have any children of his own), but although he acts as though he does not care about the boys, he actually has a great deal of affection for them.
_	The review continues, "Romm is a tenacious fighter ... ready to take on all comers to the point that he can even rub 'friends' and allies the wrong way at times.
_	New firms will continue to enter the industry until the price of the product is lowered to the point that it is the same as the average cost of producing the product, and all of the economic profit disappears.
_	In the early 1980s, Luchaire's sales department had noted the rising costs of light individual anti-armour/assault weapons were to the point that fewer and fewer could be purchased and that there was a need for a one-man anti-armor/assault weapon which could be purchased for a cost slightly higher than that of a rifle grenade, but with the greater accuracy and ease of use of a one-man rocket launcher.
_	By 2004 the violence toward women had escalated to the point that María Marcela Lagarde y de los Ríos introduced the term "femicide," originally coined in the United States, to Latin American audiences to refer to abductions, death and disappearances of women and girls which is allowed by the state and happens with impunity.
_	As was usual for the time, Randel was paid a salary, out of which he paid his workforce, but Wright and the board of directors reduced the salary to the point that it would no longer cover the cost of labor, and Randel was forced to go into his own funds to pay the men, driving himself further into debt than he already was.
_	Skeletonization occurs when the UID has decayed to the point that bones and possibly some tissues are all that is found, usually when death occurred a significant amount of time before discovery.
_	Much of his music was ahead of its time, to the point that it was sometimes considered unacceptable to the listener.
_	On their first gig in Denmark, they brought a full sized bus with more than 50 fans, which impressed the clubowners to the point that they were immediately booked for another gig a couple of months later, where they repeated the process.
_	Clarkson, for example, makes the point that the reference in "Gweith Gwen Ystrat" is to "the men of Catraeth"; it does not state that the battle was fought at Catraeth, and also that according to Bede it was Paulinus, not Rhun, who baptized the Deirans.
_	Ferhunde ruins Fikret's birthday, angering Şevket to the point that he expels Ferhunde.
_	Fikret calls him from a phone booth and tells him that it is not, causing Yaman to investigate Ceyda and later Oguz, but he makes Yaman trust him again to the point that he stops paying Ferhunde.
_	Especially in the latter country, Frisk gained considerable success, to the point that in 1996 it became the first imported product to obtain recognition as the "Best Food Product of the Year" in Japan.
_	Nell from a very conservative Dutch family was opposed by many to the point that The Vicar refused to marry them, and it was left to Rev. W.S. Senior to solemnise the marriage.
_	Compared to earlier work, this approach improved spatial resolution because the use of short laser pulses reduced the duration of the thermal expansion pulse to the point that the thermal diffusion lengths can be on the scale of nanometres rather than microns.
_	Erich S. Gruen maintains for example that focusing on the destruction of the Temple misses the point that already before this, the diaspora was well established.
_	Rentero is a strong opponent of short draws in chess, to the point that in 1991 he offered cash bonuses for playing longer games.
_	In the late 1930s, the colony had expanded to the point that the limited water from Waikolu was no longer sufficient for the growing needs of the settlement.
_	The Portland stone memorial, being a limestone, gradually weathered to the point that the legibility of the names was affected.
_	Overall, the proportion of Moriscos is considered to be lower but more significantly, the majority of them were former Mudejar (Muslims) Christians who were highly integrated in mainstream society, had abandoned many of their distinguishing cultural traits and crucially, unlike in Valencia, they did not suffer from hostility from their old-Christian neighbours, many of whom actively protected them from attempts by the Crown to expel them, to the point that in Plasencia the Crown officials sent to deport the Moriscos were immediately jailed upon arrival and in Avila the local Moriscos were integrated in the clergy and government positions to avoid expulsion.
_	By executing the Cobra, a sufficiently closely pursued aircraft may suddenly slow itself to the point that the pursuer may overshoot it, allowing the previously pursued aircraft to complete the Cobra behind the other.
_	She subsequently apologised for her "clumsy" analogy, which she claimed had been "misunderstood" stating that she was "making a speech on the impact IHRA has in shutting down discussion" and "making the point that section 28 was a policy which acted as a deterrent, without there ever being a case where it was enacted".
_	The repellently fat Mr. Pyecraft is a patron of a London club, who usually pesters Mr. Formalyn, to the point that the latter eventually decides to write Pyecraft's true story, for revealing an unbelievable, yet embarrassing, secret which is shared by both.
_	In an interview with "Anderson Cooper 360°" he made the point that "you don't define yourself by the practices and objectives of the enemy" but figure out who are we and what do we need to be?"
_	He makes the point that the U.S. convicted many Japanese soldiers "for the express crime — the torture — of waterboarding" that it has euphemistically called waterboarding.
_	In general, critics agreed on the point that the film lacked information on the private life of Salerno-Sonnenberg, particularly her romance relationship which was mentioned during the documentary.
_	She was passionate about horseback riding to the point that she would care for her horses personally.
_	Legend has it that his addiction impeded his ability to do his work efficiently, to the point that the Qianlong Emperor summoned him for an explanation.
_	Quadruple jumps have become increasingly common among World and Olympic level men's single skaters, to the point that not having one in a program has come to be seen as a severe handicap.
_	Teen loitering had increasingly become a problem to the point that on October 26, 2006, the mall imposed a weekend curfew prohibiting teens younger than 18 years of age from shopping after 6 PM on Fridays and Saturdays unless they were accompanied by a parent or legal guardian.
_	McDonald's and KFC establishments in China have placed a massive emphasis on cleanliness to the point that they would choose them in a heartbeat over any Chinese fast-food counterpart.
_	Rous, however, continued to press for them to be readmitted, to the point that he was prepared to establish a Southern African confederation so that South Africa and Rhodesia (who were themselves expelled in 1970) could compete.
_	Simon Tavener reviewing for What’sOnStage.com made the point that, "For my money, Pippa Nixon is the brightest star in the RSC ensemble at the moment and I hope that they continue to nurture and cherish her."
_	However, by the mid-1950s the college grew to the point that sharing space with the high school was no longer practical.
_	He forgot his old friendship to the point that he made several campaigns against the Indians on the border.
_	By the late Post classic, the climate had dried to the point that much agriculture was no longer possible and many migrated out of the region.
_	Before the murders, Kovář's family became worried about his mental state to the point that they contacted authorities in connection with his possession of gun license.
_	On the other hand, employees showed great preference to flexible working to the point that 40% of workers in the UK choose it over salary.
_	When his pencil squeaks too much on his slate, it annoys Alice to the point that she takes the pencil from him.
_	Immediately after lanthanum, the 4f orbitals suddenly contract and are lowered in energy to the point that they participate readily in chemical reactions; however, this effect is not yet strong enough at cerium and thus the 5d subshell is still occupied.
_	Dodd reported to Secretary of State Hull in September 1936 that Hitler's domestic economic policies, rearmament, and Rhineland initiatives had consolidated his support to the point that he could count on the support of the German people for a declaration of war "in any measure he might undertake."
_	Here Shinran reiterates the point that if one abandons "sundry practices" and entrusts themselves to Amitabha for one thought-moment, they will attain a state of shinjin and their birth in the Pure Land will be assured.
_	In the meantime, Savage's financial situation worsened to the point that he had virtually no income.
_	By mid-September, written negotiations had progressed to the point that Hawkesbury and Otto met to draft a preliminary agreement.
_	This "rule" has at times been followed so pedantically that arms that violate it were called "armes fausses" (false arms) or "armes à enquérir" (arms of enquiry); any violation was presumed to be intentional, to the point that one was supposed to enquire how it came to pass.
_	Over time, these two personalities grew more and more polarized and individual, to the point that neither entity wanted to become one Superman again.
_	when Mediacorp chose not to renew Wang’s contract, she held Xiang Yun’s hand outside Radio Gate and cried her heart out, while Xiang Yun was distraught to the point that she was at a loss for words and could only manage a hug.
_	They were particularly interested in using the labor of young females, to the point that in much of the industry female workers outnumber male by as much as two-to-one.
_	I think the point that he was making is that we're oftentimes uncomfortable with talking about race until there's some sort of racial flare-up or conflict, and that we could probably be more constructive in facing up to the painful legacy of slavery and Jim Crow and discrimination."
_	Modern vaults and safes are also reinforced to the point that the amount of explosives needed to blow them open would likely create unwanted attention and run the risk of harming the building to the point of collapse.
_	However, unable to express his opinions without fighting with Crawford or the rest of the team (to the point that sharp- and quick-witted Steinman was viewed as verbally abusive by certain cast members), he opted instead to stop coming to the theater regularly, according to his account.
_	Tensions prior to the trial rose to the point that Buffalo decided to pay expansion fees to every team in the league with the exception of the Sonics.
_	She was known as a shrewd businesswoman, who began investing in real estate after her husband's death; over the rest of her life she took what had been a small inheritance and grew it substantially, to the point that her banker considered her the most gifted investor he had ever known.
_	This can reduce customer satisfaction, to the point that some customers will be motivated to switch to another company.
_	In the metaphysical or conceptual sense, balance is used to mean a point between two opposite forces that is desirable over purely one state or the other, such as a balance between the metaphysical Law and Chaos — law by itself being overly controlling, chaos being overly unmanageable, balance being the point that minimizes the negatives of both.
_	Anderson tends to write with sophisticated wit and storylines, making the point that young people are more intelligent than some might think.
_	He imitated well and learnt to dress (to the point that he began to be ashamed of nudity, his original state), wash and always behaved with propriety.
_	The court discussed this facet at length and explained that the accessibility of domain names to a wide spectrum of users underscores the point that similarity in domain names would lead to confusion and also receipt of unsought for services.
_	The car was plagued by weight issues early in the season, to the point that, to compensate for this, a tall Sutil (who, relatively speaking, was one of the heaviest drivers in the field) did not eat for two days in a desperate attempt to remain competitive.
_	The school began on an ranch and over the years has expanded significantly to the point that the campus now encompasses some .
_	Other press advocacy groups, such as the Argentine Journalist Forum (FOPEA) and the Committee to Protect Journalists, observed that the dispute polarized news media and public opinion to the point that accuracy and objectivity in the media itself had become jeopardized.
_	Tree cutting in many places in Java has changed the forest to the point that large parts of former forest are now covered with shrubs, and forest degradation, especially as a result of tree cutting, is widespread throughout.
_	Only 20 soldiers breached the palisade's gate and were quickly overwhelmed, to the point that they utilized fire to create chaos and facilitate their escape from within.
_	According to a recent article in Cultural Survival Quarterly by Dan James Pantone, living conditions have become much worse, to the point that the very survival of the Matsés people is in jeopardy .
_	The consumption of fermented fruit sometimes intoxicates them to the point that flight becomes difficult.
_	The mission of the 39th IBCT in Louisiana grew to the point that at one time the brigade was responsible for working with local officials in fourteen parishes.
_	Brown's opponent, noted leg-lock expert Masakazu Imanari, dislocated Brown's leg to the point that his leg was pulled out and to the side of his knee joint.
_	But the event renders Philip's body unstable to the point that should he transform into Kamen Rider Double again, he would break up into data and be completely absorbed by the planet once he cancels transformation.
_	Depending on the size of the shell fired and chance, a shot may damage the tank to the point that the crew will abandon the tank.
_	The status of the city was elevated to the point that d'Arvieux described it as the capital of Palestine.
_	The zap time is the total duration of time from which the viewer changes the channel using a remote control to the point that the picture of the new channel is displayed.
_	a"s he slept, one chop, scrotum to throat, and saw the glistening, virgin white of my grandmothers bones" this quote clearly defines the point that Little Red Cap took revenge .
_	That cable laying capability had been allowed to deteriorate to the point that the Army had to charter the C.S. "Restorer" in 1941.
_	I was just emphasising the point that the Council was wasting money."
_	The GA or GAA was commissioned by Ford in May 1972, when Ford realised that the Cologne V6 based Weslake OHV V6 engines used in their Capris which competed in the European Touring Car Championship had been modified to the point that no more performance could be extracted from them, Mike Hall, who had already designed the infamous, and highly successful Cosworth DFV and BDA engines, took on the task of developing a whole new engine, based on the 3-Litre Essex V6 block.
_	However, some, such as "pee-pee" and "poo-poo" have been very widely used in reference to bodily functions to the point that they are considered to be standard words, so ability to mention such subjects without adult negativity has recently faded.
_	Eventually, the car will deteriorate to the point that it begins to under-perform.
_	A negatively-geared investment property will generally remain negatively geared for several years, when the rental income will have increased with inflation to the point that the investment is positively geared (the rental income is greater than the interest cost).
_	He was described as reclusive to the point that his "wide knowledge and sterling qualities were known only to a few".
_	As was the case with many of Queensland’s railways, freight traffic steadily declined to the point that the Winton Branch became uneconomical to maintain.
_	The once-thriving Jewish community of Helena declined to the point that by the 1930s they could no longer maintain the building, and it was sold to the State of Montana, which added a second floor, converted it to office space and removed most religious symbolism from the building, though kept the unique stained glass windows.
_	He also found the stylus itself to be unresponsive, slowing the game down to the point that he lost interest.
_	The result at the following General Election saw the anti-Tory vote increase to the point that they would have gained the seat had the vote not been split between three candidates;
_	Under Sjögren's presidency, activity in the IFEO lapsed to the point that the British Eugenics Society, instrumental in founding the group, considered withdrawing.
_	He had to endure poverty and sickness, to the point that he was expelled for not being able to pay his pension.
_	Harris makes the point that when writing the cantata, Handel would have recalled his earlier setting, and perhaps borrowed from it.
_	For a long time the Seven were considered to be steady sources, to the point that RX J0720.4-3125 was included among the calibration sources for the EPIC and RGS instruments on board the orbital X-ray telescope XMM-Newton.
_	Bernstein set out to achieve normal blood sugars; within a year he had refined his insulin and diet to the point that they were relatively normal throughout the day.
_	As the disease progresses, the jaws become rigid to the point that the person is unable to open the mouth.
_	He nevertheless led his side to victory in the 2005–2006 Sheikh Jassem Cup, but conditions had deteriorated to the point that he left the club in April 2006.
_	Aristotle underlines the fact that it is very useful in persuasion to pair multiple sentences, each with very similar clauses and phrases to the point that they are equal or nearly equal in syllable count; Aristotle perfected this art by creating various examples to be cited in a very metrically organized way.
_	Hall's cutting machines were designed for simplicity, to the point that “activity [was] more necessary than judgment” and young boys or “common hands” could successfully run them.
_	This peak in sugar prices caused sugarcane processing plants to produce more sugar than ethanol, and as supply contracted, E100 prices increased to the point that several times during 2010 the price of hydrous ethanol was less than 30 percent cheaper than gasoline.
_	Almost simultaneously, the "samba carioca", which was born in the city center, would climb the slopes of the hills and spread outside the periphery, to the point that, over time, it came to be identified as "samba de morro" (samba from the hills).
_	However, Yeats made the point that what's done was done.
_	Returning soldiers using the G.I. Bill after World War II stressed the state university system to the point that a Tallahassee Branch of the University of Florida (TBUF) was opened on the campus of the Florida State College for Women with the men housed in barracks on nearby Dale Mabry Field.
_	She simply made the point that the phrase appears nowhere in the Constitution."
_	In the July 2011 and August 2011 special chapters, however, the hosts are shown to miss Kyoya quite a bit, to the point that they convince themselves that the lookalike ghost of an Ootori ancestor is actually Kyoya's "living ghost" in the August 2011 special chapter; Tamaki also makes the effort to meet up with him when he is visiting the United States in the July 2011 special chapter.
_	Michael to the point that he unholsters his pistol and puts it to Michael's head.
_	The Jarowair regard Gilbert as an authority because, while most of them were expelled, one elder, Bunda, remained whom Gilbert befriended, to the point that he became Bunda's classificatory brother.
_	In an interview with "the Sunday Telegraph" in February 2010, Reepalu was asked about reports that antisemitism in Malmö has increased to the point that some of its Jewish residents are (or are considering) moving to Israel.
_	And after explaining each with its difficulty, and total lack of precedent for a single surface to the point that before Guadalupe no one could have imagined it, he says: “to me, its so efficacious, that it persuades me of its miraculous character.
_	In 1991, the party officially scrapped the term Marxism–Leninism, because the party had evolved to the point that the term was no longer considered appropriate.
_	In comparing the Internet with Frederick Winslow Taylor's management system for industrial efficiency, Carr makes the point that back then some workers complained that they felt they were becoming mere automatons due to the systemic application of Taylorism — a theory of management that analyzes and synthesizes workflow processes, improving labor productivity.
_	The case caused widespread controversy at the time, evoking exceptionally intense press and public interest to the point that it was discussed by the Cabinet.
_	Croesus initially refused to send his son, having had a dream warning of Atys's young death upon an iron spearpoint, but Atys succeeded in convincing him to let him go, making the point that no boar could wield an iron spear.
_	James Grebey of "Spin" dismissed Tyson's inclusion, however he praised the song for having a statement that is the album's lynchpin and that "[w]ith its robotic, authoritarian droning, 'Iconic' conveys the point that — love her or hate her — Madonna is an icon, and you’re not getting rid of her anytime soon."
_	He, like his sister, chooses a faction different from Abnegation, spreading rumors fueled by Erudite that their parents had abused them to the point that both choose to transfer.
_	This restores her self-confidence to the point that Childress finds her as attractive as before.
_	Women proposing has become more common in recent years, to the point that some jewelry companies have started manufacturing men's engagement rings.
_	A flashback reaffirms the point that Lau wished he had taken a different route in life.
_	The series turned-out to be a tremendous success to the point that it was repeated in subsequent years, with different climbers in what was known as Series II and Series III.
_	The toxicity decreased markedly as the solution aged, to the point that after the solution turned to a gel it had no effects other than mechanical ones.
_	But we have to pay attention to the point that the image of Shariati is not such that some revolutionary groups, in early days of Islamic republic of Iran, attributed to him.
_	The symptoms and brain structures of MPTP-induced Parkinson's disease are fairly indistinguishable to the point that MPTP may be used to simulate the disease in order to study Parkinson's disease physiology and possible treatments within the laboratory.
_	It makes the point that "young immigrant children can easily acquire full fluency in a new language, such as English, if they are heavily exposed to that language in the classroom at an early age."
_	Angel escapes, and Kate becomes obsessed with finding him to the point that she searches the Angel Investigations offices without a warrant.
_	Ure continued to perform on stage while performing in films over the next 13 years, but her growing alcoholism affected her stage career to the point that she was fired from the 1974 pre-Broadway production of "Love for Love" and was replaced by her understudy, Glenn Close.
_	By the late 1990s, this duplication had progressed to the point that the station could no longer focus solely on northwest Alabama and remain viable.
_	The election went ahead with Stott easily retaining his seat due to his reputation for his unstinting support of farmers, to the point that he was known as "Christ of the Mallee" where, it was written, "few would have glanced if he had walked on water".
_	In this post-cyberpunk iteration of a possible future, computer technology has advanced to the point that many members of the public possess cyberbrains, technology that allows them to interface their biological brain with various networks.
_	They value our friendship to the point that they would never want [to jeopardize] it over that little bit of money."
_	On the other hand, if you're extremely interested in its story and world to the point that you would gladly play it again to get a few more details filled in, or you want some kind of pretense to run through the RPG portion of the game again at a much higher difficulty level, spend your dollar without guilt or worry.
_	He was the undisputed master of this instrument to the point that he has been dubbed "the Prince of Tar" by Ahmed Lakchal who introduced him at the radio.
_	Her revues were soon pulling in huge crowds; the crowds got worse to the point that the colonial police had to moved in to manage crowd control and issued a final warning that "this monkey business must cease".
_	He sees a psychiatrist who helps him understand that conflict with his wife has caused him to relive his resentment against his mother to the point that he internalizes his mother's affliction.
_	The Scott scholar David Hewitt agreed, writing that "There is no greater or more moving diary in English"; however he also made the point that its fine artistic shape cannot be credited to Scott, since he quite fortuitously took up the "Journal" as the tragedy of his last years was about to begin.
_	Kitty later turns up at the police station and manipulates the facts to the point that Tinam has no choice but to start a relationship with her.
_	When their situation worsens to the point that their lives are at risk, they are given a chance for freedom by a black market middleman.
_	Through their rendition of "Swing for Sale", the souls of the Harlemites are saved, and the cartoon makes the point that the African American culture of the period was increasingly urban culture, and by extension, that the black Heaven is an urban, Northern place.
_	By the mid 1980s, their numbers had increased significantly, to the point that he was able to donate 40 of the horses to the Caisson Unit of the United States Army (used for parades and demonstrations).
_	By continuously practicing with a weapon, a shooter can develop a subconscious coordination between their eyes, hands, and brain, utilizing a natural human sense known as proprioception to aid in the proper and accurate use of a ranged weapon to the point that they can fire said weapon by "instinct".
_	Presenting before the Agricultural Committee, Burnham made the point that none of the animals that Americans ate, chickens, pigs, cows, sheep, lambs, were native to the U.S., all had been imported by European settlers centuries before, so why should Americans hesitate to introduce hippopotamus and other large animals into the American diet?
_	As a part of the Digital Revolution, the ongoing development of electronics technology decreased the cost of digital circuitry to the point that the technology could be applied to consumer electronics.
_	Their relationship deteriorates to the point that they separate.
_	Speaking on behalf of the ANC, Cheryl Carolus criticised the lack of political involvement by environmentalists in the past and made the point that her decision to get involved in politics had arisen out of a desire to empower herself and to regain control over her environment.
_	Fields of this strength are able to polarize the vacuum to the point that the vacuum becomes birefringent.
_	By 1786 the congregation had grown to the point that a new building was necessary.
_	Burris was living beyond his means, borrowing up to $35,000 and $50,000 at a time from his wife, to the point that she had only stocks and bonds left.
_	The stockpiles of that coin had been depleted to the point that minting new coins would soon be required.
_	Kyōsuke Shikijō is a high school student skilled in kenpō, but incompetent with girls to the point that his interaction with them gets him into painful situations.
_	In July 1981, Hayworth's health had deteriorated to the point that a judge in Los Angeles Superior Court ruled that she should be placed under the care of her daughter, Princess Yasmin Aga Khan of New York City.
_	Times where cultures and genres are mixed to the point that you can't tell what's what anymore.
_	Throughout his work he makes the point that Arabs during the early Muslim expansion, were indeed de-Arabized and to some degree adopted Persian and Greek sedentary culture.
_	In a similar vein, the atheist press often published stories about episodes in Russian history that portrayed believers and the Church in a negative light in order to emphasize the point that Christian morals are deficient and that the Church is immoral.
_	He further stressed on the point that what’s the point in using a vehicle for conveyance when a cycle can do all the work.
_	He went out of his way to make the point that the local communists had been entirely cooperative with the investigators.
_	Some observers have described the song has having a distinctly anti-religious viewpoint, to the point that some have embraced it as an "atheist anthem".
_	The play bears a strong resemblance to "The Death of Robert Earl of Huntington", the second of Anthony Munday's two Robin Hood plays (1598; printed 1601) — to the point that Davenport's work has been called a mere rewrite of Munday's play.
_	Future activity at Taapaca could result in further sector collapses when magma is injected into the edifice and deforms it, to the point that the volcano becomes unstable.
_	This war escalates throughout the season to the point that inmates Supreme Allah and Enrique Morales are targeted to die by the Homeboy's new leader Burr Redding.
_	Early European settlers often kept their livestock on eastern wolf-free outer islands, though animals kept in pasture on the mainland were vulnerable, to the point that a campaign against eastern wolves was launched in the early years of the Plymouth and Massachusetts Bay Colonies, in which both settlers and natives participated.
_	By October 1977, Chaplin's health had declined to the point that he needed constant care.
_	Talking about the anime's second half, he said that it drastically altered the pace and content to the point that viewers might be put off with its conscious bending of the rules of handling characters and viewers alike—
_	The flight of the terrified John contrasts with the entrance of the artist; scholars claim that Caravaggio is making the point that even a sinner one thousand years after the resurrection has a better understanding of Christ than does his friend.
_	His condition deteriorated to the point that the physician decided to amputate his leg.
_	Beach theft, the large-scale removal of sand to the point that entire stretches of a beach disappear, is considerably less common.
_	This manual had a great repercussion on a global level, to the point that it was approved to be taught in elementary schools in Spain.
_	Virji also makes the point that Gahlots were Brahmanas as per their inscriptions while the Maitrakas were Kshatriyas.
_	Due to their view on the Universe – that the Universe is what the Universe is, take it or leave it – they have no desires, dreams or hopes, to the point that the protagonist of a large boring book abruptly dies of thirst in the penultimate chapter of the book due to a briefly mentioned plumbing problem earlier on.
_	He also notes that the shift of focus from Maria to Tuti is done well, to the point that the tragedy does not detract from the message at hand.
_	It makes the point that some 68 per cent of votes were ineffective and hence 'wasted' in the UK General Election of 2015.
_	This process ends and play begins either at the point that the elder hand chooses not to propose, or the dealer refuses to accept, or the stock of remaining cards runs out.
_	Workaholics feel the urge of being busy all the time, to the point that they often perform tasks that are not required or necessary for project completion.
_	Despite the treaty having been signed by these high-ranking officers, the Navarrese battalions, above all, felt a certain repugnance, distrust and discontent, to the point that some officials still intended military revolt.
_	Songwriter Afanasieff confirmed in January 2000, "We worked to the point that we were three-fourths of the way finished, then the incident happened when his son (Prince) got very sick.
_	With wartime scarcity, the price of metals increased to the point that AUP could not afford the required lead and antimony.
_	There is some difference of opinion as to how revolutionary the events of 1688–89 actually were, and several commentators make the point that the provisions of the English Bill of Rights did not represent new laws, but rather stated existing rights.
_	Edward Lansdale had made the point that the South's dependency on aid had the effect of placing the U.S. in the position of providing major help on an endless basis, with the consequence that if such aid were lessened then the enemy would win.
_	By 1961, his following had grown to the point that he felt he should succeed Solon Earl Low as party leader.
_	Football, also known as Futbol, is by far the most popular sport in Paraguay to the point that it is part of the nation's culture.
_	Freaky Fred is Eustace and Muriel's creepy nephew who was sent to the "home for freaky barbers", due to his obsession with cutting the hair of people or animals to the point that they are bald.
_	The dialects can differ markedly in their phonology, to the point that two speakers using two different dialects can find each other's accents mutually unintelligible.
_	In making the point that any mode of instruction that tired the attention was hurtful to children, her reasoning was that people can pay attention only to one thing at a time, and because children can appear resistant to repetition, teachers naturally should vary things.
_	Rahbar's paper, entitled "The Challenge of Muslim Ideas and Social Values to Muslim Society" produced criticism from conference attendees, to the point that he was not allowed to return to the platform to explain his points.
_	During the 2015 European refugee and migrant crisis, Hungary became overburdened by asylum applications to the point that it stopped on 23 June 2015 receiving back its applicants who later crossed the borders to other EU countries and were detained there.
_	By using the shortest and/or fattest barrel possible, the amplitude of the vibrations can be minimized to the point that they are irrelevant to accuracy.
_	Using unconventional tactics, Adams evaded and ignored the gag rule until his persistence irritated his colleagues to the point that he was threatened with censure.
_	People with this disorder are often hindered to the point that they have to use a cane in order to walk.
_	The intrigues, notably involving the metropolitan bishop Arsen of Tbilisi, were a frequent matter of correspondence between Tbilisi and St. Petersburg to the point that the Russian commander in Georgia, General Alexander Tormasov, rhetorically asked whether the church could be ruled by such clergy.
_	In many countries Rockerduck is almost as well known as Scrooge himself, to the point that his name has been used as a metaphor example in many scholar articles.
_	Charles Tripp makes the point that "in 1969, Saddam Hussein was appointed Vice-Chairman of the RCC, arguably the second most powerful office in the state."
_	Charles Rosen, in "The Classical Style", chose this minuet to illustrate the point that Classical-era minuets often have very strong first beats, in contrast to the more flowing rhythm of the Baroque minuet.
_	In "Pediatric Community Mental Health", doctors Cullins, Gabriel, Solages, Call, McKnight, Concepcion, and Cho make the point that the mental health of unaccompanied minors can be categorized into three distinct phases.
_	Driven to distraction, Xu neglects his homework, which infuriates his mother to the point that she was hospitalized and eventually died.
_	For this reason, vehicles utilize transmissions; as the vehicle's speed increases to the point that the engine speed exceeds the speed at which maximum power is developed, the driver shifts to a higher (numerically lower ratio) gear, which reduces engine speed and allows continued acceleration.
_	Ndegeocello declared Diggs' explanation "a crock of bull" and further stated that networks that edited the video or did not air the video missed the point that the song and video were making.
_	The musical style on Kingdom Come's debut album was very close to the early blues-rock style of English rock band Led Zeppelin, to the point that some listeners initially thought that Kingdom Come was actually a Led Zeppelin reunion.
_	This additional element emphasizes the point that "great questions" should evoke thoughtful reflections while considering the current problem, the desired goal, designing strategies, developing action or implementation plans, or executing action steps that are components of the implementation plan.
_	Rajoy revealed to them that, according to PP internal opinion polls, Podemos was rising quickly and approaching the PSOE, to the point that there was the possibility of it becoming the second political force of the country.
_	Others, according to Amos Pampaloni, one of the survivors, were executed in full sight of the Greek population in Argostoli harbour on 23 September 1943 and their bodies were left to rot where they fell, while in smaller streets corpses were decomposing and the stench was insufferable to the point that he could not remain there long enough to take a picture of the carnage.
_	By stating that the Catholic religion is a 'holy religion', he was cruelly beaten to the point that one of his legs was broken.
_	By the early Han Dynasty, his clan had grown rich through herding and trading thousands of heads of cattle and horses, to the point that they may have formed a microstate of their own.
_	Dartmouth Point is the point that marks the north end of Greene Peninsula, the rugged promontory separating Moraine Fjord and the east head of Cumberland East Bay, South Georgia.
_	When it discovered this, allowing naval operations to begin to be transferred to the West End, it also opened the Great Sound and Hamilton Harbour for access by merchant shipping, accelerating the development of the port of Hamilton, and of the central parishes, to the point that by 1815 Hamilton was clearly a more important town than St. George's, and the capital of Bermuda was relocated there.
_	However, by 1941, the perception of discrimination against African Americans had changed to the point that the NAACP magazine "Opportunity" hailed the WPA:
_	Bliss made the point that she was not the one who schedules matches.
_	It is revealed that the events of the first film traumatized her to the point that she spent some time at a mental institution.
_	By 1860, the immense traffic over the road and lack of maintenance had worsened it to the point that it could no longer be used by stagecoaches.
_	Semantic change (also semantic shift, semantic progression, semantic development, or semantic drift) is the evolution of word usage—usually to the point that the modern meaning is radically different from the original usage.
_	Dick Hebdige argues that the subculture lost its vitality when it became commercialized and stylised to the point that mod clothing styles were being created "from above" by clothing companies and by TV shows like "Ready Steady Go!", rather than being developed by young people customising their clothes and combining different fashions.
_	The carvings on this stela are deteriorated to the point that archaeologists have not been able to identify what the carvings depicted.
_	Just as Owen, Comrie stresses the point that before God gives faith to the sinner, He looks to the merits of Christ.
_	In 1897, the Court held in "Chicago, Burlington & Quincy Railroad v. Chicago" (1897) that the Fifth Amendment's Just Compensation Clause relating to eminent domain takings was "an essential element of due process of law ordained by the Fourteenth Amendment" to the point that a Chicago taking of railroad property was "within the meaning of that amendment".
_	While at first he had a small crush on him, his crush start to slowly turn into true love for Shion, which results in him in becoming greatly protective of him to the point that he didn't want to risk scaring or traumatizing him.
_	The Nazis would also target the same territories that Kjellén emphasised and pursued economic domination throughout the former Austro-Hungarian states and the Balkans, monopolising their output to the point that they could dictate the countries' production and dump German industrial goods into their markets .
_	In 1921 Mather's and Weston's joint photographic interests reached the point that they entered into a semi-formal partnership.
_	The liner notes make the point that although series musical arranger Leon Klatzkin is conventionally credited with composing the theme, that credit is in some doubt.
_	Actually, water supplies already have natural occurring fluoride, but many communities chose to add more fluoride to the point that it can reduce tooth decay.
_	Toronto's Koreatown is one example of an area where popularity is growing to the point that private karaoke rooms require reservations on the weekends.
_	Though originally composed, Mendoza starts losing his mind as Joe keeps getting up no matter how much damage he takes, to the point that he wonders if he's trapped in a nightmare.
_	Johnson and Schott had never gotten along, and relations had deteriorated to the point that he had nearly been fired after the 1994 season.
_	Until 1970, the combined guerrilla forces of MPLA and UNITA in the East Front were successful in pressuring Portuguese Armed Forces (FAP) in the area to the point that the guerrillas were able to cross the Cuanza River and could threat the territory of Bié which had an important urban center in the agricultural, commercial and industrial town of Silva Porto.
_	Andy Lamkowski also makes the point that if the Lancastrian force approached from the south rather than the west then a north/south alignment is more likely, Edward would be deploying across the valley width to prevent them moving north and would have the advantage of anchoring his flanks on the slopes of the narrowing valley and/or the River Lugg itself.
_	Psychological trauma has great effects on physical aspects of patients' brains, to the point that it can have detrimental effects akin to actual physical brain damage.
_	While historically there has been room for regional differences in the schedule, as there is today (see "Stations", below), for CBC-owned stations, funding has decreased to the point that most of these stations only broadcast 30 to 90 minutes a day of locally produced newscasts, and no other local programming.
_	Eventually, lighting, collision, rendering and tools underwent drastic rewrites to the point that the code was renamed the Jones engine.
_	Weeks later, however, Shino tells Katagiri that from the start of her marriage, Kie has been forced to perform all manner of duties to the point that she is little more than a slave to her new family.
_	Usually, they would wait until supplies inside the fortifications were exhausted or disease had weakened the defenders to the point that they were willing to surrender.
_	Eve manages to help George marry Alexandra, but she taunts him to the point that he nearly beats her to death.
_	He and Eiji look up to Kamui to the point that they frequently refer him as "The Great Kamui".
_	Kiernan makes the point that in his opinion like genocide, the killings do not have to be organized by the state.
_	He is reported to have hurt his wife to the point that she had to see a doctor on two separate occasions.
_	Within five minutes, the aircraft's fire extinguishers were depleted, electrical power was lost and smoke filled the cockpit to the point that the pilots could not read their instruments.
_	Hibbs suggested that certain repair machines might one day be reduced in size to the point that it would, in theory, be possible to (as Feynman put it) "swallow the doctor".
_	This influence grew to the point that Glazunov's Third Symphony became known as the "anti-kuchist" symphony of his ouvre ("kuchist" refers to "kuchka", the shortened Russian name for The Five) and shared several stylistic fingerprints with Tchaikovsky's later symphonies.
_	The water is bitterly cold at only about , there is no light and the high pressure was thought to be likely to lower oxygen and salinity levels to the point that organisms would not be able to gain a foothold on the wreck.
_	It shows her turning her back on affirmative action for others after she herself benefited from it, lying to the American public about Iraq, and lending P.R. cover to Chevron to the point that it named an oil tanker after her.
_	Usage increased to the point that 70% of NHL players were wearing them by 1979.
_	Seen in context, Ban Gu's discussion of Qu Yuan and the Chu "sao" style is less to the point of the actual evolutionary path of the "fu" and more to the point that the main purpose of the "fu" is political and social criticism through poetic indirection: thus, in "fu", paradoxically, the "fantastic descriptions and an overflowing rhetoric...can be reduced to...restraint", as the sociopolitical criticism which was key to the "fu" was constrained within a very subtle, elaborately indirect, occasional, and allusive mode.
_	Hyacinth frequently confronts the postman with complaints, such as having to receive mail bearing second class stamps, harassing him to the point that he will go to extreme lengths not to face her; and she often forces workmen and other visitors to her home to remove their shoes before entering.
_	A former warden described how men in the Georgia camps were hung by their thumbs as punishment, to the point that their thumbs became so stretched and deformed, to the length of index fingers, that they resembled the "paws of certain apes."
_	If anything, its problem is that it lays too much groundwork for too many things, to the point that events get subsumed by the weight of plot or mythology and the payoff gets muted."
_	Outside of the "Qur’ān", the latter convention is extremely rare, to the point that "y" with "sukūn" will be unambiguously read as the diphthong , and "w" with "sukūn" will be read .
_	When he wakes up, he is imprisoned in a stinking room and has been severely hurt in his head, up to the point that he can feel a hole.
_	Palgi was tortured to the point that he tried to commit suicide: his interrogators revived him, so that they could continue their torture to extract information he refused to divulge.
_	This was necessitated because the subway was allowed to deteriorate during the 1970s and 80s to the point that there were widespread "Code Red" defects on the Flushing Line, and there were some pillars holding elevated structures that were so shaky that trains wouldn't run if the wind exceeded 65 mph.
_	Her relationship with Roshi grows to the point that she accepts an offer of marriage with her father just to stay close to Roshni.
_	In extreme cases, sadism and masochism can include fantasies, sexual urges or behavior which cause observably significant distress or impairment in social, occupational, or other important areas of functioning, to the point that they can be considered part of a mental disorder.
_	She credited her Olympic training to practicing everyday, saying of her frequent practices that it was "so much to the point that I'm like 'I don't want to anymore, I want to have fun.'
_	Lily, however, is on her way down to the point that Rosedale is no longer interested in marrying her.
_	Dion had the crowd in the palm of her hand to the point that when she swaggered over to a corner of the stage during various songs, the crowd in that section rose as one as though on command and reached out."
_	Camiel seduces Marina to the point that she wants Richard dead, while Pascal seduces the family babysitter Stine, causing her to become hostile towards her boyfriend.
_	Machiavelli emphasizes the point that the ends justify the means when the stability and prosperity of the state are in question.
_	When the Governor of Illinois, Rod Blagojevich, issued an executive order in 2005 requiring all pharmacists in the state to dispense prescription contraceptives, Paprocki condemned the order in Blagojevich's presence, saying, "I am dismayed that our secular society has reached the point that individuals are being required by law to violate their personal religious beliefs in order to accommodate the selfish demands of special interest groups."
_	"In each period I have attempted to trace the implications of the media of communication for the character of knowledge and to suggest that a monopoly or oligopoly of knowledge is built up to the point that equilibrium is disturbed."
_	The only student willing to speak up is Daria Morgendorffer, only after being asked to, and even though she is sad to hear that Beavis and Butt-Head are gone, she reinforces the point that the duo were not exactly destined for bright futures.
_	He seems to suffer from several eating disorders that raise his gluttony to the point that he will eat anything, despite the fact that this has made him suffer through multiple heart attacks and even a tapeworm (which he deliberately gave himself by eating many rotten fish in an attempt to lose weight quickly).
_	In 2004 the Navy shut down both transmitters, with the explanation that very low frequency (VLF) communication systems had improved to the point that the ELF system was unnecessary.
_	Personal relations between the two leaders deteriorated to the point that by 1949 Choibalsan refused to attend Stalin's 70th Birthday celebration in Moscow, sending Tsedenbal in his place.
_	Because of these advances, people have distanced themselves from others to the point that they forgot those who are and are on Earth.
_	This is revealed over the course of the "" event, beginning in the lead-up story arc "Brainiac" and culminating in "War of the Supermen", to be instructions for the Legion to prevent the villain Brainiac from altering events in the 21st Century to the point that the Legionnaires' future timeline would be negated.
_	Even though Niles despises C.C., the mutual rage between the butler and C.C. turns to lust or even love that keeps growing from the middle of the series onward, to the point that they both find themselves depressed without each other.
_	The man keeps snorting the powder to the point that he is transformed into a tree and set on fire by a group of women.
_	By 1963, his condition had progressed to the point that he required the assistance of his son and four colleagues to present his speech at the Nobel ceremonies in Stockholm.
_	Tigra's sense of smell is developed to the point that she can recognize a person by scent alone, and track an individual across great distances and through complex environments.
_	The closer Savage's comet came to the planet, the more these powers bestowed by them would intensify, to the point that Savage can batter and wound a weakened Superman long before the astral body would pass.
_	She gave generously in alms to the Augustinians, to the point that she was asked to stop.
_	Milan opposed the match to the point that he resigned his post as commander-in-chief.
_	In the meantime the cancer metastasized to the point that her attending physician called it the worst case he had ever seen.
_	The Kenyan triumvirate of Geoffrey Kipsang Kamworor, Paul Kipngetich Tanui and Bedan Karoki Muchiri took the race out, multiple 64 second laps breaking the race apart to the point that there were only two remaining stragglers, Farah and his American training partner Galen Rupp.
_	Whittle explained that the attraction between Mercedes and Calvin began "building", to the point that she and Malachy have "a massive row" and Calvin comforts her; Whittle stated that "the next thing you know they’re tearing each other’s clothes off".
_	In recent centuries the influence of the Meuse has decreased even further, to the point that the major stretches of river called Oude Maas and Nieuwe Maas have been essentially cut off from the river Meuse completely.
_	The aircraft's bank angle continued to increase to the point that the right wing began to cut into the ground and taxiways nearby the closed runway; the flight's continuous right bank by now took it on a northward ground track.
_	Postal Dude has a deceased father whom he hated, to the point that the first errand of Wednesday is to "piss on Dad".
_	McVeagh makes the point that, because these works of the 1890s were for many years little known (and performances remain rare), the mastery of his first great success, the "Enigma Variations", appeared to be a sudden transformation from mediocrity to genius, but in fact his orchestral skills had been building up throughout the decade.
_	Huntsinger's career was impacted to the point that he became distraught and took his life.
_	Gibbon makes the point that 'Abd-al-Raḥmân did not move at once against Charles Martel, and was surprised by him at Tours as Charles had marched over the mountains avoiding the roads to surprise the Muslim invaders.
_	But is it real, widespread, and substantial to the point that it can decide elections."
_	Programmers at the universities decried the behaviors that batch processing imposed, to the point that Stanford students made a short film humorously critiquing it.
_	One theory as to the naming of the fjord is that early settlers encountered a pod of whales trapped in the fjord who ended up beached; the stranding of whales was in early Iceland a godsend in the meat that it provided, to the point that the word "hvalreki" means both "whale beaching" and "windfall/godsend".
_	This concept was very innovative for the jazz world, to the point that Tommy Flanagan was unable to properly improvise on the original "Giant Steps" recording.
_	According to Coptic sources, he once fasted for 80 days, to the point that his skin cleaved to his bones.
_	She's shy, very unsure of herself and a compulsive money saver, (To the point that her friends think that she's a banker).
_	SEG was founded in 1930 by 30 men and women who felt that the use of geophysical technology for petroleum exploration had matured to the point that a professional society was needed in order to facilitate the transfer of technical knowledge.
_	The joint pains may be due to migratory non-deforming arthritis, which may occur many years before any digestive tract symptoms develop; they tend to involve the large joints but can occur in any pattern and tend not to damage the joint surface to the point that the joint becomes deformed.
_	The specimen strongly resembles "Pseudopetalichthys" to the point that many experts suggest they may be of the same genus or species, though because the only specimens of both genera are so poorly preserved, talk of synonymizing the two can not begin (let alone continue) until more, better preserved specimens are found.
_	Despite this, Charles Blount, the Lord Deputy of Ireland, ravaged Iveagh to the point that its chief Art Roe Magennis submitted to prevent the extermination of his people.
_	Never let me acquire success to the point that
_	According to Ecuadorian historian Oscar Efren Reyes, the bank was influential "to the point that candidates for president and his ministers, senators, and deputies had to have the prior approval of the bank".
_	The diagram above illustrates the point that a precipitate that is not one of the main species in the solution equilibrium may be formed.
_	Blabbermouth.net's review claimed that "this is classic CKY, to the point that most of these songs would fit seamlessly on the band's previous albums", highlighting "Plagued by Images" and "Karmaworks" in particular as reminiscent of the band's older material.
_	The Constitutional Court was crippled to the point that it was in no position to intervene.
_	The network increased its use of on-camera graphics during the game to regularly convey down and distance, score, and statistical information, to the point that they used more than had ever been used in any previous NFL telecast.
_	In French eyes, it made the point that France had effectively replaced China as the arbiter of Vietnamese affairs.
_	Bello was regarded by the British as difficult to work with; Bell came to his new job with an open mind and won over Bello to the point that he was asked to remain in his post as governor after Nigeria gained its independence from the United Kingdom.
_	Tan brought up her past trauma to underscore the point that just because she had been through a few unsuccessful relationships did not mean that she was a promiscuous woman as Pan Lingling had implied.
_	For example, in England during a large part of the Middle Ages, upper-class speech was dramatically influenced by French to the point that it often resembled a French dialect.
_	The differences between poem and song may become less meaningful where verse is set to music, to the point that any distinction becomes untenable.
_	They also make him more manic, to the point that he kills fellow detective Oscar Clemons and two of his fellow operatives.
_	But over recent years it has been deteriorating to the point that it endangers its visitors.
_	Michelle encounters and defeats Ganryu, but is beaten by Kazuya to the point that she begs him to let her face Heihachi and take revenge for Heihachi burning down her village and inadvertently killing "both" her parents.
_	Cassady botches an interrogation by losing her temper and goading a suspect who was close to a confession; the suspect is enraged to the point that he throws a chair through a glass window.
_	She makes the point that vagina is a medical term referring to a specific part of the female genitalia, while 'cunt,' despite its very negative usage, refers to "the whole package" of womanhood.
_	He is also intelligent to the point that he could teach almost every subject to all of his students single-handedly.
_	Overall, the Jewish Agency was successful in making "the point that the Zionist movement and the British Empire were standing shoulder to shoulder against a common enemy, in a war in which they had common goals."
_	Despite enjoying UNIT's confidence and admiration, the Doctor's extraordinary abilities and independence concern UNIT to the point that the Black Archive is designed to be impenetrable by his TARDIS, although it remains vulnerable to his subterfuge.
_	In 1858 Basket-pelota was introduced from French Basque country, Txikito de Eibar developed the game to the point that was introduced as a new modality on Madrid fronton.
_	Over the course of the series, Piper's power grows to the point that even the most powerful demons are affected by it; she is able to vanquish Jeric, an Egyptian demon so powerful that in the past his enemies were only able to mummify him.
_	Steve Clark's alcoholism worsened to the point that he was constantly in and out of rehab.
_	The deposit is one of the more conspicuous of its type, to the point that it was observed and identified on low-resolution Landsat images.
_	These traits, I've come to realize, go together, where observation has evolved to the point that we were situationally multilingual, able to speak several vernaculars, meaning always at least doubled, filling the form while tunneling under the wall."
_	Throughout the film, Face matures from a womanizing joker to a calculating professional - to the point that, in the film's climax, "he", not Hannibal, plans the A-Team's legal redemption.
_	By 1775, the land control controversy had reached the point that the Grantees decided to take official action, and they held a general convention in Cephas Kent's tavern.
_	Cantwell in his dying day is "in an intense state of awareness" of his younger self of 1918 to the point that meld – yet retain the differences wrought by time.
_	I technology had not advanced to the point that oil engines could run faster than 150 rpm.
_	Since its heyday in the 1930s, the organization has shrunk significantly, to the point that it is no longer known whether or not it still exists.
_	When it came to the point that she physically couldn't do anything, she didn't want to live any more.
_	She described how housework was taken for granted and no longer a matter of pride now that so many products once made in the home are bought in the store, to the point that:
_	By 1916 Pickford's popularity had climbed to the point that she was awarded a contract that made her a partner with Zukor and allowed her to produce her own films.
_	Although neither language shows a regular V-2 pattern, they have evolved to the point that main and subordinate clauses differ in word order and auxiliaries may separate from other parts of the verb:
_	Stewart’s citation of "Elkins" made the point that an exception should not be made just because two different sovereigns are involved.
_	Like Saturn's moon Hyperion, Nix, and the other small moons of Pluto, Hydra rotates chaotically; its day length and rotational axis vary quickly over astronomical timescales, to the point that it regularly flips over.
_	However, the growing commercialisation of the western gay subculture in the late 20th and early 21st centuries (the "pink pound") has come under heavy criticism from socialists, for instance, Hannah Dee remarked that it had reached "the point that London Pride - once a militant demonstration in commemoration of the Stonewall riots - has become a corporate-sponsored event far removed from any challenge to the ongoing injustices that we [the LGBT community] face."
_	Cocaine is smoked by inhaling the vapor produced when solid cocaine is heated to the point that it sublimates.
_	These mast arrangements, along with the tremendous variation in the gun layout as the war progressed account for the numerous exterior detail differences among the boats, to the point that at any given time no two "Balao"s looked exactly alike.
_	In doing so, Clark fell off a building "... in full crucifixion pose, driving home the point that he is sacrificing himself for the good of the planet".
_	13th-century authorities are unanimous on the point that the English king adopted the white cross, and the French king the red one (and not vice versa as suggested by later use).
_	Ultimately, catabolysis can progress to the point of no return when the body's machinery for protein synthesis, itself made of protein, has been degraded to the point that it cannot handle any protein.
_	This track, which was dedicated to Casal's dying father was by far the most remembered tracks of the album, to the point that it reached the first place in Los 40 principales chart in summer 1995.
_	The success of this song was so great that also reached the neighbouring France and Portugal, to the point that the singer recorded a Portuguese and French version of this song.
_	Piller subsequently praised the episode, saying "We have Beverly argue the point that Kamala's mission amounts to prostitution, and we have Picard taking the other tack; that whether or not we approve, we can't change or interfere with the way these people are.
_	The intent thereby is for the students to condition themselves and their reflexes to the point that they can meet an incoming force in softness, move with it until they determine its intent and then allow it to exhaust itself or redirect it into a harmless direction.
_	For example, although he says his duplicates have had active sex lives, he is not sure whether he himself ever has, to the point that he was once uncertain whether he or a dupe had conceived his son Sean with Siryn (with the result that his body absorbed his infant son the first time he held the boy, as his body regarded the baby as another dupe rather than an independent entity).
_	Meanwhile, Bob and Linda go to a fancy restaurant where Bob and "his suit" are being sent free drinks by the other patrons, and gets drunk to the point that they have forgotten how to order food.
_	Although the bridge was an election issue, and the bridge project still required two federal approvals, the TPA continued developing the project, progressing to the point that contracts were signed with major participants (including companies operating from the airport).
_	The "Sitti Nurbaya" storyline has often been reused, to the point that Balfas has referred to similar plots as following "the "Sitti Nurbaya" formula".
_	Since the later imperial chambers were also attached to it, the hall acquired a central position in the everyday palace ceremonial, especially in the 9th and 10th centuries, to the point that Constantine VII Porphyrogennetos (r. 945–959) calls it simply "the palace".
_	Moss joked, "We used to be considered one step ahead of the IRS, one step ahead of creditors"—the school is now fully accredited, and its finances improved to the point that SCI-Arc was able to pay $23.1 million to buy its campus building in 2011.
_	Even though certain animals may not have become completely extinct, they may have lowered in numbers to the point that they have suffered an ecological extinction.
_	For example, the Malay words “makan” (to eat), “habis” (finished), and the Hokkien word "kiasu" are constantly used and adopted to SE vocabularies, to the point that Singaporeans are not necessarily aware of which language those words are from.
_	Sheriff Charles B. Laux questioned Teena about the rape; reportedly, he seemed especially interested in Teena's transsexuality, to the point that Teena found his questions rude and unnecessary, and refused to answer.
_	According to Foner, Twain used the conduct of Ament to "drive home the point that the missionary movement served as a front for imperialism.
_	Casey's relationship with his daughter also develops to the point that he considers revealing himself to her mother.
_	In 1901 his first collection of poetry was published in Warsaw, and was greeted with much critical acclaim, to the point that he was hailed "the poet of national renaissance."
_	F'nor attempts to mediate, but things escalate to the point that an Oldtimer, T'reb (who is disturbed by his green dragon being in heat), stabs F'nor.
_	The letters А, В, Е, Ѕ*, І*, Ј*, К, М, Н, О, Р, С, Т, Ү*, Ғ*, Ѵ*, and Х are strongly homoglyphic to Latin letters, to the point that their substitution may not be noticed, unlike those listed above.
_	The show follows a smart-mouthed dog who is incredibly obese, so much to the point that he is ball shaped with small, stubby legs.
_	They also made the point that a large crowd would by now have gathered in Manchester, waiting to see the arrival of the trains and to get a glimpse of the Duke of Wellington.
_	One of them ends up severely beating Paquito (frustration at being stuck in this small town with no future) to the point that he dies…
_	Life on Earth had already advanced to the eukaryote stage of development, and the rate of evolution proceeded slightly faster for the bacteria on their new world, allowing life there to evolve to the point that it could produce the sentient
_	NJPW was reportedly "furious" over Low Ki wrestling a title match in a suit without clearing it with them first to the point that even years later, the company was said to be open to bringing anyone back "with the exception of Low Ki".
_	He excelled to the point that he earned a scholarship to Montreal's McGill University Law School.
_	Following the match, the Carlton Football Club maintained its position of disputing Baker's goal, and claimed the match as a 1–1 draw; and with no formal means of resolving the dispute, both clubs maintained their positions, the point that the two clubs reported different results for the match in their annual reports.
_	Although the singer didn't win the contest his participation was acclaimed and his career experienced a huge rise since his participation, to the point that he turned into a symbol of the Latin American pop music.
_	"Marlborough" continued to fire her main guns until the list increased to the point that prevented her guns from being effectively employed.
_	By quoting other authors on criminality, he supports the point that women who are increasingly participating in non-traditional work would lead to a larger amount of criminal women, as this work is not in accord with the “Natur des [weiblichen] Geschlechts” (English: “nature of the [female] sex”).
_	In 1937, Tollerton's services were reduced significantly to the point that there were no feasible provisions for people commuting from work in York.
_	All these facts have brought a dramatic change in the demographic figure of the municipality, to the point that, as it can be observed on its representation, at present people over 60 years old constitute up to 42,7% of the total population, whereas people below 20 years old represent just as low as 8,4%.
_	As the questions from the board continue, Ron angrily defends Leslie, insisting, "Leslie has never broken a rule in her life, to the point that it's annoying."
_	He had a fractious relationship with the Senior Chaplain, the Rev. Samuel Jones, to the point that in January 1815 the St Helena council minutes record an unspecified disagreement which had arisen between the two that was “productive of disgraceful effects” such as the council felt moved to order them to “abstain from further personal controversy, or circulation of written or printed letters referring to it on pain of suspension."
_	Lou kills the school janitor and one of her many former boyfriends Jack Roswell (Terry Doyle) by electrocuting him with a jukebox to the point that his pacemaker bursts from his chest.
_	Robin is impressed at first, but is quickly disappointed by Don's lack of professionalism and total indifference to his job—to the point that he does the news in his underwear.
_	Although third- and fourth-generation Indos are part of a fairly large minority community in the Netherlands, the path of assimilation ventured by their parents and grandparents has left them with little knowledge of their actual roots and history, even to the point that they find it hard to recognise their own cultural features.
_	It has grown to the point that by November 2014 there were 64 Geoparks in 22 countries across Europe.
_	The river is heavily polluted by industrial and household sewage to the point that it has been called as 'the world's dirtiest river' by some.
_	Their unwelcoming attitude goes so far to the point that they both think the Baudelaires caused the fire themselves.
_	When he got back to the point that he was practicing at full speed and playing, we started to get him in the lineup.
_	He is partly successful, as Gibbs remembers working with Franks and learning from him, recalling up to the point that Franks retired after the Khobar Towers bombing.
_	In their method, the vertices of a given planar graph are sorted by the second coordinates of the eigenvectors of the Laplacian matrix of the graph, and this sorted order is partitioned at the point that minimizes the ratio of the number of edges cut by the partition to the number of vertices on the smaller side of the partition.
_	It seems that this was the point that he began talking about his past work with the CIA.
_	Intended to graphically make the point that "the most powerful corporate executives" should not be "beyond the law", this remark was instead widely condemned as an endorsement of prison rape.
_	His condition improved gradually, to the point that in 2010 he was able to walk with two sticks and drive a car.
_	However, those ancient characteristics have gradually changed up to the point that nowadays almost every "cuadrilla" are mixed.
_	TFT also made the point that even many affluent Tennesseans could benefit from the fact that state income taxes are deductible from for purposes of computing liability for federal income tax, whereas sales taxes (), were not.
_	By 1952, however, the speed requirements for target drones had increased to the point that the KD5G was considered too slow for operational service, while pulsejets also lost efficiency quickly at higher altitudes; as a result the XK5G-1 project was cancelled.
_	The Kodiaks were the top ranked team in the CJAHL for the first part of the season, while the Tigers were the nation's top team from the point that Camrose gave it up until now.
_	This was largely due to Seo Ji-young bullying Lee Ji-hye to the point that the company was forced to disband the group.
_	All who saw it had taken it for granted that Rosalind Russell would win for her performance as Lavinia, to the point that Russell actually began to rise from her seat just before the winner's name was called.
_	Schalkwyk seems to make the point that during this period servitude was not viewed then as we view it today, but as something quietly accepted, linking to Shakespeare's "servitude" to the Fair Youth as something he is not resentful of, simply accepting the fact that as the speaker his rank in society was less than the addressee and that his position as a "servant" or "slave" to the Fair Youth was nothing more than a simple fact.
_	Easily Bach's best-known piece is the "Solfeggietto", Wq. 117/2, to the point that the introduction to "The Essential C.P.E. Bach" is subtitled "Beyond the Solfeggio in C Minor".
_	So, I don't see the point that we should give the money to the youths."
_	‘I recorded the songs on my own and worked on them for about a year, until it got to the point that I thought what I was doing was actually OK."
_	As they mature into adult Graboids, their weight increases to the point that they can no longer jump, but by this point their mouth-tentacles have grown to full size and can be used to hunt.
_	This political opposition exacerbated their athletic rivalry between fans and players, to the point that matches between the two teams were generally referred to as a "Holy War".
_	The band alternate between writing their songs out and improvising them on the spot, repeatedly playing the improvised parts in their live set to the point that the parts become features of the song.
_	However, despite Bass' attempt to host a talk show (attempt being the operative word, and at times awkward to the point that she had to even include the audience to help move things along, like asking an audience member to disregard the introduction paper he was asked to read and just proceed with welcoming the host), she would be interrupted by best friend and next door neighbor Anne Marie Snelling, who also doubled as her sidekick, her brother-in-law Marty Dissler, Bucky Fergus, the town's multi-tasked city employee, her in-house organist (and "my old school nurse," as pointed out by Jennifer) Mrs. Battle and other Derby residents, especially when it came to the guests who were scheduled to appear on the show.
_	Historian Purushottam Shamsher says in his book that Lila Shumsher begged the then Prime Minister Juddha Shumsher to use artillery cannon to cut off burning wing from the non-affected wing ignored confined the fire but, Juddha Shumsher declined his begging, giving the point that using artillery might damage Narayanhiti Palace, the Royal residence of King.
_	Planning progressed to the point that Corps-size drops were demonstrated to foreign observers, including the British Military Attaché Archibald Wavell, in the Kiev military district maneuvers of 1935.
_	During the early years of publication, "The Jakarta Post" had difficulty attracting advertisers, to the point that some editions ran without ads.
_	After Monroe's death in 1962, Travilla kept the dress locked up with many of the costumes he had made over the years for the actress, to the point that for years there was talk of a "Lost Collection".
